WASHINGTON — The State Department said Thursday that it had advised against a visit to North Korea by the former governor of New Mexico, Bill Richardson , and Google's executive chairman, Eric E. Schmidt .Neither Mr. Richardson nor Mr. Schmidt have publicly discussed reports of the possibility of such a trip or its purpose. The two men could not be reached for comment on Thursday.Victor D. Cha, an expert on North Korea at the Center for Strategic and International Studies, said that the visit might aid discussion of a humanitarian issue of concern to the United States: North Korea's detention last month of a naturalized American citizen born in South Korea.North Korea identified the man as Bae Jun-ho, and human rights activists as Kenneth Bae, 44. A report by the North's state-run Korean Central News Agency said, without elaborating, that Mr. Bae had admitted to committing "hostile acts against the republic," a crime punishable by a year in prison. The human rights activists said Mr. Bae had run a travel company that specialized in taking tourists and prospective investors to North Korea.His arrest came shortly after North Korea launched a long-range rocket that it insisted was part of a peaceful space program. But the United States asserts that the real purpose is to develop a ballistic missile as part of a military program. "Frankly, we don't think the timing of this is particularly helpful," the State Department spokeswoman, Victoria Nuland, said Thursday about talk of a trip by Mr. Richardson and Mr. Schmidt. "They are well aware of our views."Mr. Richardson has occasionally served as an unofficial mediator on seemingly intractable issues between North Korea and the United States. Mr. Schmidt has been a prominent campaign donor to President Obama.But the State Department underscored that the two men were not representing the administration. "They are private citizens," Ms. Nuland said. "They are traveling in an unofficial capacity. They are not going to be accompanied by any U.S. officials. They are not carrying any messages from us."Mr. Cha, who served on the staff of the National Security Council during the Bush administration, also speculated that a visit by the men might encourage Kim Jong-un, the young North Korean leader, to relax the state's rigid controls on information."The restricted control of information lies at the heart of the D.P.R.K. state, and yet it is about to host one of the West's greatest facilitators of borderless information flows," Mr. Cha added, using the acronym for the Democratic People's Republic of Korea. "If Google is the first small step in piercing the information bubble in Pyongyang, it could be a very interesting development."
To the delight of American satellite makers, communications satellites — which orbit Earth to relay phone calls, link ships to shore and broadcast television programs — will become legal for civilian export under legislation that President Obama signed into law on Thursday.Although the United States founded the industry, manufacturers were forced to pull back from international markets after a 1999 law categorized the satellites as weapons and restricted their export. At the time, Congress was fearful that selling satellites abroad could allow technology secrets to fall into the wrong hands.The defense bill that President Obama signed will undo that step and let American companies sell communications satellites as civilian technology rather than as deadly arms. Among the beneficiaries will be companies like Boeing, Hughes and Space Systems/Loral."This is a tremendous assist for an industry that is inherently international," said Patricia A. Cooper, president of the Satellite Industry Association, a business group in Washington. "It will ensure our place at the forefront of space."As a practical matter, communications satellites made their debut in 1964 and quickly became stars of the space age. The first craft, orbiting at 22,300 miles, relayed signals to the United States from Japan that let American television viewers watch live coverage of the 1964 Olympic Games in Tokyo.But the industry stumbled 13 years ago after Republicans in Congress pressed for a law that restricted communications satellite exports. The lawmakers praised it as a security precaution that would prevent China and other perceived foes from stealing technology secrets. Detractors saw it as a cynical ploy meant to discredit the Clinton administration and its policy of Chinese engagement.That law put communications satellites on Washington's list of export-controlled munitions: tools of war like tanks, bombs, missiles and equipment for making nuclear arms. Foreign companies took the opportunity to increase their satellite sales.The new law gives Mr. Obama the authority to return communications satellites to their previous status as civilian technology. It retains provisions that restrict the export of satellites to nations like China and North Korea, and to sponsors of state terrorism like Iran.Senator Michael Bennet, Democrat of Colorado, who introduced a bill to change the policy on satellite exports and whose state is a space industry hub, said the measure offered satellite manufacturers a crucial lift."Companies across the country have been operating at a disadvantage due to these policies," he said in a statement. "These reforms will give our businesses a chance to compete globally while still protecting our national security interests."The strict export controls arose from a political fight over satellite launchings by China, which in the 1980s began offering cheap rides into orbit on low-cost rockets. Presidents Ronald Reagan and George H. W. Bush, both Republicans, approved transfers of American spacecraft to Chinese rockets, as did President Bill Clinton, a Democrat.Starting in early 1998, a series of upsets brought the expanding trade to a halt. Two American satellite makers involved in the Chinese launchings, Hughes and Loral, were accused of giving China advice about making not only commercial rockets, but also military missiles.Republicans, who controlled Congress at the time, argued that satellite exports could lead to a hemorrhage of secret materials and information, and said that China might already have stolen encryption secrets.After the strict export rules took effect in 1999, the legal complications involved in selling communications satellites and components abroad contributed to a sharp decline in the American share of the market, from a dominating position to about 50 percent today.During the 2008 presidential campaign, Mr. Obama said the rules had "unduly hampered the competitiveness of the domestic aerospace industry" and vowed to push for change.Representative Howard L. Berman, Democrat of California, who for a decade helped lead the movement for change, said its culmination as law would help restore the nation's competitiveness in the global satellite market."Treating commercial satellites and components as if they were lethal weapons, regardless of whether they're going to friend or foe, has gravely harmed U.S. space manufacturers," he said.Mr. Berman added that the benefits extended beyond the manufacturers. The national security establishment relies on the companies and their technological skills to fulfill the government's satellite needs and to develop spacecraft involved in a wide range of military missions."If they can't compete in the international marketplace," he said of the companies, "they can't innovate and cannot survive."
Can we just agree to hold every Super Bowl in New Orleans? At least here, we can always count on the entertainment of a deep and abiding weirdness.My first Super Bowl, between the Pittsburgh Steelers and the Minnesota Vikings, came at Tulane Stadium in 1975. A naïve college student, I wasn't expecting a craps game to break out at Commissioner Pete Rozelle's annual bacchanal. And in my limited hotel experience, the room service menu had never included pitchers of bourbon.In the early, tortured history of the New Orleans Saints, strangeness was the only normal. Archie Manning recalled a free-agent punt returner who arrived from the airport for a preseason game carrying his bags and a parrot on his shoulder."It was a trend for some guys to have an expensive and good-looking parrot," Manning said. "So this guy put his parrot in his locker, and during the game, he fielded about five punts. He fumbled twice and when we got back to the locker room, the parrot was dead."So it only seemed natural that Sunday's thrilling and interrupted 34-31 victory by Baltimore over San Francisco followed a power failure in the third quarter and a week of stories about the restorative powers of deer antler velvet extract. And while we're on the subject of the Ravens, who knew that cheerleaders, like boxers, had weight limits?Here in a state that bills itself as the Sportsman's Paradise, there was bound to be a Super Bowl story about deer antler velvet extract. This one was provided with great hilarity by Sports Illustrated. And it involved Ray Lewis, the retiring linebacker who apparently grew desperate in October to recover from a torn triceps muscle in time for the playoffs.Of course, 49ers fans, given their understanding nature, were willing to give Lewis a complete pass on his medical quest involving some of the more familiar and popular ruminants."Does he freeze in a car's headlights?" Jeff Bush of Odessa, Tex., asked.According to Sports Illustrated, hours after tearing his right triceps muscle Oct. 14, Lewis spoke by phone with Mitch Ross, a co-owner of a company called Sports With Alternatives to Steroids. The call was taped by Ross. During the conversation, Ross advised Lewis to spray the extract under his tongue every two hours, pop deer antler pills and guzzle something called negatively charged water to stay hydrated.Ross also suggested that Lewis place stickers on his right elbow. Various stickers, called chips, contain holograms that are supposed to help players manage pain and increase stamina. And shield them against the energy-zapping emissions of cellphones in packed stadiums.There are only two problems with the company's claims about deer extract, stickers and negatively charged water: there is little scientific evidence to support them, and the extract happens to contain a banned, muscle-building hormone called IGF-1, or insulinlike growth factor.Lewis denied using the spray. And on Friday, Ross held what might have been the world's first deer antler spray news conference. He never saw Lewis spritz the substance under his tongue, Ross said (though he could not explain the linebacker's insatiable craving for home screenings of "Bambi").Ross did say he had sent more than 600 energy stickers to Ravens players during the playoffs. A number of stickers — which are legal, if scientifically dubious — were visible on players after Sunday's game. It was another sign that athletes would use anything that they believed would give them a performance edge. And they have for centuries, beginning with bull testicles in ancient Greece.At the 2011 Women's World Cup, North Korea's soccer team claimed that positive doping tests resulted from musk deer gland therapy used to treat players who had been struck by lightning. The explanation was not as convincing as it was inventive, and North Korea was banned from the next World Cup.This being deer-hunting territory, actual hunters were curious about antler extract. They had heard of doe urine to attract bucks and raccoon urine to mask human scent, but not antler spray. "Where do you get it?" Kenny Kitto of Watson, La., said. "A deer doctor?"On his cellphone, Larry Feeler carries a photograph of the antler chandelier at his home in Austin, Tex. Traveling to Sunday's game, he heard that ground-up deer horns contain oil that can smooth wrinkles. "Maybe I can spray that stuff on my face and get an instant face-lift," he said of the velvet extract. Then he thought twice. "I don't want a horn growing out my head."At least Lewis had a chance to participate in a final Super Bowl before retiring in victory. Not so Courtney Lenz, a Ravens cheerleader who claimed she was benched because she put on one and a half pounds during the season. Ravens officials said the issue was more complicated. Still, Lenz found much support on social media and among some Baltimore fans."Bless her heart," said Jeanne Hall, an academic counselor at Destrehan High School in Louisiana and mentor to Baltimore safety Ed Reed. "We have a lot of sympathy for her. We're from the South; we're all overweight. What are you going to do in New Orleans but put on a few pounds?"Who knows? Maybe a couple of squirts of deer antler spray can cure muffin tops as well as torn triceps muscles.
WASHINGTON — North Korea confirmed on Tuesday that it had conducted its third, long-threatened nuclear test, according to the official KCNA news service, posing a new challenge for the Obama administration in its effort to keep the country from becoming a full-fledged nuclear power.The KCNA said it used a "miniaturized and lighter nuclear device with greater explosive force than previously" and that the test "did not pose any negative impact on the surrounding ecological environment."Many nations initially detected the test as seismic activity centered near the same location where the North conducted tests in 2006 and 2009. The United States Geological Survey said it was only a kilometer underground, an indication consistent with a nuclear blast. And in Vienna, the organization that monitors the Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Treaty said that tremor had "clear explosionlike characteristics."Preliminary estimates suggested a test far larger than the previous two conducted by the North, though probably less powerful than the first bomb the United States dropped on Japan, in Hiroshima, in 1945.The test is the first under the country's new leader, Kim Jong-un, and an open act of defiance to the Chinese, who urged the young leader not to risk open confrontation by setting off the weapon. In the past few days a Chinese newspaper that is often reflective of the government's thinking said the North would "pay a heavy price" if it proceeded with the test. But it was unclear how China would act at the United Nations Security Council, which scheduled an emergency session for Tuesday morning as news of the blast played out.The United Nations secretary-general Ban Ki-moon, condemned the test in a statement Tuesday.The Obama administration has already threatened to take additional action to penalize the North through the United Nations in the event of a test. But the fact is that there are few sanctions left to apply against the most unpredictable country in Asia. The only penalty that would truly hurt the North would be a cutoff of oil and other aid from China. And until now, despite issuing warnings, the Chinese have feared instability and chaos in the North more than its growing nuclear and missile capability, and the Chinese leadership has refused to participate in sanctions.Mr. Kim, believed to be about 29, appears to be betting that even a third test would not change the Chinese calculus.The test set off a scramble among Washington's Asian allies to assess what the North Koreans had done.The United States sent aloft aircraft equipped with delicate sensors that may, depending on the winds, be able to determine whether it was a plutonium or uranium weapon. The Japanese defense minister, Itsunori Onodera, said Japan had ordered the dispatch of an Air Self-Defense Force jet to monitor for radioactivity in Japanese airspace.Japan's new prime minister, Shinzo Abe, told Parliament that "based on precedents, Japan believes that this quake was triggered by a North Korean nuclear test," and said the country was considering "its own actions, including sanctions, to resolve this and other issues."But the threat may be largely empty, because trade is limited and the United States and its allies have refrained from a naval blockade of North Korea or other steps that could revive open conflict, which has been avoided on the Korean Peninsula since an armistice was declared 60 years ago.It may take days or weeks to determine independently if the test, was successful. American officials will also be looking for signs of whether the North, for the first time, conducted a test of a uranium weapon, based on a uranium enrichment capability it has been pursuing for a decade. The past two tests used plutonium, reprocessed from one of the country's now-defunct nuclear reactors. While the country has only enough plutonium for a half-dozen or so bombs, it can produce enriched uranium well into the future.No country is more interested in the results of the North's nuclear program, or the Western reaction, than Iran, which is pursuing its own uranium enrichment program. The two countries have long cooperated on missile technology, and many intelligence officials believe they share nuclear knowledge as well, though so far there is no hard evidence.The Iranians are also pursuing uranium enrichment, and one senior American official said two weeks ago that "it's very possible that the North Koreans are testing for two countries." Some believe that the country may have been planning two simultaneous tests, but it could take time to sort out the data.
WASHINGTON — President Obama , seeking to put the prosperity and promise of the middle class at the heart of his second-term agenda, called on Congress on Tuesday night to raise the federal minimum wage to $9 an hour, saying that would lift millions out of poverty and energize the economy.In an assertive State of the Union address that fleshed out the populist themes of his inauguration speech, Mr. Obama declared it was "our generation's task" to "reignite the true engine of America's economic growth — a rising, thriving middle class.""Every day," he said, "we should ask ourselves three questions as a nation: How do we attract more jobs to our shores? How do we equip our people with the skills to get those jobs? And how do we make sure that hard work leads to a decent living?"The increase in the minimum wage, from $7.25 an hour now, was the most tangible of a raft of initiatives laid out by the president, from education and energy to public works projects. Taken together, Mr. Obama said, these investments would accelerate the nation's recovery by helping those in the broad middle class.Raising the minimum wage holds particular political appeal for younger Americans, struggling workers and labor groups, all of which were important to Mr. Obama's re-election. His proposal drew one of the loudest ovations of the evening from Democrats in the House chamber.Speaking to a divided Congress, with many Republicans still smarting from his November victory, Mr. Obama declared, "Together, we have cleared away the rubble of crisis, and we can say with renewed confidence that the state of our union is stronger."He urged lawmakers to act on immigration, climate change, budget negotiations, and, above all, on gun violence, delivering an emotional appeal for stricter controls that drew on recent tragedies like the schoolhouse massacre in Newtown, Conn."They deserve a vote," Mr. Obama declared over and over, gesturing to victims of various shootings, who were scattered through the audience.Mr. Obama took the podium after a rousing welcome from lawmakers and other dignitaries. But millions of TV viewers, not to mention people glancing at their smartphones inside the chamber, were distracted by a manhunt across the country, where the police in California were tracking a suspect in the killing of officers and others.News coverage concentrated on the search almost up to the point the president entered the chamber, and immediately after he finished, networks cut away to continue reporting on the events in California.Republicans quickly rejected Mr. Obama's activist approach, saying it would inevitably translate into higher taxes and an overweening government role, strangling economic growth and deepening the nation's fiscal hole.Still, in selecting Senator Marco Rubio, a Cuban-American from Florida, to deliver their party's official rebuttal, Republicans implicitly acknowledged the damage they had suffered at the polls from their hard line stance on immigration. Mr. Rubio, one of the party's rising stars, favors overhauling immigration laws.On Tuesday, he complained that Mr. Obama's "solution to virtually every problem we face is for Washington to tax more, borrow more, and spend more."In a speech dominated by domestic issues, Mr. Obama admonished North Korea a day after it tested a nuclear weapon. He warned the country's reclusive government that it faced further isolation, swift retaliation and a United States bent on improving its own missile defense systems.As new threats erupted, however, old threats were receding, Mr. Obama said. He announced, for example, that 34,000 troops would return home from Afghanistan by this time next year. That withdrawal, representing slightly more than half the current American force, underlined his resolve to quickly wind down the second war of his presidency.Mr. Obama did not match the lofty tone of his inauguration speech, but the address was clearly intended to be its workmanlike companion. In place of his ringing call for a more equitable society was a package of proposals that constitute a blueprint for the remainder of his presidency. Some would require legislation; others merely an executive order.
HONG KONG — North Korea will finally allow Internet searches on mobile devices. But if you're a North Korean, you're out of luck — only foreigners will get this privilege.Cracking the door open slightly to wider Internet use, the government will allow a company called Koryolink to give foreigners access to 3G mobile Internet service by next Friday, according to The Associated Press, which has a bureau in the North.The North Korean police state is famously cloistered, a means for the government to keep news of the world from its impoverished people. Only the most elite North Koreans have been allowed access to the Internet, and even they are watched. And although many North Koreans are allowed to have cellphones, sanctioned phones cannot call outside the country.Foreigners were only recently allowed to use cellphones in the country. Previously, most had to surrender their phones with customs agents.But it is unlikely that the small opening will compromise the North's tight control of its people; the relatively few foreigners who travel to North Korea — a group that includes tourists and occasional journalists — are assigned government minders.The decision, announced Friday, to allow foreigners Internet access comes a month after Google's chairman, Eric E. Schmidt, visited Pyongyang, the North's capital. While there he prodded officials on allowing Internet access, noting how easy it would be to set up through the expanding 3G network of Koryolink, a joint venture of North Korean and Egyptian telecommunications corporations. Presumably, Mr. Schmidt's appeal was directed at giving North Koreans such capability."As the world becomes increasingly connected, their decision to be virtually isolated is very much going to affect their physical world, their economic growth and so forth," Mr. Schmidt told reporters following his visit. "We made that alternative very, very clear."North Koreans will get some benefit from the 3G service, as they will be allowed to text and make video calls, The Associated Press said. They can also view newspaper reports — but the news service mentioned only one source: Rodong Sinmun, the North's main Communist Party newspaper.
Dennis Rodman may not come across as the most natural choice for a sports star turned American diplomat, but North Korea apparently begs to differ. Rodman has traveled to Pyongyang along with three Harlem Globetrotters and a documentary film crew for some basketball exhibitions and, the film company hopes, an audience with the North Korean leader Kim Jong-un , who is said to be a devoted basketball fan.The group landed in Pyongyang on Tuesday, giving a round of interviews to journalists at the airport. "We got invited and we just came over to have some fun," Rodman said. "Hopefully, everything will be O.K. and the kids will have a good time with the games."The visit to North Korea, a country with a brutal dictatorship, comes at a particularly tense time in U.S.-North Korean diplomacy, with North Korea's recent announcement of a nuclear test aggravating an already strained relationship.But one warm spot between the countries is apparently basketball, something the Vice media founder Shane Smith realized while filming two documentaries in North Korea recently. He visited the country's national museum, the Hall of Trophies, where a Michael Jordan-signed basketball given to the former leader Kim Jong-il in 2000 by Secretary of State Madeleine K. Albright is displayed prominently among national treasures. Kim Jong-il was obsessed with the Chicago Bulls dynasty of the 1990s, a fascination he apparently passed along to his son, the current leader."It's weird because when you go there, it's all very anti-American," Smith said. "North Korean kids are fed anti-American propaganda from pretty much the day they are born. But it's O.K. to like American basketball."So Smith hatched a plan to take some of those Bulls players to North Korea for one of the installments of a series Smith will host on HBO, called "Vice," featuring news and footage from around the world, which will make its debut April 5. Smith did not go through the State Department but received permission through his previous contacts and the North Korean ambassador to the United Nations. Smith said he was sure that Kim Jong-un's love of basketball was why the trip was approved.He quickly found that Jordan was not likely to be a willing ambassador. "But Dennis is up for anything and everything, " Smith said. He then recruited the Globetrotters to round out a team, and they offered up Anthony Blakes, known as Buckets; Alex Weekes, known as Moose; and Will Bullard, known as Bull. Ryan Duffy, a Vice correspondent who is on the trip, will also join in on the games to fill out the team."The Harlem Globetrotters are known worldwide as the Ambassadors of Goodwill, and we are proud to continue our storied heritage of entertaining families and breaking down social barriers worldwide," the Globetrotters' chief executive, Kurt Schneider, said in a statement. "Our aim is to entertain and inspire children everywhere. Every child deserves that opportunity."According to the Globetrotters, team members have traveled to 122 countries in the team's 87-year history. This one might be the oddest trip of all, given North Korea's isolation."It is a bizarre place," Smith said. "And this is a bizarre idea."It certainly qualified as a spectacle when the group arrived, even though Rodman was dressed rather conservatively — for him — in a sweat jacket and pants and an array of facial piercings. In North Korea, after all, men are not allowed to have so much as facial hair. The Globetrotters were more colorful in their bright red gear, with Weekes's trademark Afro in its full expanse.The group plans to spend four to five days, visit a children's sports camp and play some games with North Korean players.They tried to make a good first impression with the North Korean news media upon their arrival. "I've always loved Korea — North, South, doesn't matter," Bullard told reporters. "I've always loved Korea personally. We all do. We love every place that we go. They all accept us for who we are. We're role models. We have great characteristics. It's all family fun."In a bit of unintentional hilarity, one of the reporters asked Rodman whether this was his first visit to North Korea. "It is my first time," he said. "I think it's most of these guys' first time here."Rodman quickly took to his Twitter account to talk about the trip, writing: "I'm not a politician. Kim Jung Un & North Korean people are basketball fans. I love everyone. Period. End of story." On a less diplomatic note, he also wrote, "Maybe I'll run into the Gangnam Style dude while I'm here," apparently unaware the pop star Psy is South Korean.Smith said the group hoped for a meeting with Kim Jon-un but was not sure it would happen. Even without that, Smith said he could not wait to see the footage. He said that the opportunity to mix with North Koreans was rare, that his previous trips were supervised tours with only government-approved interview subjects."I look at this as basketball diplomacy, the same way we had Ping-Pong diplomacy with China," Smith said. "Once you get the Globetrotters involved, I mean, how can you not smile when you see the Harlem Globetrotters?"
Imagine being the HBO executive who hears this from one of the channel's producing partners: "We think there's an opportunity for us to get into North Korea."The executive was Michael Lombardo, and the partner was Vice Media, the Brooklyn media company with something of a daredevil streak. The conversation happened about a month ago, when production was well under way on "Vice," a newsmagazine that will have its premiere on HBO on April 5.The company's bosses said they were planning a visit to the secretive country, centered on an exhibition basketball game with the flamboyant former N.B.A. star Dennis Rodman and three members of the Harlem Globetrotters. HBO decided to add what Mr. Lombardo said was "a little bit" of extra financing, beyond what it had already agreed to pay for the newsmagazine."It felt like something that could be interesting for the show," Mr. Lombardo, HBO's president for programming, said last Friday as he recalled the meeting.By Friday, the trip wasn't just "interesting," it was international news. Kim Jong-un showed up for the exhibition game in Pyongyang the day before, making Mr. Rodman and Vice's film crew the first Americans known to have met the North Korean ruler since he inherited power from his father in 2011.On television and online, people were debating which group was benefiting more from the publicity, Vice or the North Korean leadership. At the State Department, reporters wanted to know why the United States government wasn't visibly doing more to debrief Mr. Rodman about his interactions with Mr. Kim, the dictator whom he pronounced his "friend."The Vice crew remains in North Korea; several more days of filming are scheduled. But Mr. Rodman returned home over the weekend, and in his first interview — on ABC's "This Week" on Sunday — he said Mr. Kim was "a great guy" and said "he wants Obama to do one thing, call him" — which generated even more news headlines.To say this was all part of Vice's master plan would overstate the matter. The producers and reporters had no assurances that Mr. Kim would attend the game. But when they arranged the trip to North Korea, a rarity in and of itself, they thought like diplomats. To get what they wanted, they considered what they could give — and they came up with Mr. Rodman and the Globetrotters. "We knew he'd be tempted by basketball," said a Vice spokesman, referring to Mr. Kim.The Kim dynasty's love for the sport, and for the Chicago Bulls in particular, was evident on the Vice co-founder Shane Smith's two previous trips to the country. In a telephone interview, Mr. Smith recalled that when the Bulls would come up in conversation with North Korean handlers, "their eyes would light up." The handlers made sure to show him the basketball signed by Michael Jordan and given to Kim Jong-il by Secretary of State Madeleine Albright in 2000, now on display at a museum in Pyongyang.Mr. Smith described his staff's chats about the trip: "We said to ourselves, 'Well, if we go through normal channels, it's almost impossible to get in. But what if we put together a sort of exhibition basketball team to go over there?' " It has been called "basketball diplomacy" in the press since Mr. Rodman and company arrived — "and that was the actual idea," Mr. Smith added.Vice has a reputation for stunt journalism, having dispatched people in the past to war zones and hot spots overseas. On its main Web site over the weekend, an immersive article from India was sandwiched between a first-person essay titled "My Month Without Sex" and another essay about marijuana. The company also publishes magazines, records and YouTube videos, among other things.For HBO, the newsmagazine partnership — announced last spring — was a leap, something Mr. Lombardo acknowledged in an interview. But "the whole idea of Vice is to take you places where other organizations are not going," he said.That's North Korea in a nutshell, since access to the country is so tightly controlled. To get in, a liaison between North Korea and Vice suggested that the company donate basketball hoops and scoreboards to North Korean schools — a good-will gesture of sorts at the beginning of discussions about a visit.Vice employees based in China did so. The company also contacted Mr. Rodman and the Globetrotters, and paid them an undisclosed amount to take the trip, which began last Tuesday. Mr. Smith, apparently unwelcome in the country because of his previous documentaries, has stayed in touch with his crew there through brief sessions on Skype.Mr. Lombardo indicated that the apparent nuclear test by North Korea two weeks ago, widely condemned by the international community, did not change the producers' thinking about the trip. He noted that Vice was an independent producer, like many of HBO's partners."This was not, and Vice is not, about going in and doing the definitive story on North Korea and arms," Mr. Lombardo said. "This was always intended to be, 'You know what, let's get our camera into an isolated country that we hear about, we read about and yet is hard for us to even picture.' "Mr. Lombardo said he was in awe when he saw the photos of Mr. Rodman and Mr. Kim. Mr. Smith felt similarly: "It's kind of blowing us away," he said Friday.While aware that past visits by American celebrities have become propaganda material for North Korean officials, Mr. Smith said he was a "firm believer in dialogue." He was also aware, he said, that "the last 50 years of diplomacy between North Korea and the U.S. has failed." But then he quickly added: "We're not trying to save the world. We're not politicians. We're trying to show people something that they won't see anywhere else."Vice and HBO have not determined when the footage from North Korea will be broadcast. The first few episodes of the newsmagazine are mostly finished; there will be eight in total, so it could be saved for the season finale.
The United Nations Security Council moved closer on Tuesday to expanding sanctions on North Korea for its nuclear and ballistic missile activities. The United States and China introduced a resolution that would target North Korean bankers and overseas cash couriers, tighten inspections of suspect ship and air cargo, and subject the country's diplomats to invasive scrutiny and increased risk of expulsion.Passage of the measure, drafted in response to the third North Korean underground nuclear test three weeks ago, seemed all but assured, in part because China — North Korea's major benefactor — participated in drafting the language. It would be the fourth Security Council sanctions resolution on North Korea, which has defied the previous measures with increasing belligerence. A vote was expected on Thursday.Infuriated, North Korea vowed to scrap the 1953 armistice that halted the Korean War and threatened to attack the United States with what the North Korean government news agency called an arsenal of diverse "lighter and smaller nukes."American officials played down the North Korean warning, which echoed bombastic admonitions that have become part of the standard fare from the North. Still, the threat of a North Korean nuclear attack seemed all the more provocative, coming two days after North Korea conveyed a message of friendship to a visiting American group that included Dennis Rodman, the former basketball star.Susan E. Rice, the United States ambassador to the United Nations, who introduced the resolution in a closed session of the 15-member Security Council, told reporters afterward that it "builds upon, strengthens and significantly expands the scope of the strong U.N. sanctions already in place."For the first time, she said, the resolution would target "the illicit activities of North Korean diplomatic personnel, North Korean banking relationships, illicit transfers of bulk cash and new travel restrictions." In the past, North Korea has been accused of running extensive counterfeiting and illegal drug enterprises, to raise much-needed hard currency.Ms. Rice declined to predict whether the North would respond with another nuclear test or other retaliation. "All I can tell you is that the international community is united and very firm in its opposition to North Korea's illicit nuclear and missile programs," she said. "And the more provocations that occur, the more isolated and impoverished, sadly, North Korea will become."The Americans did not publicly release the resolution text. But a Security Council diplomat familiar with the measure, who spoke on the condition of anonymity because the language may still be subject to revision, said it broke new ground with restrictions and prohibitions on North Korean banking transactions, new travel restrictions and increased monitoring of North Korean ship and air cargo.The diplomat also said that the resolution added a special lubricant and valve, needed for uranium enrichment, to items that North Korea cannot import.The resolution would also place greater scrutiny on North Korean diplomatic personnel who are suspected of carrying proscribed goods and cash under the guise of official business, exposing them to possible deportation. "We know there are diplomats out there cooking up deals and moving funds around," the Security Council diplomat said.Among the other provisions, the diplomat said the resolution also included new language aimed at enforcement that had been absent from the earlier resolutions. It requires, for example, that if a North Korean cargo vessel crew refuses a host country's request for inspection, the host is under a legal obligation to deny the vessel port access.If a cargo plane is suspected of carrying prohibited goods to or from North Korea, the resolution would urge, but not require, that it be denied permission to fly over any other country — a new provision that could affect China, which routinely permits North Korean flights over its territory.Previous rounds of sanctions have blacklisted trading and financial firms believed to be directly involved with nuclear and missile work. The sanctions have also restricted the importation of luxury goods, an effort directed at the country's ruling elite.American officials said privately that the latest resolution did not go as far as they would have liked, reflecting China's insistence that the punitive measures remain focused on discouraging North Korea's nuclear and missile behavior and avoid actions that could destabilize the country and lead to an economic collapse.But the text was stronger than what some North Korean experts had anticipated, particularly the measures that could slow or frustrate the country's banking activities and extensive dependence on cash payments in its trade with other countries."Going after the banking system in a broad brush way is arguably the strongest thing on this list," said Evans J. R. Revere, a former State Department specialist in East Asian and Pacific affairs, and now senior director at the Albright Stonebridge Group, a Washington-based consulting company. "It does begin to eat into the ability of North Korea to finance many things."Mr. Revere attributed North Korea's reaction on Tuesday to an accumulation of perceived affronts: China's cooperation in drafting the sanctions, the annual military exercises under way between the United States and South Korea, and a hardened attitude by the South's newly elected president, Park Geun-hye."This is North Korea's way of saying, 'We know you guys are doing several things, and here is our response,' " Mr. Revere said.
BEIJING — Jacob J. Lew , the American Treasury secretary, met with President Xi Jinping of China on Tuesday in the first high-level encounter between American and Chinese officials since Mr. Xi assumed the presidency, and one that recognized sticking points in a relationship that has drifted in the last few months.Mr. Lew, 57, a master of the intricacies of the United States budget who has less foreign experience than his predecessors, raised the topic of cybersecurity, a significant issue in the relationship between Washington and Beijing, American officials said. He also talked about North Korea's nuclear program, a topic not normally on a Treasury secretary's agenda, they said.Mr. Xi noted that while the United States and China had "enormous shared interests, of course, unavoidably we have some differences."It has been unusual for Chinese leaders to draw attention to stark divisions with the United States. Mr. Xi's choice of words showed confidence that he could manage the problems, and hinted at a lowering of expectations about developing a strategic relationship with the United States, an idea that had been proffered in the past, diplomats here said.Contacts between Washington and Beijing have been sparse during China's political transition. It began in November when Mr. Xi took over as head of the Communist Party, and ended last week with his ascension to the presidency at the annual session of the National People's Congress.For reasons of protocol, President Obama did not speak with Mr. Xi until last week, when he called the new Chinese president to congratulate him and to outline the issues at hand, including North Korea and cybersecurity.The White House has directly accused China of widespread theft of data from American computer networks, including those of American businesses involved in the Chinese market. China's cyberespionage against American commercial interests has attracted attention in Congress that could have negative consequences for China, analysts said."If we don't see progress, that could increase the prospects for a political backlash that would lead to greater scrutiny of Chinese investment in the United States," said Myron A. Brilliant, executive vice president and head of international affairs at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce in Washington.On North Korea, the Obama administration wants to know whether Beijing will enforce the new sanctions that the United Nations Security Council imposed on the North, with China voting in favor. The administration has also announced an expansion of missile defense capabilities in an effort to deter North Korea, a message that implied that China should restrain its nuclear-armed ally.Mr. Xi appeared to have gone out of his way to meet Mr. Lew before leaving Friday for his first foreign trip as president, which is to include two days in Moscow, followed by a three-nation tour of Africa. Mr. Lew is the first foreign official Mr. Xi has met as president, and Mr. Xi endowed some meaning to his phrase to Mr. Lew that he attached "great importance" to the relationship between China and the United States.At the same time, however, Chinese commentators have noted that Secretary of State John Kerry chose to make his first trip abroad an extended journey to Europe and the Middle East, unlike his predecessor, Hillary Rodham Clinton, who visited Asian nations first, including China. Mr. Kerry is expected to be in China next month as part of an Asian tour, administration officials said.This trip is Mr. Lew's first to China, according to administration officials. The previous two Treasury secretaries, Henry M. Paulson Jr. and Timothy F. Geithner, were experts on China, and for the past seven years they played dominant roles in the relationship between the countries.Mr. Lew arrived in Beijing on Tuesday morning and went almost immediately to the Great Hall of the People. He was accompanied by Lael Brainard, under secretary of the Treasury for international affairs, and Evan Medeiros, a senior official of the National Security Council who specializes in China.As Mr. Lew and Mr. Xi sat side by side in large, white-upholstered armchairs, Mr. Lew stressed in brief comments overheard by reporters that the United States had seen 14 quarters of economic growth, that the housing market was "coming back," and that a "revolution" was under way in the energy sector, a reference to shale gas production. After that, reporters were ushered out.The meeting lasted about 45 minutes, according to Mr. Lew's aides. The secretary stressed the need for a relationship marked by "healthy competition rather than strategic rivalry," a United States official said.Later, Mr. Lew met with Xu Shaoshi, the new chairman of the National Development and Reform Commission, the powerful agency that manages the domestic economy. He had dinner with the new finance minister, Lou Jiwei, and Wednesday he is to meet with China's new prime minister, Li Keqiang.Mr. Lew had his first lunch in China at the Bao Yuan Dumpling House, an informal restaurant close to the United States Embassy. There, with two staff members, he ate a variety of house specialties, using chopsticks. The bill: roughly $6 a person.
American Express customers trying to gain access to their online accounts Thursday were met with blank screens or an ominous ancient type face. The company confirmed that its Web site had come under attack.The assault, which took American Express offline for two hours, was the latest in an intensifying campaign of unusually powerful attacks on American financial institutions that began last September and have taken dozens of them offline intermittently, costing millions of dollars.JPMorgan Chase was taken offline by a similar attack this month. And last week, a separate, aggressive attack incapacitated 32,000 computers at South Korea's banks and television networks.The culprits of these attacks, officials and experts say, appear intent on disabling financial transactions and operations.Corporate leaders have long feared online attacks aimed at financial fraud or economic espionage, but now a new threat has taken hold: attackers, possibly with state backing, who seem bent on destruction."The attacks have changed from espionage to destruction," said Alan Paller, director of research at the SANS Institute, a cybersecurity training organization. "Nations are actively testing how far they can go before we will respond."Security experts who studied the attacks said that it was part of the same campaign that took down the Web sites of JPMorgan Chase, Wells Fargo, Bank of America and others over the last six months. A group that calls itself the Izz ad-Din al-Qassam Cyber Fighters has claimed responsibility for those attacks.The group says it is retaliating for an anti-Islamic video posted on YouTube last fall. But American intelligence officials and industry investigators say they believe the group is a convenient cover for Iran. Just how tight the connection is — or whether the group is acting on direct orders from the Iranian government — is unclear. Government officials and bank executives have failed to produce a smoking gun.North Korea is considered the most likely source of the attacks on South Korea, though investigators are struggling to follow the digital trail, a process that could take months. The North Korean government of Kim Jong-un has openly declared that it is seeking online targets in its neighbor to the south to exact economic damage.Representatives of American Express confirmed that the company was under attack Thursday, but said that there was no evidence that customer data had been compromised. A representative of the Federal Bureau of Investigation did not respond to a request for comment on the American Express attack.Spokesmen for JPMorgan Chase said they would not talk about the recent attack there, its origins or its consequences. JPMorgan has openly acknowledged previous denial of service attacks. But the size and severity of the most recent one apparently led it to reconsider.The Obama administration has publicly urged companies to be more transparent about attacks, but often security experts and lawyers give the opposite advice.The largest contingent of instigators of attacks in the private sector, government officials and researchers say, remains Chinese hackers intent on stealing corporate secrets.The American and South Korean attacks underscore a growing fear that the two countries most worrisome to banks, oil producers and governments may be Iran and North Korea, not because of their skill but because of their brazenness. Neither country is considered a superstar in this area. The appeal of digital weapons is similar to that of nuclear capability: it is a way for an outgunned, outfinanced nation to even the playing field. "These countries are pursuing cyberweapons the same way they are pursuing nuclear weapons," said James A. Lewis, a computer security expert at the Center for Strategic and International Studies in Washington. "It's primitive; it's not top of the line, but it's good enough and they are committed to getting it."American officials are currently weighing their response options, but the issues involved are complex. At a meeting of banking executives, regulators and representatives from the departments of Homeland Security and Treasury last December, some pressed the United States to hit back at the hackers, while others argued that doing so would only lead to more aggressive attacks, according to two people who attended the meeting.The difficulty of deterring such attacks was also the focus of a White House meeting this month with Mr. Obama and business leaders, including the chief executives Jamie Dimon of JPMorgan Chase; Brian T. Moynihan of Bank of America; Rex W. Tillerson of Exxon Mobil; Randall L. Stephenson of AT&T and others.Mr. Obama's goal was to erode the business community's intense opposition to federal legislation that would give the government oversight of how companies protect "critical infrastructure," like banking systems and energy and cellphone networks. That opposition killed a bill last year, prompting Mr. Obama to sign an executive order promoting increased information-sharing with businesses."But I think we heard a new tone at this latest meeting," an Obama aide said later. "Six months of unrelenting attacks have changed some views."
SAN CLEMENTE ISLAND, Calif. — The Japanese soldiers in camouflage face paint and full combat gear were dropped by American helicopters onto this treeless, hilly island, and moved quickly to recapture it from an imaginary invader. To secure their victory, they called on a nearby United States warship to pound the "enemy" with gunfire that exploded in deafening thunderclaps.Perhaps the most notable feature of the war games in February, called Iron Fist, was the baldness of their unspoken warning. There is only one country that Japan fears would stage an assault on one of its islands: China.Iron Fist is one of the latest signs that Japan's anxiety about China's insistent claims over disputed islands as well as North Korea's escalating nuclear threats are pushing Japanese leaders to shift further away from the nation's postwar pacifism.The new assertiveness has been particularly apparent under the new prime minister, Shinzo Abe, a conservative who has increased military spending for the first time in 11 years. With China's maritime forces staging regular demonstrations of their determination to control disputed islands in the East China Sea and North Korea's new leader issuing daily proclamations against the United States and its allies, Mr. Abe's calls for a bolder, stronger military are getting a warmer welcome in Japan than similar efforts in the past."This is a very serious rethink of Japan's security," said Satoshi Morimoto, defense minister in the last administration, who was an architect of changes in Japan's defense policy.Until recently, a simulated battle against Chinese forces would have been unthinkably provocative for Japan, which renounced the right to wage war — or even to possess a military — after its march across Asia in World War II resulted in crushing defeat. The purely defensive forces created in 1954 are still constrained from acting in too offensive a manner: last year, a smaller mock assault by Japanese and American forces on an island near Okinawa was canceled because of local opposition.That recalculation — a large step in what analysts see as a creeping over the years toward a more robust Japanese military — could have broad implications for the power balance in the region, angering China and likely giving the United States a more involved partner in its pivot to Asia to offset China's extended reach.At the same time, the Japanese public has more fully embraced the once-discredited Self-Defense Forces. That is in part because of anxiety over China and North Korea, but also because of the military's prominent humanitarian presence after the 2011 tsunami.Although Japanese liberals and critics elsewhere in Asia fear that Mr. Abe is using regional tensions as an excuse to ram through a hawkish agenda, opinion polls show he has broad public support for his overall policies.The reality of the changing geopolitics was not lost on the Japanese officers who watched their soldiers scrambling up San Clemente's grassy hills. They acknowledged they were learning tactics from the United States Marines, who developed them during their island-hopping campaign in the Pacific against Imperial Japan.The mock invasion was part of the joint training exercises that are held annually with the Marines. But this one broke new ground. Not only were the soldiers calling in American naval fire and airstrikes themselves, the leaders of their elite unit for the first time helped plan the war game, taking on a role closer to equals than to junior partners. And in a reversal of historical roles, wartime aggressor Japan now finds itself on the defensive against a powerful China that feels its moment has arrived."China is in their face, giving them the first militarized challenge that Japan has seen since the war," said Richard J. Samuels, a political scientist at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology who has written about Japanese security. "The mood has shifted toward giving more legitimacy to the guys in uniform."With small but significant steps, Japan has been moving for several years toward refashioning itself and its 240,000-strong Self-Defense Forces into something closer to a true partner of the United States military.In recent years, the two countries have jointly developed a ship-borne missile system capable of shooting down ballistic missiles. Mr. Abe is calling for a broader interpretation of the postwar Constitution, which restricts Japan to acting only in "self-defense," to include acting in defense of allies. Mr. Abe says this would allow Japanese forces to shoot down a North Korean missile heading toward the United States, something they cannot now legally do.
BEIJING — A well-known editor of an influential Communist Party journal said Monday that he had been suspended after writing an article for a British newspaper saying that China should abandon its ally North Korea .The editor, Deng Yuwen, told the South Korean paper Chosun Ilbo that the Foreign Ministry had called the Communist Party's Central Party School in Beijing to complain about his article in the British paper, The Financial Times. It argued that China's strategic alliance with North Korea was "outdated" and that the wayward ally was no longer useful as a buffer against United States influence.Mr. Deng also wrote in the article, published on Feb. 27, that the government in Pyongyang could use nuclear weapons against China.Because of Mr. Deng's stature — he is deputy editor of Study Times, a weekly journal of the Central Party School, which trains rising officials — the article garnered attention in Washington and Europe. Some took it as a sign that perhaps the new Chinese government led by President Xi Jinping was fed up with North Korea after its third nuclear test in February and that it would modify its support.Chosun Ilbo quoted Mr. Deng as saying in a telephone interview: "I was relieved of the position because of that article, and I'm suspended indefinitely. Although I'm still being paid by the company, I don't know when I will be given another position."So far, Chinese government policy makers have shown little sign of paying heed to Mr. Deng's advice on Pyongyang.China backed a new round of sanctions imposed by the United Nations in the wake of the third nuclear test. But as is often the case with sanctions, the question became how seriously China would enforce them.Official Chinese statements routinely say sanctions are not the solution to the North Korean problem.Three senior United States officials have come to Beijing in the past two weeks to request enforcement of the United Nations sanctions and to ask that China stop doing business with the North Korean Trade Bank.The American officials left Beijing without announcing any specific agreement with China on enforcement.Treasury Secretary Jacob J. Lew, who met with Mr. Xi, said after two days of talks in March, "The U.S. views the provocative actions of North Korea as very serious, and we will continue to pursue methods available to change the policy perspective in Pyongyang." He added, "We share a common objective of a denuclearized Korean Peninsula, and we will continue to discuss it."Shortly after Mr. Lew's visit, the United States under secretary of the Treasury for terrorism and financial intelligence, David S. Cohen, and the State Department coordinator for sanctions policy, Daniel Fried, went to Beijing to discuss sanctions enforcement in more detail. They left without any announcements.Mr. Deng's article in The Financial Times did not deal with sanctions, but it offered a harsh critique of the Chinese government's policy of support for North Korea and, in particular, its new leader, Kim Jong-un."It is entirely possible that a nuclear-armed North Korea could try to twist China's arm if Beijing were to fail to meet its demand or if the U.S. were to signal good will toward it," Mr. Deng wrote.North Korea, he argued, did not view its relationship with China through the same lens of "friendship sealed in blood" that came from Chinese soldiers' fighting and dying in the Korean War against the United States. "North Korea does not feel like this at all toward its neighbor," he wrote.And in a response to the Chinese policy of urging North Korea to overhaul its economy, Mr. Deng wrote: "Once the door of reform opened, the regime could be overthrown. Why should China maintain relations with a regime and a country that will face failure sooner or later?"While working at Study Times, Mr. Deng also developed a reputation as a combative commentator for other news publications less bound to official orthodoxy. He wrote an article last year on the failures of President Hu Jintao and Prime Minister Wen Jiabao, who both recently retired, saying that during their decade in power they squandered chances to make much-needed changes.
A more recent article about Secretary of State John Kerry's trip to Asia can be found here .BEIJING — Secretary of State John Kerry flew to China on Saturday and sought to elicit China's help in dealing with an increasingly recalcitrant nuclear armed North Korea by saying that American missile defenses could be cut back if the North abandoned its nuclear program.Mr. Kerry's trip to China, his first since taking office, is part of an intensive three-day push to try to calm tensions on the Korean Peninsula that have threatened to spiral out of control and rattled world leaders.In a news conference, Mr. Kerry suggested that the United States could remove some newly enhanced missile defenses in the region, though he did not specify which ones. Any eventual cutback would address Chinese concerns about the buildup of American weapons systems in the region.After back-to-back meetings between Mr. Kerry and China's top leaders, the two countries announced that they endorsed the principle of ridding the Korean Peninsula of nuclear weapons, though China did not state publicly what steps it might take to achieve that goal after years of reluctance to crack down on Pyongyang."We also joined together in calling on North Korea to refrain from provocations and to abide by international obligations," Mr. Kerry said.Worries spiked last week as the South Koreans predicted the North could launch a new missile test any day and after the disclosure that an American intelligence agency concluded for the first time with "moderate confidence" that North Korea learned how to make a nuclear warhead small enough to be delivered by a ballistic missile. The administration has since said that it was premature to conclude that Pyongyang had a fully tested weapons system.Mr. Kerry's stance on newly fortified missile defenses appeared to be a selling point to get China, the only country presumed to have any real influence over North Korea, to do what it has long resisted — crack down hard enough that North Korea's leaders will give up an increasingly sophisticated nuclear program.In recent weeks, the administration has dispatched two ships outfitted with Aegis antimissile defenses to the region and said it will speed up the positioning of land-based missile defenses on Guam to protect allies in the region after North Korea's threats to rain missiles on United States troops there and on South Korea.Many Chinese believe the antimissile systems are part of a containment strategy against them at a time when the United States is pursuing a "pivot" to Asia.In the past, China has been motivated by a different fear: that any move to destabilize the North would lead to a collapse of the regime and deliver the entire peninsula to the United States' sphere of influence, possibly bringing American troops in South Korea closer to its border.On Sunday, Mr. Kerry met with Japanese leaders in Tokyo, where they agreed to keep working toward a nuclear-free North Korea and suggested that direct talks were possible under certain conditions..North Korea has a clear choice available, Mr. Kerry said, according to The Associated Press, and will find "ready partners" in the United States if it follows through. The Japanese foreign minister, Fumio Kishida, was more specific, saying that Pyongyang must meet its commitment to earlier deals regarding its nuclear and missile programs and on returning kidnapped foreigners.China's cooperation is essential to the Obama administration's strategy of holding a tough line on Pyongyang in an attempt to achieve the type of long-lasting solution on the nuclear program that has eluded a string of United States presidents. Previous administrations responded to North Korean provocations by eventually offering aid to tamp down tensions, only to see the North's promises to relinquish its nuclear program evaporate once the aid had been delivered.Mr. Kerry said he explained to China why the United States felt it needed more missile defenses in the region.
As tensions escalated between North Korea and the world late last month, a small group of students from the prestigious London School of Economics crossed the border into the reclusive country for what was described by organizers as a government-sanctioned "week of sight seeing, meeting with ministers, government officials" and academics.But among the students, the university announced in an outraged statement over the weekend, were three BBC journalists filming an undercover documentary. The BBC, the university said, "deliberately misled" the group to underplay the scope of the reporting, placed the students in danger and jeopardized its work in politically fraught nations. It demanded that the BBC pull the film, set for broadcast on Monday, and issue an apology.The BBC declined, saying that the documentary on a country so few people understand was in the public interest. And in a statement released Sunday, the BBC disputed the university's account. It said the students had been told that a journalist would be present "and were reminded of it again, in time to have been able to change their plans if they wanted to."But the BBC, which the university says actually sent three journalists, also later acknowledged that it had not told the students of the nature of the documentary, in what it characterized as a bid to keep them safe if the journalists were found out and the students were questioned about what they knew.Although at least some tourists are now allowed into the police state, reporters need government permission to work there and are assigned minders. In 2009 two American journalists, Laura Ling, then 32, and Euna Lee, then 36, were arrested and sentenced to 12 years of hard labor after being accused of illegally entering North Korean territory while researching a report on women and human trafficking. They were spared the prospect of years in a brutal gulag when former President Bill Clinton flew to Pyongyang and negotiated their release four months later.Alex Peters-Day, the lead student representative for the university, said Sunday that students had received e-mails from the North Korean government on their return saying that it had learned that reporters were with the group and was very angry. Ms. Peters-Day disputed the BBC version of events, saying the students had not been given enough information to give informed consent.Craig Calhoun, the university's director, said in a post on Twitter that the trip "was not an official LSE trip." He said the BBC had essentially recruited some students in a university-affiliated student international relations group, the Grimshaw Club, and had "passed it off" as a student trip.Ms. Peters-Day said that students had received an e-mail suggesting the trip from one of the BBC journalists, Tomiko Sweeney, who is married to the lead reporter on the documentary, John Sweeney, and is a former LSE student. Mr. Sweeney did not respond to a message left on his cellphone, but said, in a BBC radio interview and on Twitter that he disputed the school's allegations. There was no answer at a London number listed for the couple.Ceri Thomas, the BBC's head of news, said Sunday that though the trip had been organized by Mr. Sweeney's wife, it "was going to happen before the BBC got involved." The students were warned of the dangers in two meetings in London and again in Beijing, he said. "The only people we deceived," he said of the documentary, "was the North Korean government. And if the students were in on that deception they were in a worse position."The public interest argument for the documentary was "overwhelming," Mr. Thomas said. North Korea is "a country that is hidden from view, where we suspect that brutal things are happening, one of the most oppressive regimes on the planet which is threatening nuclear war in the Korean Peninsula."The standoff marks the second time this year that the world's delicate diplomatic dance with North Korea over its escalating nuclear threats has been disturbed by a television crew. In late February, the magazine Vice sent the former Chicago Bulls star Dennis Rodman to Pyongyang to meet the country's leader, Kim Jong-un, an avid basketball fan, for a documentary series it is producing in collaboration with HBO.
TOKYO — Secretary of State John Kerry said Sunday that the United States was prepared to reach out to Kim Jong-un of North Korea if he made the first move to abandon his nuclear weapons program."We need the appropriate moment, appropriate circumstance," Mr. Kerry told reporters in Tokyo.While he did not say specifically what steps would be needed, according to the long-standing United States position they might include a public commitment to denuclearization and such measures as halting the production of nuclear material, refraining from testing missiles and ceasing threats to attack its neighbors.Over the past week, there has been considerable attention on the United States' vows to militarily defend its Asian allies and its warning that North Korea should forgo a test firing a Musudan medium-range missile.But the United States has also postponed tests of an intercontinental ballistic missile and toned down its statements in recent weeks to try to create an atmosphere in which talks with North Korea might begin, a theme that Mr. Kerry emphasized Sunday."What we really ought to be talking about is the possibility of peace," he said in a joint news conference on Sunday with Fumio Kishida, Japan's foreign minister. "And I think there are those possibilities."Sketching out his approach in his meeting later in the day with reporters, Mr. Kerry said that before talks could begin, North Korea needed to take tangible steps to demonstrate that it was serious about denuclearization.But it seemed unlikely that that precondition for talks would be met by North Korea, given the country's announcements that it considers itself to be a nuclear state and its dedication to a "military-first" stance that channels resources to its armed forces.The Obama administration has been willing to conduct direct talks with Iranian officials and sought early in Mr. Obama's first term to forge a constructive relationship with President Bashar al-Assad of Syria. But the White House, in a policy that some have called strategic patience, has remained unwilling to meet openly with top North Korean officials unless they first committed to denuclearization.Mr. Kerry indicated there were some circumstances in which he could imagine sending a representative to talk to North Korean leaders or engaging directly with the North Koreans through a diplomatic back channel."It may be that somebody will be asked to sit down," he said."I am open personally to exploring other avenues; I particularly want to hear what the Chinese have to say," Mr. Kerry said. "I am not going to be so stuck in the mud that an opportunity to actually get something done is flagrantly wasted.""But fundamentally the concept is they're going to have to show some kind of good faith here so that we are not going around and around," he said. "They have to indicate that seriousness of purpose to go toward the denuclearization, and there are ways that they can do that."Tokyo is the final stop on Mr. Kerry's six-nation tour and his third destination in Asia. As part of its regional diplomacy, the United States has also been urging Japan and South Korea, its two main regional allies but who remain divided by history, to cooperate on North Korea.In his news conference in Tokyo, Mr. Kerry expanded on his remarks on Saturday that the United States would be willing to withdraw some of the antimissile defenses it recently deployed if China were able to persuade North Korea to abandon its nuclear weapons program. Those remarks, made at a news conference in Beijing, were seen as a lure to elicit China's cooperation."The president of the United States deployed some additional missile defense capacity precisely because of the threat of North Korea," Mr. Kerry said. "And it is logical that if the threat of North Korea disappears because the peninsula denuclearizes, then obviously that threat no longer mandates that kind of posture.""But there have been no agreements, no discussions; there is nothing actually on the table with respect to that," he added.So far, Mr. Kerry's comments and his endorsement of South Korea's efforts to open a dialogue with the government of Kim Jong-un in the North have produced nothing but scorn from North Korea's leaders.On Sunday, North Korea rebuffed a South Korean proposal for dialogue, calling it "empty" and a "cunning trick.""If South Korea truly does want to have talks, it should first change its confrontational stance rather than playing on words," a spokesman of the North's Committee for the Peaceful Reunification of Korea was quoted as saying on Sunday by the official Korean Central News Agency. "It will depend on the South Korean authorities' attitude whether there will be dialogue in the future."
SEOUL — The South Korean government proposed a 17.3 trillion won stimulus Tuesday to revive slowing growth in the country.The $15.3 billion effort would be the third-largest supplementary budget ever in South Korea. It would be exceeded, when measured as a proportion of gross domestic product, only by the efforts approved after the 1998 Asia financial crisis and the 2008 global financial turmoil.The Ministry of Strategy and Finance said the budget would add 0.3 percentage point to growth this year and create 40,000 new jobs.A ministry statement said the budget would be used to cover a shortfall in tax revenue, to aid small and medium-size companies and to lift the stagnant real estate market. It said it would submit the plan to Parliament on Thursday.The ministry estimated a tax revenue shortfall of 6 trillion won because of the slower-than-expected economic recovery and another shortfall of 6 trillion won from delays in selling stakes in state-owned banks. The remaining 5.3 trillion won would be a net increase in the government's budget.In addition to the extra budget, which requires parliamentary approval, the ministry will use 2 trillion won in state funds that do not need to go through the assembly to stimulate the economy."The extra budget is aimed at finding growth momentum for South Korea's economy," the finance minister, Hyun Oh-seok, said in a news release.The stimulus plan comes after a cut last month in the ministry's forecast for South Korea's economic growth this year. It said South Korea's economy would expand 2.3 percent, instead of the 3 percent it had predicted earlier. The ministry said the slide in Japan's yen had hurt exports and weakened weak consumer sentiment.The Bank of Japan's unprecedented monetary measures, which have driven down the yen's value, are meant to help lift Japan's economy out of years of deflation. But the weaker yen puts major South Korean exporters like Samsung Electronics and Hyundai Motor at a disadvantage against Japanese rivals like Sony and Toyota Motor.The fiscal measures also come amid heightened tensions with North Korea. The increase in threats from the North has caused jitters in South Korea's financial markets.The stimulus plan underlines the government's search for a quick fix to the economic slowdown. South Korea's economy expanded 2 percent in 2012, the slowest rate in three years, because of weak global recovery and trade. The opposition, however, could use procedural tactics to slow parliamentary approval of the extra budget.Despite the government's calls for all-out efforts to help the economy, South Korea's central bank has resisted lowering interest rates.Last week, Bank of Korea kept its main interest rate unchanged at 2.75 percent for a sixth month. Governor Kim Choong-soo said the economy was on track for a slow recovery and monetary policy was "accommodative" enough to encourage borrowing and spending.
WASHINGTON — President Obama offered an endorsement Tuesday of South Korea's new president, Park Geun-hye, and her blueprint for defusing tensions with North Korea, but warned that the first move was up to the erratic, often belligerent young leader in Pyongyang,Kim Jong-un.In a news conference after an Oval Office meeting, Mr. Obama said Ms. Park's policy, which mixes deterrence with an openness to engagement, is "very compatible with my approach."But after weeks of warlike statements from Mr. Kim, which subsided only in recent days, Mr. Obama emphasized that the "burden is on Pyongyang to take meaningful steps to abide by its commitments and obligations, particularly the denuclearization of the Korean Peninsula."It was the first meeting for Mr. Obama and Ms. Park, a steely conservative who is the first female leader of South Korea and the daughter of an assassinated South Korean strongman, Park Chung-Hee. And it came after a tempestuous few weeks, in which North Korea threatened to rain nuclear missiles on both South Korea and the United States."If Pyongyang thought its recent threats would drive a wedge between South Korea and the United States, or somehow garner the North international respect, today is further evidence that North Korea has failed again," Mr. Obama said. "President Park and South Koreans have stood firm, with confidence and resolve."Yet behind the display of unity, some analysts questioned whether Ms. Park's emphasis on engagement, as well as deterrence, could end up at odds with Mr. Obama's more hands-off approach with the North Koreans.Much of their meeting, a senior administration official said, was devoted to Ms. Park, 61, explaining her strategy — called "trust-politik" — which aims to rebuild trust between the North and South by looking for ways to engage, even while responding strongly to acts of provocation.The Obama administration has eschewed direct contact with North Korea and has made negotiations contingent on getting a commitment from the North to abandon its nuclear weapons. Whether Ms. Park believes that must be a precondition is not clear. She appears to be open to initial talks while turning to denuclearization later."If there is no nuclear component to it, or a security component, than I doubt if the North Koreans are going to be responsive," said Joel Wit, a former State Department negotiator on North Korea. "Without active U.S. participation on the security issues, it's not going to get very far."The administration official played down those fears, noting that in her meeting with Mr. Obama and in the news conference, Ms. Park declared that the "ultimate objective that all of us should be adopting is for North Korea to abandon its nuclear weapons."There were other modest tensions just beneath the surface, involving how far to allow South Korea to go in developing its own nuclear fuel cycle. That issue surrounded the renewal of a civilian nuclear accord with South Korea — a major issue in Seoul, because it prohibits the South from enriching or reprocessing its own nuclear fuel.That restriction is considered critical by the United States because it keeps the South from gaining the technology it would need to build its own nuclear weapon, something it tried to do decades ago, before the effort was detected and stopped by the Central Intelligence Agency.Before Ms. Park's arrival, the White House and the South Koreans agreed to extend the current accord, and the prohibition, for two years. But Mr. Obama remains concerned that if the United States permitted South Korea to produce nuclear fuel, it would be impossible to persuade North Korea to "denuclearize" the Korean Peninsula, under a two-decade-old agreement between North and South."We didn't want this to be a cliffhanger visit," said the senior official, when asked why the accord was extended while negotiations on a new one continued. "No one wanted to make a mad dash to an accord."
Dennis Rodman , the flamboyant former basketball player who has managed to engage with North Korea 's leader — something United States officials have been unable to do — said he planned to return to the North to try to gain the release of an imprisoned American citizen, according to a video posted Friday on the celebrity news Web site TMZ .Mr. Rodman, who went to Pyongyang in February along with three Harlem Globetrotters and a documentary film crew, told the interviewer that he planned to return to the North on Aug. 1. He did not elaborate on how he was gaining entry.The man he hopes to free, Kenneth Bae, is a Korean-American who was recently sentenced to 15 years of hard labor on charges of committing "hostile acts" against North Korea. Mr. Bae ran tours into the North, according to South Korean human rights activists, but on Friday, North Korea accused him of being a Christian missionary plotting to build a proselytizing base within the isolated country with an aim of toppling the government.The activists have described him as a devout Christian. North Korea, a Communist country, has traditionally considered Christian missionaries among its worst enemies.On Mr. Rodman's last visit, after a nuclear test by the North, the former star took in a basketball game with the North's leader, Kim Jong-un, and declared him a friend. Earlier this week, Mr. Rodman suggested on Twitter that he would try to capitalize on that relationship. "I'm calling on the Supreme Leader of North Korea or as I call him "Kim", to do me a solid and cut Kenneth Bae loose."
TOKYO — A political aide to the prime minister of Japan made a sudden, rare visit to North Korea on Tuesday. Japanese officials refused to say what he was doing there.Japan and North Korea do not have formal diplomatic ties. Talks between the two governments, which resumed last August after a four-year hiatus, were broken off again in December after North Korea tested a rocket.Kyodo News, a Japanese news agency, reported that the adviser, Isao Iijima, was met at the airport in Pyongyang, the capital, by a North Korean official identified as Kim Chol-ho, a vice director in the Foreign Ministry. Such a reception would suggest that Mr. Iijima, who is a senior adviser to Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, was there on official business.However, officials in Mr. Abe's office would not even confirm that Mr. Iijima had gone to Pyongyang, let alone give a reason.Both Kyodo and N.H.K., Japan's national television broadcaster, carried images from North Korean television showing Mr. Iijima arriving at the airport and being greeted by a group of North Koreans.Japan has taken a hard line against North Korea, largely because of public anger here over the abduction of at least a dozen Japanese citizens in the 1970s and 1980s; they were taken to North Korea to teach languages to spies. Mr. Abe rose to national prominence a decade ago by taking up the cause of the victims, five of whom were returned to Japan by North Korea in 2002.Mr. Iijima played a role in their return, visiting Pyongyang twice as an adviser to Junichiro Koizumi, the Japanese prime minister at the time. Mr. Koizumi secured their release when he met with the North Korean leader, Kim Jong-il, in Pyongyang in September 2002. Mr. Kim died and was succeeded by his son Kim Jong-un in 2011.Japanese news commentators speculated that Mr. Iijima might be seeking information on other Japanese citizens believed to be in the North, or might be preparing for Mr. Abe to follow Mr. Koizumi, his political benefactor, by making his own visit to Pyongyang.
SHANGHAI — North Korean forces have seized a Chinese fishing boat, Chinese officials told state-run news agency Xinhua late on Sunday, creating a potential new irritant in ties between the two allies.Chinese counselor to North Korea Jiang Yaxian said North Korea had "grabbed" the private vessel from the northern city of Dalian in waters between China and the Korean peninsula, according to the official news portal.Tensions have been mounting between North Korea and China, its most important economic and political backer. Some Chinese banks have frozen out North Korea's main foreign exchange bank amid frustration in Beijing over Pyongyang's nuclear weapons and ballistic missile programs.Ignoring international calls for restraint, North Korea fired a short-range missile from its east cost on Sunday, its fourth in two days, according to South Korea's Yonhap news agency.Other Chinese state media quoted the owner of the missing boat, Yu Xuejun, as saying North Korea was demanding 600,000 yuan ($97,600) for its safe return, along with its 16 crew.Yu told local media that the boat had been snatched on the evening of May 5 and he had approached Chinese authorities five days later to ask them to intervene."Upon receiving the call, the Chinese embassy promptly made representations to the Bureau of Consular Affairs of the DPRK (North Korean) Foreign Ministry, asking the DPRK side to release the boat and the fishermen as soon as possible," counselor Jiang told Xinhua."We will continue efforts to ensure that this issue is properly addressed at an early date."This is not the first time Chinese vessels have been forcibly taken by North Korea. A year ago, it held a number of boats and fishermen for two weeks before releasing them.
HONG KONG — China revealed on Sunday that North Korea seized a Chinese fishing boat this month and detained its crewmen, who remain in custody, an episode likely to worsen recent discord between the two.The vessel's owner, Yu Xuejun, called the Chinese Embassy in Pyongyang, the North Korean capital, on May 10 to seek help, the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs said in a brief statement issued through Sina Weibo, the country's Twitter-like microblog service. Mr. Yu was not on the boat when it was seized."The embassy immediately made representations to the consular affairs bureau of the North Korean Ministry of Foreign Affairs, asking that North Korea release the vessel and the crew as soon as possible, and ensure the safety of the lives and property of the detained crew, as well as their legitimate rights," the Chinese ministry statement said.The statement did not explain why the ministry waited so long to reveal the seizure, which came during a time of tensions with North Korea, a country that depends on Beijing for diplomatic and economic support.The announcement promptly drew an outcry from Chinese media and citizens online, some of whom have already expressed increasing impatience with North Korea over its nuclear ambitions and threats to the region.The Chinese media reports said the boat was seized on May 5, with 16 men onboard, and North Korean authorities demanded payment of 600,000 renminbi, equal to about $98,000, to release them and the vessel, apparently on the grounds that it was fishing in waters claimed by North Korea. The deadline for payment was Sunday, The Beijing Times newspaper said.China has long supported North Korea, despite disagreement over the North's nuclear activities, and many Chinese experts see the North as a strategic bulwark against potential regional domination by the United States and its allies, South Korea and Japan. But in recent months, undercurrents of discord have seeped into the two countries' relations.
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama believes firmly in freedom of the press and does not want journalists to be prosecuted for doing their jobs, the White House said on Tuesday, responding to criticism about his administration's investigations of leaks to reporters.The Department of Justice seized Associated Press phone records as part of a probe into leaks about a 2012 Yemen-based plot to bomb a U.S. airliner. And most recently, the Washington Post reported that Fox News correspondent James Rosen had been named a "co-conspirator" in a federal leaks probe involving his reporting on North Korea.White House spokesman Jay Carney said on Tuesday he could not comment on specific cases, but noted broadly that Obama believed in the need for balance between national security concerns and the ability of reporters to work freely."If you're asking me whether the president believes that journalists should be prosecuted for doing their jobs, the answer is no," he said.Carney is a former reporter for Time Magazine.Obama said last week he made "no apologies" for his concern about leaks to the media that could compromise U.S. national security or put American military and intelligence officers at risk.
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama believes journalists shouldn't be prosecuted for doing their jobs, the White House said Tuesday, showing solidarity with First Amendment advocates alarmed by a pair of high-profile federal probes into national security leaks.Although Obama believes leaking classified information violates the law, he also believes that a free press is critical — and that questions being raised about the proper balance between those two concerns are entirely appropriate, said White House spokesman Jay Carney."I can't comment on the specifics of any ongoing criminal matter," Carney said. "But if you're asking me whether the president believes that journalists should be prosecuted for doing their jobs, the answer is no."That was a departure from the day before, when Carney declined to answer a question about whether it's appropriate for a reporter who published classified information to be treated as a potential criminal. "I understand the question and I appreciate it, but I cannot comment," Carney said.Concerns about the Justice Department's efforts to unearth reporters' confidential sources in leak investigations have put the White House in a difficult position, unable to defend itself against claims that the administration is encroaching on press freedoms without commenting on pending investigations — a move the White House says would be wholly inappropriate. Making it tougher for Obama to weigh in is the fact that the Justice Department probes essentially amount to criminal investigations of officials within his own administration.Shortly after The Associated Press reported last week that prosecutors had secretly subpoenaed phone records for its reporters, the White House endorsed the idea of reviving media shield legislation in the Senate, a gesture designed to show it takes protections for journalists seriously even if it can't say whether its own Justice Department acted appropriately. But tensions over the issue were ratcheted up Monday after developments in another case revealed that an investigator had declared that a journalist who discloses leaked information is committing a crime.In that case, prosecutors got a search warrant for the private emails of Fox News reporter James Rosen and used State Department building security records to track his movements as they sought to identify his source in a story about North Korea. That case led to the indictment of an official for revealing classified information, but prosecutors declined to arrest or seek an indictment of Rosen.Fox News would not comment Tuesday on Carney's remarks, pointing instead to comments a day earlier from its executive vice president of news, Michael Clemente. He called the Rosen case "downright chilling" and vowed to "unequivocally defend his right to operate as a member of what up until now has always been a free press."The White House Correspondents' Association said Tuesday that taken together, the two cases raise serious questions about whether the government has gotten too aggressive in tracking and monitoring reporters."We stand in strong solidarity with our colleagues who have been scrutinized. And in terms of the administration, ultimately what will matter more in all of these cases is action not words," the association said in a statement released by its board members and its president, Fox News Channel correspondent Ed Henry.
SEOUL — North Korea sent one of its top military officials to Beijing on Wednesday as a "special envoy" of its leader Kim Jong-un, state news agency KCNA reported.There were few details of Choe Ryong-hae's visit, which came amid strained relations between China and North Korea after Beijing backed U.N. sanctions on Pyongyang for its February nuclear test.Choe is the most senior North Korean official to visit Beijing since Kim's uncle Jang Song-thaek made the trip in August 2012.Jang had been seeking a visit to China for Kim Jong-un and to bolster Chinese investment in the impoverished and isolated North. He appeared to return empty-handed, according to diplomatic sources.Choe is part of a powerful circle around the North's young leader that is headed by Jang. He is a long-time political administrator and was surprisingly made a vice marshal in the army last year despite having no military background.China, the North's only major diplomatic ally, publicly condemned the nuclear test and Bank of China recently said it had ceased dealings with the North Korean Foreign Trade Bank, an institution that has been identified as a conduit for Pyongyang's weapons program.
The White House on Monday defended President Obama's support for aggressive investigations into national security leaks despite new disclosures about a 2009 case in which the Justice Department searched a reporter's personal e-mails and attempted to track his movements.Details of the government's investigation of the reporter, James Rosen, the chief Washington correspondent for Fox News, emerged in a court affidavit obtained by The Washington Post. Without naming Mr. Rosen, the document describes the reporter as "at the very least, either as an aider, abettor and/or co-conspirator."The case involved a 2009 article by Mr. Rosen about North Korea that was published on FoxNews.com. Mr. Rosen reported that intelligence officials expected North Korea to respond to the passage of a United Nations Security Council resolution condemning its nuclear and ballistic missile tests by launching another missile. He quoted a source who described missile activity in North Korea, but Mr. Rosen said he was withholding some details "to avoid compromising sensitive overseas operations."The Justice Department subsequently investigated the leak and indicted a government adviser, Stephen Jin-Woo Kim. He has pleaded not guilty. The government used records tracking Mr. Rosen's use of his security badge at the State Department, apparently trying to establish his connection to Mr. Kim.Mr. Rosen was not charged with any crime. But the suggestion that he was a "co-conspirator" appalled many of his colleagues, some of whom rallied to his defense on Monday.Michael Clemente, the executive vice president of news at Fox News, said network officials were outraged to learn that Mr. Rosen "was named a criminal co-conspirator for simply doing his job as a reporter." Mr. Clemente called it "downright chilling" and added, "We will unequivocally defend his right to operate as a member of what up until now has always been a free press."The revelations may complicate what has been a contentious relationship between the Obama administration and Fox News, whose conservative talk show hosts are among Mr. Obama's most vocal critics. Mr. Rosen works on the news side of Fox, not the opinion side; he did not comment publicly on the affidavit's contents.The details about Mr. Rosen's case came just days after The Associated Press revealed that the government had seized two months of telephone records for some of its reporters in a similar leak investigation. Under intense questioning from reporters on Monday, Jay Carney, the White House press secretary, declined to comment on Mr. Rosen's case, but emphasized Mr. Obama's desire to investigate serious leaks of government information."The president believes, I think, as all of his predecessors believed, that it is imperative that leaks that can jeopardize the lives of American men and women serving overseas should not be tolerated," Mr. Carney said.He added that the president seeks balance when it comes to security and the right of reporters to pursue stories without fear of investigation.
BEIJING — European aid groups said their banks in Europe had stopped sending money to North Korea in the wake of U.S. sanctions on Pyongyang's main foreign exchange bank, leaving them scrambling for a solution short of hand-carrying cash into the impoverished country.Aid groups said if it became impossible to send enough money to operate, donors might withdraw support for their programs."This could eventually reduce our ability to carry out projects or even force a complete close down," Mathias Mogge, director of programs for German aid group Welthungerhilfe, told the Thomson Reuters Foundation."If all the agencies had to pull out, it would affect millions of people," said Mogge, who has just returned from the reclusive state.The biggest problem had been the Bank of China's recent decision to shut the account of the North's Foreign Trade Bank, EU officials and non-governmental organizations said. Money to North Korea was routed through China's biggest foreign exchange bank, they said.Chinese firms doing business in North Korea said they were also finding it difficult because Chinese banks were becoming increasingly reluctant to deal with their North Korean counterparts, whether it was the Foreign Trade Bank or other banks.Washington imposed sanctions on the Foreign Trade Bank in March after accusing it of helping fund Pyongyang's banned nuclear weapons program. The measures prohibit any transactions between U.S. entities or individuals and the bank.Experts have said Washington's move was designed to make international banks that do business in the United States think twice about dealing with North Korea, in much the same way banks have become wary about having ties with financial institutions in sanctions-hit Iran.All NGOs, U.N. agencies and embassies in Pyongyang have to use the Foreign Trade Bank, aid workers and other officials have said.One EU source said there were indications some European embassies in Pyongyang were having similar difficulties with transferring funds. A representative for U.N. agencies in Pyongyang did not have any immediate comment.U.S. officials have urged the European Union to put sanctions on the bank. EU diplomats have discussed the issue but are worried about the impact."We are concerned regarding possible unintended effects of certain sanctions such as the designation of the FTB, in particular with regard to humanitarian assistance, and we are looking into possible means to overcome the unintended effects," said a spokeswoman for EU foreign policy chief Catherine Ashton.One source familiar with the matter said a possibility being examined by EU officials was to issue a so-called "letter of comfort" which would explicitly say funding was for humanitarian and development use. The idea is this would provide cover for a bank to make a transaction, said the source, who declined to be identified because of the sensitivity of the issue.French NGO Triangle Generation Humanitaire said its French bank would no longer send funds for its operating expenses even though the EU had not yet imposed sanctions, said Anne Trehondart, desk officer in charge of Asia for the group."According to the sanctions, it's not forbidden. This makes plain that some banks are just reluctant to transfer money there," said Trehondart, declining to name the French bank.A representative from another European NGO, who asked not to be identified because of the sensitivity of the matter, said he had "little hope" that a recent money transfer would reach North Korea. He declined to name the group's European bank.The only alternative would be to send an expatriate employee on a "cash run" from China to North Korea - a limited option because Chinese customs only allow foreigners to take a few thousand dollars out of the country at a time, he said.Most of the limited number of flights to North Korea originate in China.Six European NGOs have offices in North Korea. American NGOs work in North Korea but none have a permanent office in the country. Aid groups in North Korea work to alleviate poverty and malnutrition as well as the impact of natural disasters.The Bank of China announced it was shutting the Foreign Trade Bank account earlier this month. It gave no reason for the move."So far all our bank accounts with North Korea have been channeled through the Bank of China. This option is closed now for us," said Simone Pott, a spokeswoman for Welthungerhilfe.Welthungerhilfe said routine transfers amounting to 300,000 euros ($386,300) had been blocked in recent weeks and attempts to use other international banks had also failed because of the U.S. sanctions.The Bank of China decision was the first significant step taken by a Chinese entity to curb dealings with North Korea following growing international pressure to punish Pyongyang over its banned nuclear and ballistic missile programs.Washington had raised the issue of the Foreign Trade Bank with China, although Beijing has not commented publicly on the matter. Japan has imposed sanctions on the bank and Australia is expected to follow suit.The latest U.N. sanctions on North Korea don't mention the bank, but say all countries should freeze or block any financial transaction or service that could assist Pyongyang's illicit activities.China has become increasingly frustrated with North Korea. It agreed to the new U.N. sanctions after Pyongyang conducted its third nuclear test in February.The U.S. Treasury Department has said it had no intention of hindering aid work in North Korea, although NGOs say this is precisely what is starting to happen."We will work through any concerns that arise related to purchases of humanitarian goods, but it is critically important that we isolate FTB for its facilitation of proliferation activities," a Treasury official said, repeating an earlier statement on the matter.Chinese companies involved in joint ventures in North Korea said Chinese banks had also become loathe to transfer funds to the country.China is North Korea's biggest trading partner, with annual trade worth around $6 billion. It is not clear how much trade between China and North Korea gets cleared through North Korean banks versus the use of cash and barter deals along their 1,400 km (875 mile) land border.A source at Shenyang-based Liaoning Wellhope Agri-Tech Co. Ltd, a mid-sized unlisted producer of livestock feed, said the company had been unable to send payments to North Korea, although its feed mill in the country continued to operate."We have stopped payments temporarily and are waiting for a solution," the source said.The source declined to name the North Korean bank the company used.A businessman in the Chinese border city of Dandong, which accounts for as much as 80 percent of China's trade with North Korea, said sanctions had made conditions worse.The unwillingness of Chinese banks to deal with North Korean banks was part of the problem, he said, as were stepped-up checks by Chinese customs on products headed across the border.Dandong Bank's main branch, which deals with foreign exchange, said it had stopped working with North Korea.Not much is known about the Foreign Trade Bank, whose assets and investments are a state secret."The tricky thing is that the Foreign Trade Bank is the clearinghouse for all foreign transactions, whether they're related to weapons or not, so there's a lot of legitimate business that goes through it," said Andray Abrahamian of the NGO Choson Exchange, which has trained officials from the bank."Sanctioning this bank is going to force more and more business underground." ($1 = 0.7766 euros)
WASHINGTON — A federal judge apologized Wednesday for an 18-month delay in unsealing documents in a case involving an alleged leak of classified information to a reporter.The documents include two warrants and related materials for the email accounts of Stephen Kim, a State Department adviser who faces charges of leaking secret information about North Korea to Fox News reporter James Rosen.The warrants and materials, which had originally been ordered unsealed in November 2011, will be unsealed this week. Royce Lamberth, the chief judge of the U.S. District Court in Washington, said that a "series of administrative errors by the court's staff" caused the delay.A third search warrant, along with an affidavit for some of Rosen's private emails, had also been ordered unsealed in November 2011, but those weren't unsealed until last week. Those materials showed that as part of the Kim investigation, the government tracked Rosen's comings and goings from the State Department, and an FBI agent said there was probable cause to believe the reporter broke the law. Rosen wasn't charged.There was also a delay in unsealing Lamberth's 2010 order that the government wasn't required to notify Rosen that his emails had been the subject of a warrant. Although that order was posted on the court's website, it was not available on the public docket until now."The clerk's office has been unable to explain why none of these errors were discovered as a result of our 'quality control' efforts to double-check docket entries and orders daily," Lamberth wrote in an opinion unsealing the records.The judge said the court will review performance of personnel involved as well as the court's administrative processes."The court apologizes to the public and the media for the administrative errors made by the court's staff in these matters," he wrote.
TOKYO — Japan's government is looking into re-opening official talks with North Korea to resolve questions over the abductions of Japanese citizens decades ago, raising concerns among allies who fear Tokyo's focus on that issue might weaken efforts to rein in Pyongyang's nuclear weapons program.Chief Cabinet spokesman Yoshihide Suga said Wednesday that high-level talks with the North are possible if they would lead to a breakthrough on the abductions. Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has indicated he is open to holding a summit with North Korean leader Kim Jong Un if such a breakthrough could be made.Abe dispatched a senior adviser to Pyongyang last week, catching Seoul and Washington off guard. Both said they were not given prior notice.Washington and North Korea's neighbors have been stepping up their pressure on Pyongyang since it conducted a rocket launch and its third nuclear test earlier this year.Though Tokyo is also deeply concerned by North Korea's development of nuclear weapons and long-range missiles, the abductions have long been at the top of its agenda and are the biggest obstacle to resuming official talks, which have been stalled since last November.But Glyn Davies, the U.S. special representative for North Korea policy, warned North Korea might be trying to use talks with Japan to drive a wedge between the policies of Tokyo, Washington and Seoul.Details of the Japanese envoy's talks in Pyongyang have not been disclosed, but Abe said this week that Japan must take the lead in resolving the abduction issue.After years of denying allegations that its agents kidnapped more than a dozen Japanese in the 1970s and '80s, North Korea made an about-face in 2002 and after a summit meeting in Pyongyang with then Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi allowed five of the abduction victims to return to Japan. It said the others were either dead or had not been abducted to begin with.Though at first seen in Japan as a major step forward, questions soon began to emerge over whether the North had really come clean. Japanese officials now say they believe there could be many more Japanese abductees still alive in the North. Japan is demanding further information and the prompt release of any living abductees.
BEIJING — A North Korean envoy told Chinese President Xi Jinping on Friday that North Korea is willing to take "positive actions" to safeguard peace and stability on the Korean peninsula, China's state media reported.Choe Ryong-hae, a "special envoy" of North Korea's leader Kim Jong-un, also said that North Korea was willing to make joint efforts to resolve problems through six-party talks and other forms of dialogue, the state-run China News Service said on its website.
BEIJING — A North Korean envoy told Chinese President Xi Jinping on Friday that North Korea is willing to take "positive actions" to safeguard peace and stability on the Korean peninsula, China's state media reported.Choe Ryong-hae, a "special envoy" of North Korea's leader Kim Jong-un, also said that North Korea was willing to make joint efforts to resolve problems through six-party talks and other forms of dialogue, the state-run China News Service said on its website.
WASHINGTON — President Obama ordered a review on Thursday of the Justice Department's procedures for legal investigations involving reporters, acknowledging that he was "troubled" that multiple inquiries into national security leaks could chill investigative reporting."Journalists should not be at legal risk for doing their jobs," Mr. Obama said in a wide-ranging address on counterterrorism policy. "Our focus must be on those who break the law."Mr. Obama said he raised the issue with Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr., who he said shared those concerns and would gather representatives from news media organizations as part of the review. Mr. Obama instructed Mr. Holder to report back to him by July 12.Among the issues likely to be discussed is how broadly the government should be allowed to subpoena telephone, e-mail or other records belonging to journalists who have reported on classified information.Asking Mr. Holder to lead the review, however, puts the attorney general in the awkward position of scrutinizing investigations that his department has pursued.Mr. Obama's remarks came amid deepening concern among many news organizations that the government is breaking new ground in how it investigates leaks of national security secrets. In a case involving The Associated Press, the government seized records of 20 office and home phone lines for A.P. reporters and editors.In a case involving a Fox News correspondent, James Rosen, prosecutors obtained a search warrant for Mr. Rosen's phone and e-mail records, after describing him as a possible "co-conspirator" for publishing information about a potential North Korean missile test.On Wednesday, NBC News reported that Mr. Holder had signed off on the search warrant. Officials at the Justice Department did not return a phone call requesting comment.Mr. Obama, in his speech, cast the leak investigations as an example of the challenge in balancing national security — particularly the safety of Americans working in dangerous places — with an open society. But he placed the legal onus squarely on those who leak classified information, not on the reporters."We must enforce consequences for those who break the law and breach their commitment to protect classified information," Mr. Obama said. "But a free press is also essential for our democracy. That's who we are. And I am troubled by the possibility that leak investigations may chill the investigative journalism that holds government accountable."It was a more ringing affirmation of press freedom than Mr. Obama's response when he was first asked about the A.P. case last week. He said then that he would not apologize for being "concerned about information that could compromise their missions or might get them killed," referring to Americans in hazardous posts.The president and chief executive of The A.P., Gary Pruitt, criticized the government's action as "unconstitutional" and said it had impeded the ability of A.P. reporters to do their jobs. The Justice Department, in a letter to Mr. Pruitt, defended its seizure, saying it had exhausted all alternatives before taking that step.Mr. Rosen's case has also drawn attention because of reports that the government monitored the phone line of his parents in Staten Island. On Wednesday, the United States attorney for the District of Columbia denied tapping the phones of Mr. Rosen or his parents.
WASHINGTON — The Justice Department said on Friday that senior officials including Attorney General Eric Holder vetted a decision to search an email account belonging to a Fox News reporter whose story on North Korea prompted a leak investigation.In a statement emailed to Reuters, the department said the search warrant for the reporter's email account followed all laws and policies and won the independent approval of a federal magistrate judge.The May 2010 search warrant for a Google email account belonging to James Rosen was revealed on Monday by The Washington Post and drew immediate concern from journalists because it describes Rosen as a suspected "co-conspirator" in the leak of secret government information.Fox News Chairman Roger Ailes said in a statement on Thursday that the Obama administration was attempting to intimidate Fox News and its employees.Rosen's alleged source, former State Department analyst Stephen Kim, is scheduled to go to trial as soon as next year on charges that he violated an anti-espionage law. Rosen was not charged.Prompted by the Rosen search and a separate seizure of Associated Press phone records, President Barack Obama said on Thursday that Holder would begin a new review of Justice Department procedures related to media records.The latest Justice Department statement said the highest levels of the department were involved in the search warrant used in Kim's case. The process included discussions Holder took part in, according to the statement.U.S. Magistrate Judge Alan Kay reviewed and issued the search warrant at the department's request.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — North Korea relaxed state control of salaries last month, a government economist said, outlining a change in policy intended to boost production by giving companies latitude to provide workers with financial incentives.In an interview with The Associated Press, Ri Ki Song, a professor at the Institute of Economics at North Korea's Academy of Social Sciences in Pyongyang, said enterprises are now allowed to use some of their earnings to pay workers more.Until recently, most salaries were set by the state. The new policy gives managers of factories and other businesses the right to determine workers' salaries if they are able to improve productivity. The change follows a similar move last year to give managers at North Korean farms more power to make management decisions and to allow farmers to keep any surplus harvest to sell or barter instead of turning them over to the state."After repaying the state for its investment, enterprises can set salaries themselves, regardless of salaries fixed by the state, and pay workers according to their performance," Ri said last week. Companies must also put aside funds for investment, continued production, development of technology and cultural activities, he said.But Ri said the new economic management methods enacted April 1 were not signs that North Korea is adopting a capitalist free market system."This is nothing to do with reform and opening," Ri said. "As I've said, the socialist ownership of the means of production is firmly established in our country, and we defend this."Foreign governments have looked for indications that North Korean leader Kim Jong Un might be open to reform since coming to power in December 2011. North Korea has a per capita GDP of $1,800 per year, according to the U.S. State Department, just a fraction of the living standards in its Northeast Asian neighbors, Japan and South Korea.Kim, the third generation of his family to lead North Korea since 1948, inherited a nation plagued by chronic food, fuel and power shortages. He has said improving the economy is a priority, acknowledging economic hardship in North Korea and pledging to raise the standard of living.Kim in a speech in January said the country's most important task is the "building of an economic giant" and called for all of the year's economic undertakings to be aimed "a radical increase in production and stabilizing and improving the people's living standards.""We should hold fast to the socialist economic system of our own style, steadily improve and perfect the methods of economic management on the principle of encouraging the working masses to fulfill their responsibility and role befitting the masters of production," Kim said.However, Kim also has made the costly building of a nuclear arsenal a priority at a time when the United Nations says two-thirds of the population is coping with chronic food shortages.The new policy on salaries went into effect after a trial period, Ri said."In the past, the state used to fix standard salaries, which meant you couldn't pay more than a certain amount," he said.Now, factories and enterprises that perform well will be allowed to raise salaries, Ri said."And individual workers who work more can earn more," he said.Last September, AP quoted farmers as saying new directives aimed at boosting productivity at collective farms give managers more control over decisions on how to farm the land and allow farmers to keep any surplus after they fulfill state-mandated quotas.By giving farmers incentives to grow more food, North Korea could be starting down the same path as China when it first began experimenting with a market-based economy, analysts said.
News Corporation said on Sunday that it had no record of being notified by the Justice Department nearly three years ago of a subpoena for the telephone records of a reporter at its Fox News cable channel.The company's chief legal counsel at the time also said that he had never seen material from the government related to the subpoena.The Justice Department has signaled that it notified News Corporation on Aug. 27, 2010, that it had seized the phone records of a Fox News reporter — who turned out to be the Washington correspondent James Rosen — after one of his articles had included details of a secret United States report on North Korea.The seizure was part of the department's case against Stephen Jin-Woo Kim, a State Department contractor investigated in connection with the North Korea leak. Mr. Kim has pleaded not guilty to leaking information and is awaiting trial. Fox News has denied that it knew about the subpoena, while Justice Department officials have said they sent notification 90 days after obtaining the records.A law enforcement official said on Sunday that in the investigation that led to the indictment of Mr. Kim, "the government issued subpoenas for toll records for five phone numbers associated with the media." This person, who spoke on the condition of anonymity, added, "Consistent with Department of Justice policies and procedures, the government provided notification of those subpoenas nearly three years ago by certified mail, facsimile and e-mail."A Fox News executive said the channel had never heard of the Justice Department investigation and had no knowledge of New Corporation ever being notified. A News Corporation spokesman said Sunday that the company was looking into the matter of notification. "While we don't take issue with the D.O.J.'s account that they sent a notice to News Corp., we do not have a record of ever having received it," Nathaniel Brown, the spokesman, said.Last week, The Washington Post obtained an affidavit that described Mr. Rosen (without naming him) as "at the very least, either as an aider, abettor and/or co-conspirator." The investigation relates to a 2009 article Mr. Rosen published on FoxNews.com that quoted a source describing missile activity in North Korea.In e-mail to employees on Thursday, Roger Ailes, chairman and chief executive of Fox News, rejected the validity of the investigation. "We will not allow a climate of press intimidation, unseen since the McCarthy era, to frighten any of us away from the truth," Mr. Ailes said.Lawrence A. Jacobs, who was News Corporation's chief legal officer until he left in June 2011, said he never saw a notification about the phone records."I would have remembered getting a fax from the Justice Department," Mr. Jacobs said in an interview Sunday. "These are not the kinds of things that happen every day."He added, "The first thing I would've done would be to call Roger Ailes."News Corporation said it had conducted a thorough search of its legal records, including, Mr. Jacobs said, a scan of his e-mails and other relevant materials, and has found nothing related to the investigation. "The inference that I sat on this and didn't share it with Roger couldn't be further from the truth," Mr. Jacobs said.The investigation into Mr. Rosen's phone records and personal e-mail became public only after The Associated Press said two weeks ago that the government had subpoenaed telephone records in a different leak investigation.Jay Carney, the White House press secretary, did not comment specifically on the Fox News investigation, but said last week at a news briefing that President Obama "believes, I think, as all of his predecessors believed, that it is imperative that leaks that can jeopardize the lives of American men and women serving overseas should not be tolerated."
The two Korean governments have been blaming each other for weeks for the closing of the Kaesong Industrial Zone. Their bickering is closely watched by analysts; whether they revive the factory park or decide to shut it down for good could set the tone for broader inter-Korean relations in coming years.If the South Korean factory owners return to Kaesong, "we are ready to hold any discussion on the normalization" of the zone, a spokesman for the North's Committee for the Peaceful Reunification of Korea said in a statement carried by the North's official Korean Central News Agency.If the South is worried about the safety of the business owners, he said, North Korea will allow them to be accompanied by officials from a semi-government agency that represents the South's interests in Kaesong.The Unification Ministry, the South Korean government agency in charge of relations with North Korea, dismissed the North Korean overture as another trick of "duplicity" aimed at generating friction between the South Korean factory owners and their government in Seoul."North Korea should realize that its attempt to split the public opinion in our society no longer works, and must stop it immediately," the South Korean ministry's main spokesman, Kim Hyung-suk, said in a statement.The eight-year-old Kaesong factory park had been the biggest and best known joint Korean economic project. More than 120 South Korean factories hired 53,000 North Korean workers there before the project fell victim to a recent escalation of tensions on the Korean Peninsula following the North's nuclear test in February.North Korea pulled out all its workers from the complex in early April, as it was ratcheting up tensions in the region and issuing threats against the United States. South Korea later withdrew all its factory managers.The North appears to be using more restraint in recent weeks, and South Korea has made several offers for official dialogue aimed at letting South Korean factory owners bring out finished products from Kaesong and to discuss the future of the complex.But North Korea has rejected such offers, calling them a "cunning trick" meant to find a pretext to shut the place down for good. Instead, it has reached out to factory workers directly through fax messages, in which it blames the South Korean government for the closure of the industrial zone.Factory owners, who wanted to resume operations at Kaesong, called on both governments not to let their politics interfere in the joint economic project.The government of President Park Geun-hye of South Korea said it wanted to revive the factory complex. But it remained firm that it would not reopen it "as if nothing had happened," and it has sought a guarantee from the North that it will never again use the economic complex as a political tool.
Offended by criticism that Dennis Rodman's basketball diplomacy was a marketing gimmick for their season finale on North Korea, the creators of "Vice," a new HBO newsmagazine with a penchant for daredevilish themes, said Wednesday that Mr. Rodman had improved the program but was not even their first choice.At a preview screening of the finale, the creators said they would have preferred to have recruited another former N.B.A. star, Michael Jordan, whose autograph adorns a basketball presented to Kim Jong-il, the father of North Korea's current leader, Kim Jong-un, by Secretary of State Madeleine K. Albright during her visit to North Korea in 2000 — when relations were comparatively warmer than they are now."Jordan wasn't interested," said Shane Smith, the founder and chief executive of the Vice Media Group, the HBO partner that conceived the North Korea trip and helped persuade the authorities there to permit it.However, Mr. Smith said, Mr. Rodman's ready acceptance of the idea turned out to be a blessing. "It fit right into our wheelhouse, because it's absurd," Mr. Smith said.Mr. Rodman, who played with Mr. Jordan on the Chicago Bulls but is perhaps known more for his lip jewelry and dyed hair, became the first American to meet with Kim Jong-un, who took over after his father died in 2011. Mr. Rodman's visit in late February and early March became a bit of an international sensation and a new source of talk-show jokes. The "Vice" finale will be broadcast on June 14.The Kim family, which has ruled North Korea for more than six decades and considers the United States its No. 1 enemy, has a well-known love of American basketball, in particular an obsession with Mr. Jordan.Mr. Rodman's agent, Darren Prince, said in an e-mail that Vice and HBO had asked Mr. Rodman to participate because the younger Mr. Kim had been photographed wearing a Rodman jersey years ago when he was a student in Switzerland, and "it showed them what a big fan he was."The absurdity theme is integrated into the finale, which follows Mr. Rodman and three members of the Harlem Globetrotters, Alexander Weekes, Anthony Blakes and William Bullard, as they meet with North Korean officials, students and children, sometimes wowing them with basketball tricks.Their visit came as North Korea was celebrating the successful test explosion of a nuclear device under Mr. Kim, who threatened to make nuclear war on the United States even as he was embracing Mr. Rodman as a friend.Mr. Kim attended an exhibition basketball game with Mr. Rodman and feted all of the American visitors to an alcohol-infused banquet, where an all-girl North Korean band played the theme to "Rocky" and Mr. Rodman crooned an impromptu "My Way."The visitors also toured a supermarket, stocked with Coca-Cola and fresh fruit, where they were the only patrons, and observed college students at computers that showed the Google home page, though no one was using its search function."I felt like we were walking through a real-live 'Truman Show,' " said Ryan Duffy, the Vice correspondent who narrates the finale.
HAMHUNG, North Korea — North Korean farmers knee deep in muddy paddies across the country have a new incentive during this year's crucial rice planting season: possible bonuses that are part of an economic shift echoing ally China's steps three decades ago toward embracing capitalism.Details about the changes are emerging nearly two months after the regime unveiled dual goals of building the economy and nuclear weapons in the first concrete economic policy laid out by leader Kim Jong Un since he took power in December 2011.Farmers say they have begun working under the new policies, which are designed to boost production by giving managers and workers financial incentives. Foreign analysts say the moves to spur North Korea's moribund economy suggest Pyongyang is taking cues from Beijing on how to incorporate free market ideas within its rigid socialist system.The North's policy enshrining its provocative push to build atomic weapons as a national goal has complicated efforts to force North Korea to abandon its nuclear program and dominated international discussion about the country. Pyongyang's economic priorities have drawn far less attention but some experts think important reforms could be unfolding.Impoverished North Korea suffers chronic food and power shortages and has not released economic data for decades. South Korea's central bank estimates the North's gross national income, an indicator of the average standard of living, was $1,250 per person in 2011 compared with $23,400 in South Korea.In the past, the North Korean state set workers' salaries. Under new measures announced April 1, the managers of farms, factories and other enterprises have been given leeway to set salaries and offer raises to workers who help drive up production."This is definitely significant," said John Delury, an assistant professor of Chinese studies at Yonsei University in Seoul, South Korea.Providing material incentives and loosening central control over economic decision making are two key elements in the transition from a command economy to a market-based system, he said.Also announced April 1: the reappointment of Pak Pong Ju as premier after his dismissal from the post in 2007. Pak was central to attempts at economic change more than a decade ago."You just wouldn't bring back Pak Pong Ju unless you were going to try readjusting economy policy. There would be no reason to do that," said Delury, calling it a strong sign of Kim Jong Un's interest in lifting living standards.North Korea's policy changes find an echo in China's market reforms that have transformed it into a manufacturing powerhouse and the world's second-largest economy while also lifting several hundred million out of grinding poverty.Beijing dismantled its centrally planned economy slowly. In the 1970s, it began allowing farmers to keep more of their harvests, giving them an incentive to grow more to sell on newly permitted free markets. Food production soared.In the mid-'80s, the government gave state enterprises the authority to link bonuses and salaries to better performance. Those changes were mostly aimed at managers, but they cracked a communist-era preference for egalitarianism.New rules in the early 1990s gave state enterprises full flexibility to set wages, widening the use of performance incentives. In that decade, China truly broke away from its centralized "iron rice bowl" system of guaranteed employment and state-set incomes.Delury and others cautioned that if North Korea is intent on economic reform, it is likely to be a fitful process."We have to be careful not to say: Aha, it's all change, it's finally here," he said. "The point is, and we see this from the Chinese case, this is a process that unfolds over time and there are starts and stops, too. But this is a strong signal of a push."The Associated Press reported last September that farmers were notified of upcoming management changes at collective farms that would put decision-making and responsibility for crops in the hands of local officials and give farmers the right to hold onto surpluses."Last year, we studied reasonable economic management methods in different fields of economic work, and introduced it to some units on a trial basis," Ri Ki Song, an economist from North Korea's Academy of Social Sciences, told AP this week.North Korea formally announced the policy, and its expansion to include factories and other enterprises, a day after holding a plenary session of the Central Committee of the Workers' Party. Rodong Sinmun, the party newspaper, called it part of a "new strategic line."Ri, however, dismissed characterizations of the changes as reform.What's new, he said, is allowing managers to dole out goods and cash as incentives. In addition, after paying back investments provided by the state, managers can set their employees' salaries and offer raises to those who help drive up production, he said.The main goal: to encourage "greater profits" and solve North Korea's chronic food shortage, Ri said.He said North Koreans work hard, but the new incentives give them motivation to work even harder. "They are saying that higher salaries and shares will improve their life."Political and military expert Ralph Cossa, president of the Pacific Forum CSIS in Hawaii, noted that North Korea has rolled back past attempts at economic reform."The North Koreans have played reform games before and then just sort of pulled the rug out from under it," he said. Cossa cited international aid groups as saying the military is pressuring farmers to donate their portion to the army.Last year, a farmer's wife in Sariwon, south of Pyongyang, told the AP she planned to donate any surplus harvest to the state as a token of her patriotism.At the Tongbong farm in the eastern city of Hamhung, farmers are in the midst of a busy rice planting season after a long, cold winter.This year, things are being managed differently, said Kim Jong Jin, deputy chairman of the farm's managing committee.He said the state provided the farm with the rice seedlings, which farmers are now transplanting to paddies by hand. Farmers are on smaller teams that have direct responsibility over their plots.After the rice is harvested, farmers must "repay" the state for the seeds. At Tongbong that means giving the state about 193 kilograms of rice as payback for every 140 kilograms of seedlings they received.But any surplus can be kept by the team to sell, barter or distribute — a change from past policies that required farmers to turn all harvests over to the state."This encourages enthusiasm for production and we get more of what's produced," Kim said.Associated Press writers Jean H. Lee, Foster Klug and Sam Kim in Seoul, South Korea; Kwang Hyon Kim in Pyongyang, North Korea; Charles Hutzler in Beijing; and Margie Mason in Jakarta, Indonesia, contributed to this report.
CHANGBAI, China — Chinese renminbi and U.S. dollars are being used more widely than ever in North Korea instead of the country's own money, a stark illustration of the extent to which the North Korean leadership under Kim Jong-un has lost control of the country's economy.The use of dollars and renminbi has accelerated since a disastrous revaluation of the North Korean currency, the won, in 2009 wiped out the savings of millions, according to experts on the country, defectors and Chinese border traders.On the black market, the won has shed more than 99 percent of its value against the dollar since the revaluation, according to exchange rates tracked by Daily NK, a Seoul-based news and information Web site focused on North Korea.North Korea is one of the most closed countries in the world, so it is difficult to determine what effect this could ultimately have on Mr. Kim's regime.But experts say the growing use of foreign currency is making it increasingly difficult for Pyongyang to implement economic policy, resulting in the creation of a private economy outside the reach of the state, which may be able to rein it in only with draconian measures.For now, Pyongyang appears to be capitulating, rather than trying to stamp out foreign currency use, they said.Estimates of how much hard foreign currency is in circulation vary, but an analyst at the Samsung Economic Research Institute in Seoul put the total value at $2 billion in an April study. By comparison, some estimates say North Korea's gross domestic product is $21.5 billion. Pyongyang does not publish economic data.The use of dollars and renminbi is so pervasive that there is little Pyongyang can do about it, said Marcus Noland, a North Korea expert at the Peterson Institute for International Economics in Washington. The government will increasingly have to force people to provide goods and services to the state and accept payment in won, added Mr. Noland, who studies the North Korean economy."It's been a tug of war for 20 years, where the state would like to get control of the economy, to quash the market and to get everyone to use the North Korean won, but it just doesn't have the capacity to do any of those things," he said. "It just makes it harder and harder for them to govern. Nobody wants what they're selling."In the Chinese town of Changbai in Jilin Province, just across the border from the North Korean city of Hyesan, one Chinese trader said North Korean officials he dealt with wanted renminbi more than anything else, even food.The Chinese currency they earn from doing business quickly gets circulated into Hyesan, a city of about 190,000 people whose industry-based economy has slumped since the 1990s.The trader, who sells products including medicine and tea in Changbai, declined to be identified because he did not want to jeopardize his business or endanger his North Korean partners.In April, Daily NK posted video that it said had been shot secretly in February at an open-air market in Hyesan. The shaky footage showed vendors openly quoting prices in renminbi for products like gloves and jackets, and one accepting payment in the currency.Pyongyang has waged periodic campaigns to try to stop the use of foreign currencies, but with no success.North Korea made circulating foreign currency a crime punishable by death in September 2012, the Paris-based International Federation for Human Rights said in a report last month.Another group, Human Rights Watch, recently interviewed more than 90 defectors who had fled North Korea in the past two years about the punishments they had received for economic crimes. None said they had been penalized for using or holding hard currency.Nevertheless, ordinary North Koreans are very careful."I have heard multiple stories of people hiding foreign money under the floorboards in the house, or burying it up the hill in the woods out back," said one person in northeastern China who has lived in Pyongyang and regularly interacts with North Koreans. "Nobody puts it in the bank because nobody trusts the government."Faith in the North Korean won crumbled when Mr. Kim's father, Kim Jong-il, ordered the sudden revaluation of the currency in November 2009.
WASHINGTON — The Justice Department on Monday formally told House Republicans that Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr.'s testimony before a Congressional committee last month was "accurate and consistent" with the facts.The answers provided by one of the department's top deputies are likely to do little, however, to resolve the dispute over whether Mr. Holder misled Congress by denying that the Justice Department had considered prosecuting journalists under the Espionage Act.In testimony on May 15, Mr. Holder dismissed the notion that reporters writing about national security secrets should be indicted under the Espionage Act, saying: "With regard to the potential prosecution of the press for the disclosure of material, that is not something that I've ever been involved in, heard of or would think would be a wise policy."But since then the department confirmed that Mr. Holder had approved a request for a search warrant in 2010 for the private correspondence of James Rosen, a Fox News reporter who disclosed a North Korean nuclear test that had not been made public.An affidavit filed in the investigation seeking Mr. Rosen's e-mails said there was probable cause to believe Mr. Rosen had violated the Espionage Act, arguing that he qualified for an exception to a law that generally bars search warrants for reporters' work unless the reporter is suspected of committing a crime.The Justice Department letter, signed by Peter J. Kadzik, principal deputy assistant attorney general, noted that while a grand jury did charge a government employee with the unauthorized disclosure of classified information, Mr. Rosen has not been charged with anything. "At no time during the pendency of this matter — before or after seeking the search warrant — have prosecutors sought approval to bring criminal charges against the reporter," Mr. Kadzik wrote.
WASHINGTON — U.S. Attorney General Eric Holder said on Wednesday he has no plans to leave his job despite a stormy tenure marked most recently by a cascade of criticism about how his Justice Department handles leak probes.The top U.S. law enforcement official told NBC News in a televised interview that there are still things he wants to accomplish before he eventually steps down."There's some things that I want to do, some things I want to get done that I've discussed with the president, and once I have finished that I'll sit down with him and we'll determine when it's time to make a transition to a new attorney general," Holder said.President Barack Obama appointed Holder as attorney general in early 2009 and kept him on for the start of Obama's second, four-year term this year.Calls for Holder to resign grew after revelations that the FBI in a search warrant called a Fox News reporter a possible criminal co-conspirator in a leak of secret information about North Korea. The Justice Department also seized without notice phone records of Fox News and the Associated Press.Holder is among the longest-serving U.S. attorneys general in history, ranking ninth out of 82 according to a tally by a University of Minnesota researcher.He has said that he wants to continue the Justice Department's efforts in civil rights before he leaves.
The conservative pundit Glenn Beck took the lectern at a conference center on Manhattan's East Side last Thursday to accept the Freedom of Speech Award for his commentary on TheBlaze television network and his syndicated radio show.The annual seminar hosted by the trade magazine Talkers is intended to discuss the leading issues affecting talk radio, from advertising to how to break through in a crowded field. But this year, the more than 55 speakers had a particular topic they wanted to discuss: the recent Justice Department investigation into media leaks."They're doing some scary things in our country right now," Mr. Beck told the crowd. "They were started by Republicans and they're being furthered by the Democrats."The press — often the target of allegations of liberal bias by conservative media — has found an unlikely ally in right-leaning radio and television hosts who have taken to defending the First Amendment with a fire-and-brimstone zeal. (To drive home his point that anything goes when it comes to free speech, Mr. Beck waved the Koran and a napkin said to be stained with Hitler's blood.)The First Amendment has always been a hot-button issue for talk radio, but conservative hosts in particular have focused on freedom of the press after revelations last month that the Justice Department had seized the phone and e-mail records of a Fox News reporter, the Washington correspondent James Rosen, who had included details about a secret United States report on North Korea in a 2009 article published on FoxNews.com.The Washington Post obtained an affidavit that described Mr. Rosen (without naming him) as "at the very least, either as an aider, abettor and/or co-conspirator."The investigation into Fox News became public only after The Associated Press said on May 13 that the government had subpoenaed its telephone records in an unrelated leak investigation. Fox News has said it had no knowledge of the Justice Department's 2010 subpoena for Mr. Rosen's telephone records.The debate over the government's approach to leaks widened on Sunday when The Guardian revealed the identity of Edward Snowden, a contractor for the National Security Agency and the source of disclosures about the government's widespread collection of private Internet and telephone data. On Sunday evening Fox News pundits debated whether the Obama administration had overreached in the use of secret surveillance techniques.There was little debate, however, when it came to Mr. Rosen."This is Big Brother," Sean Hannity said during his "Hannity" program on Fox News shortly after the details about the investigation into Mr. Rosen became public. "Rosen is doing what reporters are supposed to do," added Mr. Hannity, who also hosts the syndicated talk radio program "The Sean Hannity Show."In a memo to employees last month, Roger Ailes, president and chief executive of Fox News, said, "We will not allow a climate of press intimidation, unseen since the McCarthy era, to frighten any of us away from the truth."Critics and supporters have noticed the emergence of Fox News, known for its battle cries of liberal bias in other news outlets, as one of the most vocal defenders of those news outlets' rights."I love the juxtaposition of the media being defended by the people they don't typically like, which is conservatives," said Seton Motley, president of Less Government, an organization devoted to diminishing the role of the federal government.Michael Smerconish, an independent who hosts a talk radio program on Sirius XM and contributes to MSNBC, said conservatives' outrage over the Obama administration's leak investigations has everything to do with politics."Given a choice of who gets thrown under the bus — Obama or the liberal media — Obama is first on the list," Mr. Smerconish said. He added, "The liberal media would be a close second."
(Reuters) - U.S. prosecutors are increasingly seizing on an anti-espionage law to pursue Americans suspected of divulging government secrets to the press, a major shift in the use of a 1917 law that was designed to stop leaks to America's enemies.Nine times in U.S. history, all of them since 1971, federal prosecutors have brought charges under the Espionage Act for disclosing information to a newspaper, blog, book or other media outlet. Six cases occurred in the last eight years.Former National Security Agency contractor Edward Snowden faces the same threat after admitting to leaking secret U.S. surveillance documents to Britain's Guardian newspaper and the Washington Post.Here are the previous nine cases.Daniel Ellsberg became the first case in 1971, when prosecutors accused the national security analyst and his colleague Anthony Russo of providing what would become known as the Pentagon Papers to the New York Times and other media outlets. The secret documents revealed the extent of U.S. involvement in Vietnam. Charges against the two men were dismissed when a judge found that the government had wiretapped Ellsberg, possibly illegally.Samuel Morison, a former U.S. Navy intelligence analyst, was charged in 1984 with illegally passing secret photographs of Soviet ships to a magazine, Jane's Defense Weekly. He pleaded not guilty, but a jury convicted him, making him the first person convicted under the Espionage Act for divulging secrets to the press. He was sentenced to two years in prison but paroled. President Bill Clinton pardoned him.Lawrence Franklin, a Defense Department employee, was charged in 2005 with passing classified information about Iran to two pro-Israel lobbyists, Steven Rosen and Keith Weissman. Franklin pleaded guilty and received a 12-year sentence. Eventually, after the government's case against Rosen and Weissman collapsed, a judge reduced Franklin's sentence to 10 months in a halfway house.Shamai Leibowitz was an FBI translator when material that he heard while translating ended up on a blog. He reached an agreement with prosecutors before he was charged, and pleaded guilty in 2009 to one count of disclosing classified information. He was sentenced to 20 months in prison.Former NSA official Thomas Drake was suspected in 2010 of revealing information about the agency's warrantless wiretapping program. He was indicted under the Espionage Act but said the only information he leaked was about waste in a NSA program, which he gave to the Baltimore Sun. The 10 felony counts were dropped when he pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor and received no prison time.Bradley Manning, an Army private first class, is on trial in a Maryland military court, accused of passing more than 700,000 classified files to WikiLeaks in the biggest leak of secret documents in U.S. history. Manning, who pleaded guilty to 10 lesser charges in February, faces 21 additional counts including aiding the enemy and could get life in prison if convicted. The trial is expected to last through the summer.Stephen Kim, a U.S. State Department contract analyst, divulged to a Fox News reporter what U.S. intelligence believed about how North Korea would respond to new sanctions. A grand jury indicted him in 2010 for disclosing defense information and making false statements, based in part on Fox News records the government seized without notice. He has pleaded not guilty and a trial date is possible in late 2013 or early 2014.Former CIA officer Jeffrey Sterling was charged in 2011 with illegally disclosing classified information about Iran to James Risen, a New York Times reporter, for his book "State of War." The case remains pending, as the government has tried unsuccessfully to force Risen to testify about his sources.Former CIA officer John Kiriakou was charged in 2012 with divulging to journalists secret information about the CIA's interrogation program, including the identity of a covert officer. In an agreement with prosecutors, he pleaded guilty to one count and was sentenced to two and a half years in prison. He started serving the sentence in February.
(Reuters) - The Harlem Globetrotters - the highflying exhibition basketball team that has toured the world for decades - are on the block.The Globetrotters, known for their trick shots, slick passing and comedy routines, are being sold by their private equity owner, Shamrock Capital Advisors, according to four sources familiar with the process.The team, which has been held since 2005 by Los Angeles-based Shamrock, is being shopped by Piper Jaffray, the sources said. The process is in the second round, two of the sources said, with the team likely fetching between $50 million to $100 million.Founded in 1926, the Globetrotters have played more than 25,000 games around the world, very rarely losing to their long-time opponent, the hapless Washington Generals.Past legends who played on the team include Wilt Chamberlain and Meadowlark Lemon, known by many as the "clown prince of basketball." The team was the subject of a Saturday morning cartoon in the 1970s and later washed up on the shore of "Gilligan's Island."The group also gained attention in March after visiting North Korea alongside Dennis Rodman.Neither a spokeswoman for Shamrock nor a partner at the firm could be reached for comment. Piper Jaffray could not be reached for comment.Initially founded as the family investment company of Roy Disney, Shamrock owns 80 percent of the Globetrotters, which it purchased from former player and Honeywell executive Mannie Jackson.
SEOUL — North Korea on Sunday offered high-level talks with the United States to ease tensions on the Korean peninsula, only days after it canceled planned official talks with South Korea for the first time in over two years.Planned high-level talks between North and South Korea were scrapped last week after the North abruptly called off the talks. The North blamed the South for scuttling discussions that sought to mend estranged ties between the rival Koreas.North Korea National Defence Commission in a statement carried by KCNA news agency on Sunday said Washington can pick a date and place for talks and the two sides can discuss a range of issues, but no preconditions should be attached."In order to ease tensions on the Korean peninsula and to achieve regional peace and safety, we propose to hold high-level talks between the DPRK and the United States, " said the spokesman for the North's National Defence Commission in the statement. North Korea's official name is the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK)."If the U.S. is truly interested in securing regional peace and safety and easing tensions, it should not mention of preconditions for the talks," the statement said.Earlier this year, North Korea threatened nuclear and missile strikes against South Korea and the United States after it was hit with U.N. sanctions for its February nuclear weapons test.In the statement, Pyongyang reiterated it was willing to discuss disarmament but the world should also be denuclearized including its southern neighbor. It added it wants the United States to sign a formal peace treaty formally ending the 1950-53 Korean War that divided the two Koreas.Korea was divided after the Second World War and when the Korean War ended in an armistice rather than a permanent peace treaty, leaving the two countries technically at war.North Korea agreed a denuclearization-for-aid deal in 2005 but later backed out of that accord. It has said its nuclear arms are a "treasured sword" that it will not abandon.North Korea's one major diplomatic ally, China, has urged Pyongyang to abandon its nuclear weapons program and return to talks.The North has a long record of making threats to secure concessions from the United States and South Korea.North Korea's 30-year-old leader, Kim Jong-un, took power in December 2011 and has since carried out two long-range rocket launches and a nuclear weapons test, as well as a campaign of threats against South Korea and the United States.Threats have waned in the past month, showing signs of easing tensions such as proposing talks with South Korea in early June. The talks had been intended to discuss issues resuming operations of joint commercial projects and families split during the 1950-53 Korean War.
WASHINGTON — The White House said on Sunday that the United States is open to talks with North Korea, but said Pyongyang must comply with UN Security Council resolutions and ultimately agree to denuclearization."We have always favored dialogue and, in fact, have open lines of communication with the DPRK," said Caitlin Hayden, spokeswoman for the National Security Council.North Korea on Sunday proposed high-level talks with the United States to ease tensions on the Korean peninsula, a week after it scrapped the first official talks with South Korea in over two years.
WASHINGTON — The State Department says it sees nothing new in North Korea's offer of high-level talks with the U.S.Spokeswoman Jen Psaki said Monday that Pyongyang has made similar offers numerous times over the years. She said Washington would be open to dialogue but it wants North Korea first to take credible steps toward giving up its nuclear weapons.After months of threatening to wage war, North Korea did an about-face Sunday, offering unconditional talks. The invitation to Washington came from North Korea's National Defense Commission, the powerful governing body led by leader Kim Jong Un.Psaki said the international community has been very consistent and clear that North Korea must verifiably end its nuclear program.
WASHINGTON — The White House says President Barack Obama and South Korea's President Park Geun-hye (goon-hay) have discussed North Korea's proposal for high-level talks with the U.S.The two leaders spoke by phone Sunday evening ahead of Obama's trip to Northern Ireland for G-8 meetings. The White House says they discussed security issues and agreed to coordinate closely on efforts to achieve a nuclear-free North Korea.The call comes after North Korea issued a surprise proposal Sunday to hold nuclear and security talks without preconditions, reversing course after months of rising tensions and anti-American rhetoric by Pyongyang. The U.S. says it's receptive but wants credible negotiations that include the North's nuclear program.The White House says Obama and Park also discussed Obama's recent summit with Chinese President Xi Jinping (shee jihn-peeng).
UNITED NATIONS — North Korea's U.N. envoy demanded the dissolution of the United Nations Command in South Korea on Friday, accusing the United States of using the force to prepare for war against the North and build an Asian version of NATO to realize President Barack Obama's pivot to Asia.Ambassador Sin Son Ho told reporters at a rare news conference that the most pressing issue in northeast Asia today is the hostile relations between North Korea and the United States "which can lead to a new war at any moment."He reiterated North Korea's surprise offer last Saturday of wide-ranging senior-level talks with the United States "to defuse tension on the Korean peninsula and ensure peace and security in the region."The proposed talks followed months of rising tensions and anti-American rhetoric by North Korea and the collapse earlier this month of proposed high-level talks between North and South Korea, amid bickering over who would lead the two delegations.Sin stressed that the deteriorating situation on the Korean peninsula "is not caused by the DPRK," the initials of the country's official name, the Democratic People's Republic of Korea."All deteriorations and intensified situations (are) entirely caused by the United States of America," he insisted on several occasions.Sin said U.S.-North Korea talks should include replacing the armistice agreement that ended the 1950-53 Korean War — and he stressed that one of the "prerequisite requirements" for establishing "a peace mechanism" to replace the armistice is the dissolution of the U.S.-led U.N. Command.The ambassador said the talks can include "a world without nuclear weapons," which the United States has already proposed.But he warned that North Korea will not give up its nuclear "self-defense deterrent" unless the United States "fundamentally and irreversibly abandons its hostile policy and nuclear threat" toward the North and dissolves the U.N. Command, which oversees the armistice, and as long as there are nuclear weapons on the Korean peninsula.The U.S. State Department said: "The United States remains committed to authentic and credible talks on denuclearization" in order to implement a Sept. 19, 2005 joint statement in which the DPRK made a commitment to abandon all nuclear weapons and existing nuclear programs, and to bring North Korea into compliance with U.N. Security Council resolutions "through irreversible steps leading to denuclearization."The Korean War ended in a truce, not a peace treaty, and left the Korean peninsula divided by a heavily fortified border monitored by the U.N. Command. Washington also stations 28,500 American troops in South Korea to protect its ally against North Korean aggression.A U.N. Security Council resolution adopted two days after North Korean troops invaded South Korea on June 25, 1950, recommended that U.N. member states provide military forces and other assistance "to a unified command under the United States of America" to assist the South.At peak strength, when the armistice was signed in July 1953, the command had over 930,000 troops from 17 countries, including more than 590,000 South Koreans and 302,000 Americans. Since then, the command has overseen the armistice.In 1994, then U.N. secretary-general Boutros Boutros-Ghali distanced the United Nations from the U.N. Command saying in a letter to North Korea's foreign minister that the Security Council didn't establish it "but merely recommended the creation of such a command, specifying that it be under the authority of the United States.""Therefore the dissolution of the unified command does not fall within the responsibility of any United Nations organ but is a matter within the competence of the Government of the United States," Boutros-Ghali was quoted as saying.In a lengthy statement, Sin claimed the U.N. Command "was a tool of war for aggression which was organized by the U.S." and "has nothing to do with the U.N.""The U.N. Command is the U.S. command in essence," he said, and if necessary the DPRK will submit the issue to the U.N. General Assembly to dissolve it.Sin said all the facts show that the U.S. is gradually transforming the U.N. Command into a multinational military alliance "which would serve as a matrix of the Asian version of NATO" and "a stepping stone for the U.S. armed forces for aggression toward the DPRK and the realization of ... America's pivot to Asia strategy."The U.S. aim, he said, is to make South Korea "a forward base for domination of (the) Asia Pacific region and hold fast to it as a cannon fodder for an aggressive war."As a result, he said, "the situation on the Korean peninsula this year has reached to the full-scale nuclear showdown and to the brink of war between the DPRK and the U.S."Sin's appearance before U.N. journalists was his first since June 15, 2010 when he vehemently denied any North Korean involvement in the sinking of a South Korean navy ship in March 2010 and demanded that military investigators from the North be allowed to go to the site to verify the results of a South Korean probe. It concluded the ship was sunk by a torpedo launched by a North Korean midget submarine.The ambassador also answered questions on a number of other issues Friday, saying "we don't have any human rights problems in our country," that recent North Korean talks with China were "very friendly," and that the U.S. should "stop economic sanctions against us."Associated Press Writer Maria Sanminiatelli contributed to this report from the United Nations
KAESONG, North Korea — The remains of a fortress that once surrounded Kaesong, the ancient capital of Korea's Koryo Dynasty, are among sites in North Korea that made it onto UNESCO's World Heritage list on Sunday.North Korea's bid to have the sites added to the list was approved at a UNESCO meeting in Phnom Penh, Cambodia.Kaesong, located just north of the border with South Korea, was the capital of the kingdom that ruled Korea from 918 to 1392. It's also where the two Koreas ran a joint factory park until tensions forced its closure this spring.Twelve sites added include the ruins of the Manwoldae palace; a 1,000-year-old academy that was the top school during that era; relics housed at a museum at the school; and the mausoleum of King Kongmin."These valuable cultural relics are the pride of our nation, and they are precious cultural relics that show the long history of our nation," Kim Jin Sok, a researcher at Kaesong City Management Office for Preserving National Heritage, told The Associated Press. "Also, these relics, some preserved for very long periods, are well known as relics with which we can stand proud in the eyes of the world."A North Korean complex of ancient tombs from a previous kingdom won heritage status in 2004.
WASHINGTON — Satellite photos show signs of new tunnel work at North Korea's underground nuclear test site, a U.S. research institute said Tuesday.The U.S.-Korea Institute at Johns Hopkins School of Advanced International Studies said in an analysis that it does not appear to indicate another underground blast is imminent at the Punggye-ri site in the country's northeast.But it suggests North Korea has continued to work on its nuclear weapons program despite a recent easing of the tensions that followed its atomic test in February.The commercial imagery shows gray spoil, apparently of rock dug from inside the mountain site, dumped near a tunnel entrance.The work appears to have started by late April, according to the analysis published on the institute's web site, 38 North. The latest photo is from June 1.The images provide hints about what's going on at Punggye-ri but critical activities are conducted underground out of aerial view. And it is notoriously difficult to gauge Pyongyang's intentions, particularly with regard to its nuclear program that has advanced despite U.N. Security Council demands for it to desist.North Korea has conducted three test explosions at Punggye-ri, in 2006, 2009 and this February."This new activity probably shows that Pyongyang continues to work on its nuclear arsenal and that it wants to be in a position to conduct more nuclear tests if the current round of diplomatic activity fails to make progress," said 38 North editor Joel Wit, who is a former State Department official.While North Korea offered earlier this month to restart talks with the U.S. without preconditions, Washington is cautious because of the failure of past aid-for-disarmament negotiations. It says it will judge Pyongyang by its actions, and for dialogue to resume, North Korea needs first to take steps to show it is sincere about previous commitments to abandon nuclear weapons.The North's latest nuclear test drew international condemnation and tighter U.N. sanctions. Young leader Kim Jong Un's government responded by issuing a litany of dire threats against the United States and its allies and announced it was restarting a shuttered plutonium reactor that can produce fuel for bombs.The institute says it's too soon to determine the exact purpose of the recent activity at Punggye-ri, near to one of three entrances to the mountain. The images show rails have been installed for mining carts to carry spoil via a western entrance used for the 2009 test and possibly the February test.It could indicate construction of a new tunnel that will take several years to complete; repair to an existing tunnel; or clearing of debris from existing tunnels caused by past nuclear tests, according to the analysis.The institute notes that opening a sealed tunnel previously used for a test would be hazardous because of the dangers of radioactivity.
WASHINGTON — The United States imposed sanctions Tuesday on a Myanmar general who it says violated a U.N. Security Council ban on buying military goods from North Korea despite Myanmar's assurances it has severed such ties.Lt. Gen. Thein Htay is the head of the Directorate of Defense Industries, which the U.S. designated for sanctions a year ago, saying that organization has carried out missile research and development, and used North Korean experts.The latest U.S. action does not target Myanmar's reformist government, which has continued to take positive steps in severing military ties with the North, the Treasury said. That's been a key goal of the Obama administration's engagement with the government of President Thein Sein, who has introduced democratic changes after decades of authoritarian rule that had led to international isolation.Washington says the arms trade provides Pyongyang with revenue for its nuclear and missile programs that threatens the U.S. and its allies. North Korea has conducted long-range rocket and atomic tests in the past year that have deepened concerns about its weapons' capabilities.In response to Myanmar's reforms, the U.S. has eased its longstanding restrictions on trade and investment in the impoverished Southeast Asian country but it still enforces targeted sanctions against individuals it considers to be bad actors."Thein Htay has disregarded international requirements to stop purchasing military goods from North Korea, the revenues from which directly support North Korea's illicit activities," said David S. Cohen, undersecretary for terrorism and financial intelligence. His statement did not specify the goods that were purchased.Thein Htay took part in a secret visit by top Myanmar military officials to North Korea in late 2008. They visited military facilities, and according to the State Department, signed a memorandum of understanding with North Korea to provide assistance to Myanmar to build medium range, liquid-fueled ballistic missiles.It's unclear what kind of military hardware and know-how Myanmar has actually obtained from North Korea. The leader of the 2008 mission, then-junta No. 3, Shwe Mann, has since renounced the military trade with the North. Tuesday's action, however, reflects U.S. concerns that Thein Htay has allowed it continue.Shwe Mann, who is now speaker of the lower house of parliament and is considered an advocate of democratic reform, was taken off the U.S. sanctions list last September. As chief of Myanmar's ruling party, he has cooperated with opposition leader and Nobel laureate Aung San Suu Kyi.Shwe Mann told The Associated Press during a visit to Washington last month that Myanmar's arms trade with North Korea has stopped."If there's any information that we hear on this matter we will continue to take actions as required. Because our country, like others, will abide by the resolutions of the United Nations Security Council," he said. "We are not neglecting this matter."
WASHINGTON — The Obama administration on Tuesday sanctioned the head of a missile research and development facility in Myanmar for ignoring international requirements that he stop buying military equipment from North Korea.Lieutenant General Thein Htay runs the Directorate of Defense Industries, which was sanctioned in July 2012 for buying military equipment and material from North Korea."Thein Htay has disregarded international requirements to stop purchasing military goods from North Korea," said U.S. Under Secretary for Terrorism and Financial Intelligence David Cohen. "We will continue our efforts, alongside our international partners, to shut down North Korea's dangerous and destabilizing weapons proliferation."Tuesday's action prohibits U.S. citizens from engaging in transactions with Thein Htyay, and freezes assets he might have in the United States.It comes on the heels of sanctions imposed June 27 on a North Korean bank and other individuals. The U.S. has been ratcheting up the pressure on North Korea since its latest nuclear test in February.The Obama administration said Tuesday's action does not target the government of Burma, also referred to as Myanmar. The sanctions announcement said the country has "continued to take positive steps in severing its military ties with North Korea."The United Nations said in May that increasingly tough financial sanctions, an arms embargo and other international restrictions on trade had significantly delayed expansion of North Korea's nuclear arms program.
WASHINGTON — A Korean-American sentenced to 15 years hard labor in North Korea is asking U.S. officials to help secure his release from prison and is seeking forgiveness from North Korean officials, according to a media report on Wednesday.In an edited interview obtained by CNN, Kenneth Bae, who was convicted by North Korea in April of trying to overthrow the state, said he was being patient and coping well despite poor health. The footage showed Bae wearing a dirty, blue-gray prison uniform and seeming thinner than before, according to the television network."My hope is that North Korea will forgive, and the U.S. will try harder to get me out speedily. I am asking for their help," Bae said in the translated interview, posted on CNN's website.The eight-minute interview, which was recently obtained by the Tokyo-based Choson Sinbo newspaper and shared with CNN, is thought to be Bae's first public comments since he was convicted, according to CNN."I know what I did is not easily forgivable, but I hope that things will work out so that I can be with my family again soon," Bae said, according to CNN.Bae, 44, was sentenced after North Korea's Supreme Court convicted him of crimes against the state, saying the missionary used his tourism business to form groups to overthrow the government. Bae has acknowledged being a missionary and said he had conducted religious services in the North.Bae, who was born in South Korea but is a naturalized U.S. citizen, said he had been hoping to be sent home in time to celebrate the U.S. Independence Day holiday on Thursday, which is also his father's 70th birthday, according to CNN."I was hoping the problem would be worked out by the end of June," he said.Bae also said he works about eight hours a day in the North Korean labor camp but that people are considerate toward him.
TOKYO — An American imprisoned in North Korea has told a pro-Pyongyang media outlet that he wants the U.S. to "try harder" to help him gain amnesty from a sentence of 15 years of hard labor for alleged crimes against the government.In what appears to be his first media interview since his November arrest, Kenneth Bae told the Tokyo-based Choson Sinbo in a story published Wednesday that he had hoped to be out by Thursday. That's not only Independence Day but his father's 70th birthday. He said he still hopes the U.S. government will help him get released quickly.He was sent in May to what the North calls a "special prison," and Pyongyang's decision to allow the interview may have been an attempt to show that he is not being treated harshly. But an analyst said Pyongyang is also trying to use Bae as a bargaining chip to start bilateral talks with the U.S.Bae, 44, of Lynnwood, Washington, was arrested in the northeastern North Korean region of Rason and was interviewed last week at a North Korean prison where he is serving out his sentence. An American of Korean descent, Bae entered the special economic zone as a tour operator but was convicted in late April of plotting to commit "hostile acts" against the North Korean government.Photos and video of Bae published this week by Choson Sinbo show him with his head shaven and wearing gray overalls bearing the number 103.Choson Sinbo, which caters to Japan's pro-Pyongyang North Korean community, provided an unusual look at Bae's life inside his "special education center" cell. It is 12 square meters and has a wash basin, a desk and a television.Bae said he wakes up at 6 every morning. He then does farm work, planting seeds and weeding, until his labor ends at 6 p.m. He gets Sundays and holidays off, he told the paper during a June 26 interview."People here are very considerate, so I'm not working too hard, but my health is not in the best condition so there are some difficulties," Bae said in a Choson Sinbo video shared with CNN and posted to the paper's Facebook page. It's likely he gave the interview in the presence of North Korean officials.Many in the U.S. see Bae's imprisonment as bait with which North Korea hopes to win diplomatic concessions from Washington. North Korea remains locked in a standoff with the U.S. and its allies for continuing to develop nuclear weapons despite U.N. sanctions. It launched a long-range rocket in December and conducted a nuclear test in February.Yoo Ho-yeol, a North Korean studies professor at Korea University in Seoul, said the photos and video of Bae "are purely for propaganda purposes."Yoo said North Korea hopes to use Bae as an excuse to bring the U.S. government into dialogue. The U.S. has responded coolly to the North's recent calls for talks, saying that Pyongyang must work toward denuclearization if it wants to improve relations.Pyongyang denies using Bae, who is known in North Korea by the Korean name Pae Jun Ho, for political purposes.Choson Sinbo's Pyongyang bureau chief, Kim Ji Yong, said the paper "worked hard to get this interview. Why the officials decided to grant it, however, is for them to say."Bae informed his family in April he would not be allowed to appeal his sentence and urged them to lobby Washington to push for amnesty, North Korean officials have told The Associated Press."July 4th is my father's 70th birthday. So I was hoping that my problem will be worked out by the end of June," Bae said. "So my hope is that North Korea will forgive and the U.S. will try harder to get me out quickly. I'm asking for their help.""There is no greater priority for us than the welfare and safety of our U.S. citizens abroad, as I've said many times," State Department spokesman Patrick Ventrell said in May. He urged North Korea to "grant Mr. Bae amnesty and immediate release."However, there has been no indication that a high-profile American envoy is set to travel to North Korea to negotiate his release.At least five other Americans have been detained in North Korea since 2009. The others were eventually allowed to leave without serving out their terms, some after clemency missions by prominent Americans, including former Presidents Bill Clinton and Jimmy Carter.North Korean leader Kim Jong Un has the power to grant special pardons under the North's constitution.Former NBA star Dennis Rodman has called on Kim to release the fellow American. The basketball player met and dined with Kim during a visit to North Korea earlier this year.The human rights group Amnesty International has criticized Bae's lack of access to a lawyer. Pyongyang says he confessed and didn't want an attorney at sentencing.Bae has had limited contact with the outside world. He has been visited by diplomats from the Swedish Embassy, which represents U.S. interests there because Washington and Pyongyang lack official diplomatic ties.AP Writer Elizabeth Shim in Seoul, South Korea, contributed to this report.
TOKYO — Japan faces increasingly serious threats to its security from an assertive China and an unpredictable North Korea, the defense ministry said in its first annual report since hawkish Prime Minister Shinzo Abe took office.The report was harshly critical of China's actions in waters near East China Sea islets claimed by both countries, and prompted a sharp response from Beijing, where a foreign ministry spokeswoman said Japan was exaggerating the threat to "artificially create regional tension and confrontation."Sino-Japanese relations have been strained by the territorial row as well as remarks from Abe suggesting he wants to cast Tokyo's wartime history in a less apologetic tone."There are various issues and destabilizing factors in the security environment surrounding Japan, some of which are becoming increasingly tangible, acute and serious," said the defense white paper, issued as ruling party politicians call for the Japanese military to beef up its ability to respond.The general commanding a Japanese airborne brigade whose paratroopers would be among the first troops to respond to an attack on a far-flung island, told Reuters his unit could benefit from better intelligence gathering tools, including drones."For any island operation, intelligence is crucial," Tadao Maeda, commanding general of the 1st Airborne Brigade, said in an interview. At present, his unit relies on intelligence from ground or maritime forces. Japan has allocated funds in this year's budget to look into possible acquisition of drones.The defense ministry report said: "China has attempted to change the status quo by force based on its own assertion, which is incompatible with the existing order of international law," echoing recent comments by Abe and his cabinet."China should accept and stick to the international norms."The row over rival claims to tiny East China Sea islets flared up last September after Japan nationalized the isles, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China.Patrol ships from both countries routinely shadow each other near the islands, raising concerns that an unintended collision or other incident could lead to a broader clash."Some of China's activities involve its intrusion into Japan's territorial waters, its violation of Japan's territorial airspace and even dangerous actions that could cause a contingency, and are extremely regrettable," the paper said.Japan said in February that a Chinese naval vessel had locked its fire control radar on a Japanese destroyer, a step that can be considered a step away from actual firing.China denied the warship had locked its radar on the Japanese vessel. But the white paper said Beijing's assertion was "inconsistent with the facts".Commenting on the defense report, Chinese Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Hua Chunying said it contained "false criticisms" and followed growing calls in Japan to strengthen the military."The international community cannot but be concerned by Japan's real intentions and its future development," she said. "We hope that Japan can correct its attitude."Abe returned to power for a rare second term after his ruling bloc won a general election late last year, promising to revive the economy and strengthen Japan's defenses. He also wants to revise the post-World War Two pacifist constitution to legitimize the military, although winning support for contentious revisions is likely to take time.Japan is already bolstering defense of the disputed islands and this year raised its defense budget for the first time in 11 years.The military is conducting joint drills with the United States, its main security ally, and fortifying defenses against missile attacks, while the government is reviewing its mid-term defense policy.Japan plans to draw up a new defense plan by December, and Abe's Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) submitted recommendations to the government last month that included looking into acquiring the capability to attack enemy targets.Japan has long maintained that it has the right to strike enemy targets when an intention to attack Japan is clear, the threat is imminent and there are no other options.But any sign that Japan is moving to obtain such capabilities could upset China and South Korea, where resentment against Japan's wartime aggression and colonization runs deep."The balance of power will be lost if we don't start considering striking back when attacked," said Osaka University professor Kazuya Sakamoto, who sits on a panel advising Abe on security policies.The LDP has also recommended that the military should set up an amphibious Marines division equipped with tilt-rotor aircraft like the V-22 Osprey to boost the defense of remote islands.Maeda backed the proposal to acquire the U.S. aircraft, whose deployment to Japan's Okinawa island has prompted local opposition because of concerns about its safety."For the airborne, the Osprey is a very attractive piece of hardware," he told Reuters. Japan has set aside about $80,000 in this year's defense budget to research the possible acquisition.Abe, whose LDP is expected to cement its grip on power in this month's upper house election, also wants to revise an interpretation of the constitution that bans using the right of collective self-defense, or aiding an ally under attack.A panel set up during Abe's first 2006-7 term recommended that the ban be lifted in certain cases, such as intercepting ballistic missiles bound for the United States. A new committee of advisers is expected to reach similar conclusions.North Korea launched a missile in December, stepping up the threat that the isolated, impoverished state poses to rivals. In February, it conducted a third nuclear test, which moved Pyongyang closer to developing long-range nuclear missiles."The launch of a missile ... showed that North Korea has advanced its technologies to extend the range and improve the accuracy of ballistic missiles," the white paper said.
TOKYO — Japan sounded the alarm Tuesday on rising security threats in Northeast Asia, warning in a government report of a potential military confrontation with China over maritime disputes, as well as North Korea's increasingly sophisticated nuclear weapons program.Japan's annual defense paper, the first since Prime Minister Shinzo Abe took office in December, also raised concerns that budget cuts in the United States and a range of other distractions would hinder Washington's "pivot to Asia," a strategic reorienting of American interests from Europe and the Middle East toward East Asia."In its defense strategic guidance, the U.S. presented policies emphasizing a rebalance toward the Asia-Pacific region," the report drawn up by the Defense Ministry said. "But how its harsh financial situation will impact efforts to translate these policies into reality attracts attention."Mr. Abe, a conservative, has been keen to revamp Japan's military strategy to offset China's growing military power and the continuing instability on the Korean Peninsula.In January, he ordered his government to replace its five-year military spending plan and to review guidelines adopted in 2010 by the left-leaning Democratic Party, which would have shrunk the military's ranks. Mr. Abe plans to increase military spending for the first time in a decade.Mr. Abe has also sought to bolster military cooperation with the United States. But Japan has struggled to hold America's attention. President Obama skipped a meeting with Mr. Abe on the sidelines of the Group of 8 summit meeting in Northern Ireland last month.Even as Washington has remained distracted by other matters, the report warned, the security situation in Northeast Asia has turned increasingly volatile.Officials in Japan are particularly worried by what the report called Chinese intrusions into waters around islands claimed by both countries. Since last year, Japanese and Chinese patrol ships have been engaged in a tense face-off near the Senkaku islands, uninhabited islets that China calls the Diaoyus.Though no clashes have occurred, some experts have warned that a clash at sea could inadvertently set off a wider military confrontation between the two powers. In January, Tokyo accused a Chinese military vessel of aiming a radar used to help direct weapons on a Japanese naval vessel near the islands. That came after Japan scrambled fighter jets in response to a Chinese military surveillance plane that had entered what Japan considers its airspace.The report cited what it said were China's "intrusion into Japan's territorial waters, its violation of Japan's airspace and even dangerous actions that could cause a contingency situation, which are extremely regrettable." It continued, "China should accept and stick to the international norms."The Japanese government has also been rattled by renewed belligerence from North Korea, which fired off a long-range rocket in December and conducted its third nuclear test in February. Those moves suggest that it is pushing ahead with plans to develop more advanced and longer-range missiles that could ultimately carry nuclear warheads.Coupled with its nuclear tests, North Korea's weapons program "has developed into a more real and imminent problem for the wider international community," the report said.
WASHINGTON — The Justice Department announced Friday that it is toughening its guidelines for subpoenaing reporters' phone records, and also raising the standard the government needs to meet before it can issue search warrants to gather reporters' email.The changes follow disclosures that the Justice Department secretly subpoenaed almost two months of telephone records for 21 phone lines used by reporters and editors for The Associated Press and secretly used a warrant to obtain some emails of a Fox News journalist. After a barrage of criticism from lawmakers, the news media and civil liberties groups, Obama ordered Attorney General Eric Holder to review the Justice Department's policy on obtaining such material, and set Friday as the deadline.In announcing the changes, the Justice Department said it will create a News Media Review Committee to advise its top officials when the department seeks media-related records in investigations.Under one of the changes being made, the government must give advance notice to the news media about subpoena requests for reporters' phone records unless the attorney general determines that "for compelling reasons," such notice would pose a clear and substantial threat to the integrity of the investigation. That's a change from the current procedure, which puts the decision in the hands of the assistant attorney general for the criminal division, with review by the attorney general."It is expected that only the rare case would present the attorney general with the requisite compelling reasons to justify a delayed notification," the report said.In another change, the government will issue search warrants directed at a reporter's email only when that member of the news media is the focus of a criminal investigation for conduct not connected to ordinary newsgathering activities."Under this revised policy, the department would not seek search warrants ... if the sole purpose is the investigation of a person other than the member of the news media," the report stated.The report also said the department would revise current policy to elevate to the attorney general the approval requirements for all search warrants directed at members of the news media.In the AP story that triggered one of the leak probes, the news organization reported that U.S. intelligence had learned that al-Qaida's Yemen branch hoped to launch a spectacular attack using a new, nearly undetectable bomb aboard a U.S.-bound airliner around the anniversary of Osama bin Laden's death.In the Fox News story, reporter James Rosen reported that U.S. intelligence officials had warned Obama and senior U.S. officials that North Korea would respond to a United Nations Security Council resolution condemning nuclear tests with another nuclear test.Holder and the Justice Department have said repeatedly that there was never any intention of charging Rosen with a crime, although an FBI agent referred to the reporter as a co-conspirator when filing an application for an affidavit. The only charges filed have been against the alleged leaker in the case."It appears that they are recognizing that the very broad subpoena of the AP's phone records was too aggressive," said Lucy Dalglish, dean of the journalism school at the University of Maryland who until recently was head of the Reporters' Committee for Freedom of the Press. "They also recognized that they are not going to prosecute a reporter for basic newsgathering activities unless they have reason to believe the reporter is involved in the alleged breaking of the law. That has not been all that clear in the past."She added: "The devil will be in the details. They left themselves a little bit of wiggle room."David Schulz, an attorney who represented the AP in the case, called the new guidelines "a major positive development.""Just about everything the attorney general can do unilaterally to tighten these guidelines, he has," Schulz said.Erin Madigan White, the AP's senior media relations manager, said the news cooperative "is gratified that the Department of Justice took our concerns seriously. The description of the new guidelines released today indicates they will result in meaningful, additional protection for journalists. We'll obviously be reviewing them more closely when the actual language of the guidelines is released, but we are heartened by this step."Holder met Friday with Obama in the Oval Office to discuss the changes, and White House spokesman Matt Lehrich said the president agrees with Holder's recommendations and considers the report an important step toward the proper balance between national security and press freedoms.Lehrich said Obama had directed his team to explore alternative approaches to cracking down on leaks, such as revoking security clearances or other punishments. "Pursuing a criminal investigation and prosecution is not always the most efficient and effective way to address leaks of classified information," he said.Holder also endorsed the proposal for a shield law that would protect reporters. "While these reforms will make a meaningful difference, there are additional protections that only Congress can provide," he said. "For that reason, we continue to support the passage of media shield legislation."
HAVANA — Cuba said a North Korean cargo ship seized in Panama on Monday was loaded at one of its ports with 10,000 tons of sugar and 240 tons of "obsolete defensive weaponry," according to a statement released on Tuesday by the Cuban Foreign Ministry.Cuba said the weapons were being sent back to North Korea for repair and included two anti-aircraft batteries, nine disassembled rockets, and two MiG-21 aircraft, all Soviet-era military weaponry built in the middle of the last century.
BEIJING — New sanctions levied on North Korea after its third nuclear test this year risk pushing the country into a further humanitarian disaster by crimping relief efforts, says an aid worker who has just completed a trip to the isolated state.Washington imposed sanctions in March on the Foreign Trade Bank, Pyongyang's main foreign exchange bank, saying it had helped fund North Korea's banned nuclear weapons program. The measures bar bank dealings by U.S. entities or individuals.Some European aid groups have said their banks in Europe had stopped sending money to North Korea in the wake of the U.S. sanctions, leaving them scrambling for a solution short of hand-carrying cash into the impoverished country.Experts say Washington's move aims to make global banks that do business in the United States think twice about dealing with North Korea, in much the same way banks have become wary over ties with financial institutions in sanctions-hit Iran.But these sanctions risk tipping North Korea over the edge, especially if it is hit by further natural disasters, said Kim Hartzner, managing director of Mission East, a Danish provider of food aid to children that has operations in the country."I am seriously concerned about the blockade. I'm seriously concerned about the consequences," Hartzner told Reuters late on Monday, adding that children, pregnant women and the elderly would suffer most from any disruptions to aid programs."The country at large is in a state close to economic paralysis."Natural disasters such as typhoons, heavy rain, or a smaller than expected soybean harvest would pose a tough challenge for aid groups, said Hartzner, after his fifth trip to North Korea since Mission East first gained access to the country in 2011."Should this happen again in a situation where stores are low and the rations need to be cut down, I think the inability to speed up the provision of humanitarian assistance could have very drastic effects," Hartzner added.A famine in the 1990s is estimated to have killed a million North Koreans and experts say chronic food shortages reflect failures in the reclusive country's centralized economic system, which has sapped farm output.Widespread deforestation since then has made North Korea's farm sector increasingly vulnerable to floods and drought.North Korea is already under broad United Nations sanctions for its nuclear and missile tests, though humanitarian aid is not supposed to be targeted.Hartzner said the new measures were hurting the work of his group, one of a handful of foreign non-government organizations allowed to operate in North Korea."It is very difficult to operate at the moment and yes, there have been problems in terms of bank transfers and procuring goods," he said.Mission East has given food assistance to some 50,000 people in North Korea since 2011, and has just finished another program for about 20,000 vulnerable people in South Hwanghae Province."It's a very fragile situation. We cannot afford to let down our guard. The time span to intervene and save lives is very, very short if conditions deteriorate further," Hartzner said.
WASHINGTON — The United States and Cuba resumed immigration talks in Washington on Wednesday after a two-year hiatus and U.S. officials said they had again pressed for the release of jailed American contractor Alan Gross.The last migration roundtable between the United States and Cuba was in January 2011 when officials met in Havana.The talks were led by Alex Lee, acting U.S. deputy assistant secretary for Western Hemisphere affairs, and Josefina Vidal Ferreiro, Cuba's foreign ministry director general for U.S. affairs.The State Department said the U.S. delegation reiterated a call for the release of Gross, who is serving a 15-year sentence in Cuba for installing Internet networks for Cuban Jews as part of a U.S. program that Cuba considers subversive.Gross' arrest in late 2009 and sentencing in March 2011 halted a brief thaw in U.S.-Cuba relations after Obama took office in January 2009.The department said Lee made it clear that Gross was "trying to facilitate communications between Cuba's citizens and the rest of the world."The sides also discussed the application of U.S.-Cuba Migration Accords, which seek to promote safe, legal and orderly migrations between the two countries.Over the past half century, thousands of Cubans have died trying to cross the treacherous Florida Straits in flimsy boats and homemade rafts.The United States accepts about 200,000 Cubans annually via legal immigration and also takes in those who manage to reach U.S. shores. But under the "wet foot, dry foot policy" it turns back Cubans picked up at sea.In a statement, the Cuban delegation said the meeting had taken place in a "climate of respect" but noted that legal, safe and orderly migration could not be achieved as long as the "wet foot, dry foot" policy remained in place.The meeting comes as the United States and Cuba explore the possibility of resuming direct mail services, which U.S. diplomats insist does not mean a change in American policy toward Cuba.Earlier, State Department spokeswoman Marie Harf said the United States would not raise during Wednesday's meeting the issue of a North Korean ship caught in Panama last week smuggling arms from Cuba in contravention of U.N. sanctions.She said, however, that Washington would talk to Cuba "very soon" about the ship.Panama stopped the ship and seized the cargo, which included missile equipment and arms on board that Cuba said were obsolete Soviet-era weapons being send to North Korea for repair.
WASHINGTON — Senators sought to increase pressure on the Obama administration on Wednesday to respond after a North Korean cargo ship in Panama was found carrying what appeared to be military equipment loaded in Cuba.Marco Rubio, a Florida Republican and member of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, said the administration should reverse a January 2011 decision easing some travel restrictions and remittances sent to Cuba and stop granting visas to Cuban government officials.Separately, Democrat Robert Menendez, chairman of the Foreign Relations Committee, said the matter should be submitted to the U.N. Security Council for review.Both Rubio and Menendez are Cuban-Americans known as tough critics of Cuba's communist government.Panama stopped the North Korean ship last week and discovered arms and weapons from Cuba under sacks of brown sugar, prompting concerns that Cuba violated the U.N. arms embargo on Pyongyang.Cuba said they were "obsolete" Soviet-era weapons being sent to North Korea for repair."I believe that this revelation, in addition to Cuba's failure to address its abysmal human rights record, should finally prompt the Administration to re-calibrate its misguided and naive Cuba policy," Rubio wrote in a letter to Secretary of State John Kerry.The incident has not yet derailed U.S.-Cuban talks on migration, but U.S. officials said Washington would raise the issue of the ship with Cuba very soon.
SEOUL — North Korea demanded on Thursday the release of its ship held in Panama with what appear to be missile radar and other weapons loaded in Cuba, saying it was sailing under a legitimate deal and calling the initial suspicion of drugs on board "a fiction.""The Panamanian investigation authorities rashly attacked and detained the captain and crewmen of the ship on the plea of 'drug investigation' and searched its cargo but did not discover any drug," North Korea's Foreign Ministry spokesman said."This cargo is nothing but aging weapons which are to send back to Cuba after overhauling them according to a legitimate contract," the spokesman was quoted as saying by the official KCNA news agency."The Panamanian authorities should take a step to let the apprehended crewmen and ship leave without delay."Panamanian authorities seized the North Korean freighter and found what appeared to be components for Soviet-era missile radar system under sacks of brown sugar.The ship was stopped last week as it headed into the Panama Canal and authorities arrested the crew on Monday after finding undeclared missile-shaped objects, a potential violation of U.N. sanctions linked to the North's nuclear and missile programs.Panama said on Wednesday that it had asked the United Nations to determine the legality of the cargo.Cuba, which has close diplomatic ties with North Korea, said the cargo contained "obsolete defensive weaponry" being sent back to North Korea for repairs and included anti-aircraft missile batteries, disassembled rockets and fighter jet parts.Security experts said there was a possibility North Korea was trying to import the equipment and the explanation about repairing the items may be a disguise.Britain's ambassador to the United Nations said the ship appears to have violated U.N. arms embargo on North Korea.North Korea has been under wide-ranging sanctions under Security Council resolutions since 2006 that ban trade of most types of weapons after conducting missile and nuclear tests in defiance of international condemnation.It tested a nuclear device for the third time in February that led to the adoption of the latest Security Council resolution that tightened the sanctions regime.
Panama brushed aside North Korea's demands on Thursday that it release an impounded North Korean freighter and its 35-member crew, pressing criminal charges against all aboard for endangering public security by attempting to transport a concealed cargo of Cuban weapons through the Panama Canal.The charges against the crew members, lodged by the office of the prosecutor, Javier Caraballo, heightened the Panamanian confrontation with North Korea over the ship, the 450-foot Chong Chon Gang, which had been awaiting permission to cross the canal for the voyage home after a visit to Cuba.The vessel was impounded on Sunday after the crew, armed with what officials called sticks, tried to fend off Panamanian marines investigating whether it was carrying contraband. They found old radar, missile and aircraft components buried in the hold of the ship, underneath more than 200,000 bags of Cuban brown sugar.A statement by the prosecutor's office said all the accused had exercised their right to remain silent when the charges were formally lodged. The crew was expected to remain in detention while the Panamanian authorities finished unloading the vessel, which could take days.The criminal charges were announced as North Korea broke its silence over the impounded ship and demanded that Panama let the vessel and crew depart. A statement by the North Korean Foreign Ministry asserted that the ship had been transporting the Cuban weapons to North Korea for refurbishment under a legal contract. The North Korean statement also criticized Panama for using what it called the pretext of searching the vessel for narcotics and for Panama's violent treatment of the crew.The seizing of the vessel has cast a light on the clandestine maritime trading practices of North Korea, one of the world's most isolated and impoverished countries, which has been further hobbled by United Nations sanctions over its nuclear weapons and proliferation activities."The Panamanian investigation authorities rashly attacked and detained the captain and crewmen of the ship on the plea of 'drug investigation' and searched its cargo but did not discover any drug," the North Korean Foreign Ministry said in a statement carried by North Korea's official Korean Central News Agency. "Yet, they are justifying their violent action, taking issue with other kind of cargo aboard the ship."The statement said "this cargo is nothing but aging weapons which are to send back to Cuba after overhauling them, according to a legitimate contract." It demanded that Panama "let the apprehended crewmen and ship leave without delay."The North Korean statement came a little more than a day after Cuba acknowledged it owned the weapons. In addition to the criminal charges against the crew, Panama has requested that the United Nations Security Council investigate the cargo as a violation of sanctions resolutions that prohibit North Korean trading in war matériel.At the United Nations on Thursday, a senior American diplomat, Jeffrey DeLaurentis, commended what he called the swift action by Panama in alerting the Security Council, and said its sanctions committee responsible for North Korea would be starting its investigation soon.
The family of Kenneth Bae, the American sentenced to 15 years of hard labor in North Korea, received letters from him in the mail for the first time this past week, telling them that his health is worse and asking them to press the United States government to help secure his release, Mr. Bae's sister said Friday.North Korea experts said the message of the handwritten letters — and their method of delivery, which could not have happened without North Korea's approval — suggested that the authorities there were open to the idea of negotiations on Mr. Bae. That had seemed remote three months ago when he was found guilty of committing "hostile acts" against the government.North Korea said Mr. Bae, 44, was a Christian missionary who had sought to build a clandestine proselytizing base in the country, where the Communist government regards missionary work as sedition.The possible opening in Mr. Bae's case came against a backdrop of other indications that North Korea, despite its harsh public language toward the United States, is pursuing multiple ways of pushing for direct contact after months of threats and new weapons tests. So far, the Obama administration has resisted the overtures.Mr. Bae's sister, Terri Chung, said in a phone interview from her home in Edmonds, Wash., that Mr. Bae had been able to communicate a few times during his imprisonment, which began with his arrest in November, though those contacts were through intermediaries acting on behalf of Sweden's ambassador in North Korea, who monitors American interests. Then weeks went by with no further word."This past week, we were surprised to receive a packet of letters from Kenneth through the U.S. Postal Service, bearing a Pyongyang postmark," she said. "The packet contained four letters, dated June 13th, addressed to his wife, his mom, me and his supporters."She said that "all the letters contained the same message — Kenneth's health is failing, and he asked us to seek help from our government to bring him home."Ms. Chung said her brother suffered from diabetes, an enlarged heart and back problems.She declined to share the letters but said the family had conveyed their contents to officials at the State Department. Patrick Ventrell, a State Department spokesman in Washington, did not immediately return messages seeking comment.Mr. Bae was sentenced at a time of particularly high tensions between the United States and North Korea over the North's nuclear weapons program under its young new leader, Kim Jong-un, further complicating any possible diplomatic efforts aimed at securing Mr. Bae's release.North Korea said that Mr. Bae had been working as a Christian missionary with the aim of overthrowing the North Korean government. In a video of an hourlong talk, given to a Korean church in the United States in 2011 and posted online, Mr. Bae detailed his activities inside North Korea.The postmark on Mr. Bae's mailed letters to his family suggested they were written at about the same time that the North Korean authorities had permitted a pro-North Korea group based in Tokyo, Choson Sinbo, to interview him in prison. A videotape of that interview, broadcast July 3 on CNN, showed Mr. Bae looking distressed and thin, his head shaved, dressed in a stained blue jumpsuit with his prison number, 103. His message was similar to those in the letters: an appeal for the United States government to help secure his release."Although my health is not good, I am being patient and coping well," Mr. Bae said in that interview. "And I hope that with the help of the North Korean government and the United States, I will be released soon."In what appeared to be an effort to show the outside world that the North Korean penal authorities had been treating him well, Mr. Bae was seen seated in a comfortable cell with a radiator and a window. The video also zoomed in on what was described as his daily work schedule, posted in Korean and English, showing he was given three meals and had four rest breaks in between field labor. No other inmates were seen at the prison, and its precise location was unclear.Diplomats who have dealt with North Korea said the unspoken message in both the video and the letters was that the North Korean authorities wanted to see more publicity about Mr. Bae as part of their broader effort to seek direct contact with the United States government.The top North Korean diplomats at the United Nations have twice over the past month publicly called for direct talks, citing the impending 60th anniversary of the armistice that halted the Korean War as a juncture for a changed relationship. Dennis Rodman, the former basketball star who visited North Korea this past winter and met Mr. Kim, has called for Mr. Bae's release and has said he intended to return to North Korea in August, although it is unclear whether that will happen. E-mailed queries to Mr. Rodman's representatives in the United States were not returned on Friday.Other Americans who have been held in North Korea were released after visits by former United States presidents.In another possible signal from North Korea to the Obama administration, an American Navy pilot who flew combat missions in the Korean War, Capt. Thomas J. Hudner Jr., was en route to North Korea on Friday as part of his own lengthy effort to retrieve the remains of a colleague, Ensign Jesse L. Brown. Ensign Brown, the Navy's first African-American aviator, died after his plane was shot down on Dec. 4, 1950.Captain Hudner, who is white, crash-landed his own plane near Ensign Brown's in a valiant but ultimately unsuccessful attempt to pull him from the wreckage, and was forced to evacuate. But Captain Hudner's action became part of military lore and is regarded as having helped promote racial equality in the United States armed forces.
COLON, Panama — Panamanian investigators unloading the cargo of a seized North Korean ship that carried arms from Cuba have found the two MiG-21 fighter jets the Cuban government had said were on board, the government said on Sunday.Alongside the two supersonic planes, originally produced by the Soviet Union in the late 1950s, officials found two missile radar systems on board the Chong Chon Gang, President Ricardo Martinelli told reporters in the Atlantic port of Colon.The discovery, which included cables and electrical equipment, was made inside containers on the ship Panama had feared might contain explosive material. None was found.After stopping the vessel bound for North Korea last week, Panama revealed it had found weapons in the cargo hold late on Monday. In response, Cuba said the shipment contained a range of "obsolete" arms being sent to North Korea for repair.Panama has asked the U.N. Security Council to investigate the ship and its contents amid suspicion that the vessel is in breach of a wide-ranging arms embargo on North Korea for its nuclear and ballistic missile program."One can't take undeclared weapons through the Panama Canal below other cargo," Martinelli said, adding that he had not spoken personally to any Cuban officials since they first asked for the ship to be released last Saturday.Javier Caraballo, Panama's top anti-drugs prosecutor, said the planes gave off a strong odor of gasoline, indicating that they had likely been used recently. So far, Panama has not found anything not on the Cubans' list of ordnance, he added.The U.N. team is expected to arrive in early August once Panama has finished unloading the 155 meter (510 foot) ship.The weapons were hidden under thousands of sacks of sugar on the freighter. Before the arms were discovered, Cuba told Panama the cargo was a donation of sugar for the people of North Korea.The isolated Asian nation has asked Panama to release the ship and its 35 member crew, who were arrested and charged with attempting to smuggle undeclared weapons through the canal.Panama has so far dismissed North Korea's requests.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — North Korea on Monday unveiled a new rendition of the "Arirang" mass games, the song-and-dance ensemble that has become its most famous tourist draw.Opening night of the performance involving tens of thousands of young people singing, dancing and tumbling took place at Pyongyang's May Day Stadium after a day of heavy rains.North Korea has staged the mass performance off and on for more than a decade to showcase the country's history and propaganda.This year's performance was timed to debut for the 60th anniversary Saturday of the end of the Korean War, and it featured fireworks as well as new scenes focusing on leader Kim Jong Un's policies — including video of last December's controversial long-range rocket launch. Large video screens flanking the stage showed footage from the Korean War as well as highlights from major sporting events."Arirang" is a traditional folk song beloved in both North and South Korea.
BOSTON — A former CIA official and a retired Air Force general will address next week's Def Con hacking convention, which for the first time asked federal officials to steer clear because of anger over alleged government spying.Joseph DeTrani, a long-time CIA official who served as a U.S. envoy in talks with North Korea regarding its nuclear activities, will open the hackers' conference on August 2 with a speech about weapons of mass destruction and cyber technology. Former Air Force General Robert Elder, who created one of the U.S. military's first cyber units, will speak the following day.Def Con founder Jeff Moss said the two had been invited long before his July 11 request that federal officials stay away from the convention to defuse tensions over the U.S. mass surveillance programs leaked by former National Security Agency contractor Edward Snowden.Moss said that having former U.S. officials at the conference could be useful to the hacking community because they are uniquely placed to help explain the government's position on the surveillance programs."Being former, not current, they might be able to speak more freely and offer a more nuanced perspective," said Moss, who is known in hacking circles as The Dark Tangent."They would probably offer more credible perspective that people are not going to just dismiss out of hand and say 'Of course you are going to say that. That's your job,'" he said in an interview.Def Con - short for Defense Condition, in military speak - has since 1992 been bringing together people with a common interest in software, computer architecture, and any high-tech system that can be hacked. It typically attracts a small contingent of officials from the CIA, NSA, FBI, and military among hackers, researchers, security workers, activists and others. The conference this year is expected to draw 15,000 people.DeTrani told Reuters that after his speech he will address surveillance programs, if asked."Everything I've heard about these programs is that they were authorized with oversight. From what I know Americans were not spied upon," he said. "Hopefully nobody throws marshmallows at me and says 'You wacko, go back to North Korea.'"DeTrani stepped down as a senior advisor to the Director of National Intelligence in May 2012, ending more than three decades in government, the bulk of the time at the CIA.His speech will be followed by several panels led by critics of government surveillance. The American Civil Liberties Union is holding a Friday afternoon session on "NSA surveillance and more." Representatives of the Electronic Frontier Foundation, a group that has filed lawsuits against the NSA over surveillance programs, will review "the year in digital civil liberties."Elder, who is currently an engineering professor at George Mason University, plans to talk about applying lessons from military operations to protecting computer networks.He said that while he knows nothing more about the Snowden case than what he has read in the paper, he expects the issue will come up. "I expect there to be some tension," he said.
TOKYO — Japan is likely to start considering acquiring the ability to launch pre-emptive military strikes in a planned update of its basic defense policies, the latest step away from the constraints of its pacifist constitution.The expected proposal, which could sound alarm bells in China, is part of a review of Japan's defense policies undertaken by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's government, an interim report on which could come as early as Friday. The final conclusions of the review are due out by the end of the year.The hawkish Abe took office in December for a rare second term, pledging to bolster the military to cope with what Japan sees as an increasingly threatening security environment including an assertive China and unpredictable North Korea.Article 9 of Japan's constitution, drafted by U.S. occupation forces after its defeat in World War Two, renounces the right to wage war and, if taken literally, rules out the very notion of a standing army. In reality, Japan's Self-Defense Forces are one of Asia's strongest militaries.The Defence Ministry will call in the interim report for a study of how to "strengthen the ability to deter and respond to ballistic missiles", the Yomiuri newspaper and other media said on Thursday.But in a sign of the sensitivity, the report will stop short of specifically mentioning the ability to hit enemy bases when the threat of attack is imminent, the Yomiuri newspaper said.The ministry will also consider buying unmanned surveillance drones and creating a Marines force to protect remote islands, such as those at the core of a dispute with China, media said."The acquisition of offensive capability would be a fundamental change in our defense policy, a kind of philosophical change," said Marushige Michishita, a professor at the National Graduate Institute of Policy Studies.Obtaining that capability, however, would take time, money and training, meaning any shift may be more rhetorical than real. "It's easier said than done," Michishita added.The updated guidelines could also touch on Abe's moves toward lifting a self-imposed ban on exercising the right of collective self-defense, or helping an ally under attack, such as if North Korea launched an attack on the United States.The defense review may also urge replacing a self-imposed ban on arms exports, that has been eased several times, making it easier for Japan's defense contractors to join international projects and reduce procurement costs.Some experts stressed that the changes were evolutionary rather than a sudden transformation in Japan's defense posture."It's all part of a process of Japan edging away from the most restrictive interpretation of Article 9," said Richard Samuels, director of the MIT-Japan program at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.Still, given Japan's strained ties with China over disputed isles and how to frame the narrative of Japan's wartime history, China is likely to react strongly to the proposals, which come after Abe cemented his grip on power with a big win in a weekend election for parliament's upper house."No matter how Japan explains things, China will attack it pretty harshly," said Michael Green of the Washington-based Center for Strategic and International Studies.Although China has been a nuclear power for decades and North Korea is developing nuclear arms, Japan says it has no intention of doing so.Support has grown in Japan for a more robust military because of concern about China, but opposition also remains.Japan last updated its National Defence Programme Guidelines in 2010 when the Democratic Party of Japan was in power.Those changes shifted Japan away from defending areas to its north, a Cold War legacy, to a defense capability that could respond with more flexibility to incursions to the south, the site of the row with China over tiny, uninhabited islands.Japan has for decades been stretching the limits of Article 9 and has long said it has the right to attack enemy bases overseas when the enemy's intention to attack Japan is evident, the threat is imminent and there are no other defense options.But while previous administrations shied away from acquiring the hardware to do so, Abe's Liberal Democratic Party in June urged the government to consider acquiring that capability.Just what hardware might come under consideration is as yet unclear. And with a huge public debt, Japan may be in no position to afford the bill.Japan already has a very limited attack capability with its F-2 and F-15 fighter jets, mid-air refueling aircraft and Joint Direct Attack Munition guidance kit. Tokyo also plans to buy 42 Lockheed Martin's F-35 stealth fighters, with the first four due for delivery by March 2017.Acquiring the ability to hit mobile missile launchers in North Korea - the most likely target - would require many more attack aircraft as well as intelligence capability for which Japan would most likely have to rely on the United States, Michishita said. Cruise missiles might also be considered.Obtaining the ability to strike missile bases in mainland China would be an even bigger stretch, experts said, requiring for example intercontinental missiles. "It would cost lots of money, and take time, training and education to acquire a robust and meaningful capability," Michishita said.
TOKYO — A defense paper released Friday by Japan's hawkish new government calls for an increase in the country's military capabilities and a more assertive role in regional security due to increased threats from China and North Korea.If implemented, some of the changes outlined by the interim Defense Ministry paper would be a major shift in policy for a military that is currently limited to self-defense and is banned from operating in overseas combat zones under a pacifist constitution.Now that he is back in power, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe wants the previous defense policy of the more moderate Democratic Party-led government revised to give Japan's military more freedom and strength.The report repeatedly cited China's military and maritime activity as threats to regional peace and stability, and urged Japan to step up its capability to respond."China's military trend includes high-handed actions that could trigger unforeseen situations, and has become security concerns to the region and international society including our country," the report said. "National security environment surrounding our country is increasingly aggravating."The paper said Japan should increase its surveillance capability and consider using drones, or unmanned surveillance vehicles capable of wide-range, high-altitude monitoring around the clock. The paper also proposed creating a marine force with amphibious functions to defend disputed islands in the East China Sea.It said the Japan-U.S. security alliance remains "the cornerstone" of Japan's defense policy and urged Japan to step up its ability to respond to ballistic missile attacks amid concerns about North Korea's nuclear and missile development.A final report is expected at the end of this year."This will guide the focus of the direction that the Self Defense Forces should be heading going forward," said Defense Minister Itsunori Onodera said, outlining key components such as boosting warning and surveillance capabilities, amphibious functions, integrated transport, and anti-ballistic missile response.On Thursday, Tokyo expressed unease over Chinese military and maritime activity near a group of islands that Japan controls but China also claims.Japan had scrambled fighter jets Wednesday to keep watch on a Chinese early warning plane flying over international waters between Japan's southern Okinawa island and an outer island relatively close to the disputed area. Around the same time, Japan's Coast Guard reported the appearance of four Chinese coast guard vessels near the disputed islands, called Senkaku in Japan and Diaoyu in China.
TOKYO — Japan should strengthen the ability of its military to deter and counter missile attacks, including the possible acquisition of the ability to hit enemy bases, the Defence Ministry said, but officials denied this would be used for pre-emptive strikes.The proposal - Japan's latest step away from the constraints of its pacifist constitution - is part of a review of defence policy by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's government, which released an interim report on the issue on Friday. Final review conclusions are due by the end of the year.The hawkish Abe took office in December for a rare second term, pledging to bolster the military to cope with what Japan sees as an increasingly threatening security environment, including an assertive China and an unpredictable North Korea.The report by a defence ministry panel echoed concerns aired in Japan's latest defence white paper about North Korea's missile and nuclear programmes, and China's military build-up and increased activity by its ships and aircraft near disputed islands in the East China Sea - where Japanese and Chinese vessels and planes have been playing cat-and-mouse.Given Japan's strained ties with China over the tiny islands and Tokyo's wartime history, Beijing could react strongly to the proposals, which come after Abe cemented his grip on power with a big win in a weekend election for parliament's upper house.The Defence Ministry panel said it was necessary to comprehensively strengthen "the ability to deter and respond to ballistic missiles". Officials denied, however, that this implied Japan would make pre-emptive strikes.The line between the ability to hit enemy targets and make pre-emptive strikes is primarily political and philosophical, and Japanese officials typically avoid the latter term."There is no change at all to our basic policy of exclusively defensive security policy," Japanese Defence Minister Itsunori Onodera told reporters."The issue of capability to strike enemy targets surfaces as we discuss what kind of defence measures we can take when multiple attacks have been mounted against our country."In the Japan-U.S. security alliance, Japan acted as a shield while the United States shouldered the capability to strike enemy bases, he added, but changing security risks needed study."Broad-based debate, including one between Japan and the United States, is needed on the issue amid the changing security environment," Onodera said. "Of course, we are not assuming pre-emptive strikes."Article 9 of Japan's constitution, drafted by U.S. occupation forces after the country's defeat in World War Two, renounces the right to wage war and, if taken literally, rules out the very notion of a standing army. In reality, Japan's Self-Defense Forces are one of Asia's strongest militaries.Japan has for decades chipped away at the limits of Article 9. It has long said it has the right to attack enemy bases overseas when the intention to attack Japan is evident, the threat is imminent and there are no other defence options.But while previous administrations shied away from acquiring the hardware to do so, Abe's Liberal Democratic Party in June urged the government to consider acquiring that capability against missile threats.Some experts say acquiring more substantial offensive capability would be a fundamental change to Japan's defence policies. Others see it as a more evolutionary development.Japan already has limited attack capability but to be able to hit mobile missile launchers in North Korea it would need more attack aircraft and intelligence, for which Japan would probably have to rely on the United States, experts said. Hitting missile bases in mainland China would be an even bigger stretch.Whether Japan, with a huge public debt, can afford the bill, is another question.Measures to strike enemy missile facilities include attacks by aircraft or missiles and sending soldiers directly to the site, the Defence Ministry official said, but he added it was too early to discuss specific steps.The ministry also said it would consider buying unmanned surveillance drones, create a force of Marines to protect remote islands, such as those disputed with China, and consider beefing up the ability to transport troops to far-flung isles.Japan should also review its self-imposed ban on arms exports that has already been eased to let Japanese contractors participate in international projects and take new steps if needed, the ministry said in its report.Clearer guidelines as to what equipment companies may sell and to whom could help companies such as Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd, Kawasaki Heavy Industries Ltd, and Fuji Heavy Industries Ltd seek business overseas.Support has grown in Japan for a more robust military because of concern about China, but opposition also remains.Japan last updated its National Defence Programme Guidelines in 2010, when the Democratic Party of Japan was in power.Those changes shifted Japan away from a Cold War legacy of defending northern areas to a more flexible defence against incursions from the south, site of the islands row with China.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — A decorated Korean War veteran from Massachusetts left North Korea on Monday without fulfilling his mission: to travel the Chosin Reservoir battleground where he was hoping to locate the remains of a friend who was the U.S. Navy's first black aviator.Retired Navy Capt. Thomas Hudner was visiting Pyongyang in hopes of following through on a promise made to wingman Ensign Jesse Brown in December 1950 as Brown lay dying in his crumpled plane."We'll come back for you," he told Brown after crash-landing his own plane in a bold but unsuccessful bid to try to rescue his friend.The 88-year-old had hoped to travel to the site of the crash, known in North Korea as the Jangjin Reservoir, to search for his friend's remains. However, heavy monsoon rains and flooding in the rugged mountains in north-central North Korea, northeast of Pyongyang, prevented the veteran from making the difficult journey.Hudner's trip took place as North Korea was marking the 60th anniversary of the Korean War armistice. Because the foes never signed a peace treaty, the Korean Peninsula remains in a technical state of war, and the U.S. and North Korea still do not have diplomatic ties.Brown holds a special place in U.S. military history: In 1948, just after the U.S. armed forces were desegregated, the young man from Hattiesburg, Mississippi, became the first black American to earn his Navy wings. The unlikely friendship and brotherhood between the sharecropper's son and his white wingman is the focus of upcoming book by Adam Makos, who accompanied Hudner on the trip to North Korea.On Sunday, Senior Col. Pak Gi Yong assured Hudner that the Korean People's Army was committed to helping him find the spot in the area where he and Brown went down. He said last week that the army sent an advance team to Jangjin but that flooding had washed away roads to the site, making travel to the region treacherous.Brown is among more than 7,910 Americans still missing in action from the Korean War. The U.S. and North Korea had agreed to carry out joint searches for their remains, with excavations beginning in 1996. But in 2005, as Washington and Pyongyang locked horns over North Korea's nuclear ambitions, the U.S. government suspended the searches.Last year, following negotiations in Bangkok with Pak and his team, the U.S. Defense Department's Joint POW/MIA Accounting Command prepared to resume the search. But those plans were scrapped following North Korea's decision to launch a satellite in space on board a long-range rocket — widely seen as a test of missile technology.Hudner, of Concord, Massachusetts, said he was disappointed but hoped to return later in the year to finally fulfill his promise to Brown."I have a feeling of great hope as a result of our mingling and meeting the officials here in (North) Korea," he said before departing. "I feel we've accomplished a lot because of the appearance of mutual hope between us and the North Koreans."
COLON, Panama — Panama says it has postponed until Aug. 12 a U.N. inspection of Cuban weapons found hidden under bags of sugar on a ship headed to North Korea.Authorities say unloading the ship will require more time before a visit from the U.N. Security Council committee monitoring sanctions against North Korea. The U.N. experts will determine if the shipment violates those sanctions.Public Security Minister Jose Raul Mulino said Tuesday that Panama has found 12 turbines for the MiG fighter aircraft that was also on board, consistent with what the Cuban government reported after the weapons were found. The manifest said the ship was only carrying sugar when it was detained July 15 in the Panama Canal.Panama has filed charges against the crew for transporting undeclared military equipment.
UNITED NATIONS — U.N. experts monitoring sanctions against North Korea will make a three-day visit to Panama next week to investigate an undeclared arms shipment from Cuba discovered in a North Korean-flagged ship detained in the Panama Canal, the chair of the sanctions committee said Wednesday.The six-member team will present an initial report on their Aug. 13-15 visit and then a substantive report with their conclusions and recommendations, U.N. Ambassador Sylvie Lucas of Luxembourg told reporters after a Security Council meeting.Lucas said there has been no discussion in the sanctions committee or the Security Council on whether the shipment violated a U.N. arms embargo."We don't yet have a conclusion if it is a violation or not," she said. "The committee will only start discussing once we have the report and then see if we have a consensus on whatever conclusions they have been drawing."During the closed Security Council meeting, Lucas said "everybody commended Panama for the swift action and for informing the committee and immediately inviting the committee and the panel to assist."The ship, Chong Chon Gang, was headed from Cuba to North Korea when it was seized in the canal July 15 based on intelligence that it may have been carrying drugs.The manifest said it was carrying 10,000 tons of sugar, but Cuban military equipment was found beneath the sacks. Panamanian investigators haven't found any drugs yet but they have found live munitions.After the seizure, Cubans officials said the cargo included 240 metric tons of obsolete planes and missiles they were sending to North Korea to be repaired and returned. They did not mention any munitions.South Korea's U.N. Ambassador Kim Sook said several council members expressed appreciation for "the Cuban government's openness — that they will not challenge the authority of the Security Council and they will be as cooperative as possible in the process of investigation.""We hope that their words could (be) met by deeds," he said.
WASHINGTON — The State Department is again calling for the immediate release of an American man sentenced to 15 years hard labor in North Korea, saying his health is deteriorating and he's been hospitalized in Pyongyang (pyuhng-yahng).Spokeswoman Marie Harf said Monday the North should grant amnesty to 45-year-old Kenneth Bae (beh), a tour operator and Christian missionary accused of "hostile acts" against the authoritarian state.Washington has previously called for Bae's release on humanitarian grounds, to no avail.Bae's family says he has been transferred from a labor camp to hospital after losing more than 50 pounds. His sister says Bae's ailments include diabetes, an enlarged heart and liver problems.Analysts say Pyongyang uses detained Americans as bargaining chips in its long-running standoff with the U.S. over its nuclear weapons program.
An American tour operator imprisoned in North Korea has been moved from a labor camp to a hospital in the capital, Pyongyang, as his health continues to deteriorate, his sister said Sunday.The American, Kenneth Bae, 45, had been imprisoned at the camp since May shortly after he was sentenced to 15 years of hard labor for what the North Korean authorities say were hostile acts against the government.Since then, his health has significantly declined, Mr. Bae's sister, Terri Chung, said by telephone. He has lost more than 50 pounds, has problems with his kidneys and liver and has a bad back, among other maladies, Ms. Chung said."He has a host of ailments," she said. "Some of them have worsened considerably enough to warrant a hospital transfer."The State Department informed Mr. Bae's family on Friday that he had been moved to a hospital in the North Korean capital, Ms. Chung said.It is not clear what Mr. Bae's hospitalization could mean for efforts to win his freedom. Though tensions with the United States remain high, North Korean officials have been looking for ways to open a dialogue.In the past, North Korea has used American prisoners as bargaining chips with Washington, though North Korean officials have signaled that they would not do so in Mr. Bae's case.Last month, Mr. Bae's family received letters from him for the first time since his imprisonment. In the letters, which were addressed to Mr. Bae's wife, mother, sister and others, he wrote that he was in poor health and asked that the United States government work to secure his release.The letters, which bore a Pyongyang postmark, could not have been sent without North Korea's approval and were seen by some experts as a sign that the authorities were open to negotiations concerning Mr. Bae.Ms. Chung said her family received another packet of letters last week saying much the same thing. She said she was not aware of "all the ins and outs of the diplomatic efforts being made," but said that her brother had been visited by the Swedish ambassador in Pyongyang on Friday.Mr. Bae, a Korean-American from Washington State, had been leading a group of businessmen from China on a tour of the special economic zone of Rason in northeastern North Korea when he was arrested in November.North Korean officials accused Mr. Bae of being a Christian missionary who flouted the country's laws on proselytizing.Mr. Bae's plight has generated broad sympathy in the United States. A petition on Change.org by Mr. Bae's son, Jonathan, calling for his father's release has received more than 10,000 signatures.And Dennis Rodman, the former basketball player whose trip to Pyongyang last winter rankled American diplomats, vowed in May to use his new rapport with North Korean officials to win Mr. Bae's release.In a videotaped interview from prison broadcast on CNN last month, Mr. Bae appeared gaunt and complained of ill health."Although my health is not good, I am being patient and coping well," Mr. Bae said. "And I hope that with the help of the North Korean government and the United States, I will be released soon."
UNITED NATIONS — U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon appealed on Thursday for funding to urgently provide food, healthcare and sanitation to millions of North Koreans, stressing that donors should not be deterred by the reclusive state's nuclear ambitions.The United Nations said it needs almost $100 million to fund aid programs for the rest of 2013 in North Korea, where there are about 2.4 million very vulnerable people in need of regular food assistance. The world body said almost a third of children under age 5 in North Korea suffer chronic malnutrition."The lives of many people are at stake, including children who are vulnerable to lasting suffering if they do not receive aid," Ban's press office said in a statement."The secretary-general calls on prospective donors to respond to this serious situation. He stresses that humanitarian assistance should not be linked to political or security considerations," it said.North Korea is under a sweeping array of U.N., U.S. and other national sanctions due to repeated nuclear and ballistic missile tests since 2006 in defiance of international demands that it stop.
UNITED NATIONS — The United Nations is urgently appealing for $98 million to meet critical humanitarian needs in North Korea for the rest of 2013.The U.N. said it has received only $52 million of the $150 million it appealed for to support the provision of food and agricultural materials, health and nutrition programs and water and sanitation improvements."Without sustained humanitarian support, the gains made the past 10 years in improving food security and the overall health and nutrition of the most vulnerable ... could be quickly reversed," U.N. Resident Coordinator in North Korea Ghulam Isaczai said in a statement Thursday.Isaczai said while the overall humanitarian situation has improved slightly over the last 12 months, around 2.4 million very vulnerable people need regular food assistance, and external assistance is vital.U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon called on prospective donors to respond to the appeal. The U.N. chief "stresses that humanitarian assistance should not be linked to political or security considerations," his spokesman Martin Nesirky said."The lifesaving operations of the United Nations in the country remain drastically underfunded," Nesirky said. "The lives of many people are at stake, including children who are vulnerable to lasting suffering if they do not receive aid."Earlier this month, South Korea approved $6 million in government aid for vaccines, medical care and food for North Korean children, the first such humanitarian aid for Pyongyang since South Korean President Park Geun-hye took office in February.Ban, a former South Korean foreign minister, welcomes the decision and 'hopes this move will inspire other traditional and potential donors to follow suit," Nesirky said.
TOKYO — Japan's hawkish new prime minister, Shinzo Abe, observed the anniversary of his nation's defeat in World War II by sending an offering to a controversial Tokyo war shrine instead of visiting it himself, a compromise move meant to try to satisfy his right-wing base without inflaming passions in the region.Mr. Abe's deliberations on a possible visit to the Yasukuni Shrine — which he had talked of doing before becoming prime minister in December — were closely watched as an early test of whether he would revert to the strident nationalism of his first troubled tenure as the country's leader. Critics said the prime minister had been holding back for months to help appeal to more mainstream voters before parliamentary elections, which his party won in a landslide last month.The prime minister's balancing act highlighted his struggle since taking office to juggle two conflicting political goals: a deeply felt personal desire to revise what his supporters call an overly negative postwar portrayal of Japan's conduct during the war, and an effort to solidify ties in the region to help the United States offset China's growing strength. He pushed through a small defense spending increase and supports expanding Japan's self-defense forces. But he has dropped his vow to revise official apologies for the war that Japan made to other Asian nations in the 1990s.Mr. Abe has largely avoided touching on delicate historical issues since he took office, with the exception of another offering he made to Yasukuni in April. Mr. Abe's supporters say he is responding at least in part to pressure from American officials, who fear that historical issues may isolate Japan, the United States' largest Asian ally, at a time when the Americans must cope with China and a nuclear North Korea.Mr. Abe had refused to say clearly for days whether he would go to the Shinto shrine, which honors the nation's war dead, including executed war criminals. The offering of an envelope full of cash was signed by Mr. Abe and delivered by an aide, Koichi Hagyuda, who said that Mr. Abe regretted not being able to come, a secretary for Mr. Hagyuda said.The Japanese government's chief cabinet secretary, Yoshihide Suga, described Mr. Abe's offering as a personal gesture, not an official one. Separately, three low-level cabinet members paid what they called private visits to the shrine.Official visits to Yasukuni have long been a tense point in regional relations because victims of Japanese wartime aggression, including China and South Korea, view the site as a potent symbol that Japan remains unrepentant for its past.Mr. Abe's gesture failed to mollify China, which is locked with Tokyo in a bitter standoff over islands that China says Japan claimed in the late 1800s as one of the aspiring imperial power's earliest attempts to impose its will on the region. On Thursday, China summoned the Japanese ambassador in Beijing to "express strong protest and stern condemnation" over the cabinet members' visits, said Hong Lei, a spokesman for the Chinese Foreign Ministry. Mr. Hong called the shrine visits a "brazen challenge to historical justice."Many Japanese conservatives insist they have the right to visit the shrine to pay respects to their nation's war dead, including the 3.1 million military personnel and civilians who perished in World War II. But the shrine has also become a rallying point for Japanese nationalists who dispute the historical view of Japan as an aggressor that they say was a product of the postwar Tokyo war crimes trials.A war museum on Yasukuni's premises casts Japan instead as the liberator of Asia from Western imperialism, while ignoring or denying wartime atrocities. Several years ago, the United States Embassy also quietly protested the museum's description of Japan having been lured into attacking Pearl Harbor in 1941 by President Franklin D. Roosevelt.The shrine's conflicted symbolism also leads many Japanese to stay away. That includes Emperor Akihito and his wife, Empress Michiko, who instead attended the Japanese government's official ceremony, which was held opposite from Yasukuni at the Budokan martial arts arena. Standing below a large Japanese flag, the emperor and empress observed a minute of silence before a crowd of about 6,000 people, including family members of fallen Japanese sailors and soldiers.No Japanese emperor has visited Yasukuni since the mid-1970s, when Emperor Hirohito objected to the decision to honor the souls of top war criminals, according to documents made public in the mid-2000s.Mr. Abe, who was at the official ceremony, laid flowers at Japan's grave for its unknown soldiers and pledged to contribute to world peace. However, his speech there failed to express remorse for the suffering that Japan inflicted on other Asian nations during the war, something that previous prime ministers have included in their anniversary speeches.In a televised speech on Thursday in Seoul to observe the end of the war and of Japanese colonial rule, South Korea's president, Park Geun-hye, warned that it would be difficult "to build trust for the future if Japan doesn't have the courage to face history" and consider "the pain of others."
SEOUL — North Korea objected on Saturday to a ban on imports of equipment for a luxury ski resort mainly for the ruling elite, indicating toughened U.N. sanctions are impacting the impoverished state.Under the leadership of North Korean leader Kim Jong-un, who studied in the Swiss capital Berne and is believed to have enjoyed skiing in the Alps, the reclusive North has carried out work on the "Masik Pass" ski project since last year, in rivalry with South Korea which is hosting 2018 Winter Olympics.Last week, Switzerland halted the sale to the North of equipment for a ski resort and luxury sporting goods including golf, horseback riding and water sports under the sanctions.North Korea reportedly asked several Swiss companies to provide chair lifts and cable cars worth 7 million Swiss francs ($7.24 million) for its grand Masik resort.North Korea's Skiers Association said in a statement carried by KCNA news agency on Saturday that countries should not prohibit Pyongyang from buying equipment which does not produce any rocket or nuclear weapon."Some countries, pressurized by the U.S. high-handed practices, are blocking the DPRK from importing even equipment to be installed in mass sports facilities such as the ski resort," an association spokesman said. North Korea's official name is the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK).Although the statement did not elaborate on which country blocked the import, it called such a move unjustifiable and a violation of the U.N. Charter that states sanctions should not affect people in relevant countries.Earlier this year, North Korea threatened nuclear and missile strikes against the United States and South Korea at the height of tensions after it was hit with U.N. sanctions for its February nuclear test.
WASHINGTON — North Korea withdrew its invitation to a U.S. envoy who was headed to Pyongyang to request the release of imprisoned, ailing American missionary Kenneth Bae, the U.S. State Department said on Friday.North Korea cancelled talks with Robert King, the U.S. special envoy for North Korean human rights issues, who was expected to visit Pyongyang on Friday and Saturday."We are surprised and disappointed by North Korea's decision," State Department spokeswoman Marie Harf said."We remain gravely concerned about Mr. Bae's health and we continue to urge the DPRK authorities to grant Mr. Bae special amnesty and immediate release on humanitarian grounds," the spokeswoman said in a written statement, referring to the North by its formal name, the Democratic People's Republic of Korea.There was no immediate explanation for the decision from North Korea, which does not have diplomatic relations with Washington.King's trip, announced this week as he was visiting U.S. allies Japan and South Korea, was seen as a potential signal of the start of a gradual thaw in relations between Washington and Pyongyang.The State Department had termed the trip a "humanitarian mission" and played down any connection between Bae's release and diplomacy over the North's sanctioned nuclear weapons program.Bae's sister in Washington state issued a statement saying their family was disappointed and worried about Kenneth Bae's health, but are "not giving up hope for a peaceful and timely resolution.""We hold on to faith that DPRK and U.S. diplomats will resume talks soon, ultimately leading to my brother being released," said Terri Chung, Bae's sister.Representative Rick Larsen, who represents the district where Bae's family lives, urged the North Koreans to free Bae."The North Koreans gain nothing from this course reversal. It is time to let Kenneth come home to his family and get the medical attention he needs," Larsen, a Democrat, said in a statement.King secured the release of another Korean-American missionary, Jung Young Su, in 2011 as part of a trip to assess North Korean pleas for food aid.Relations between Washington and Pyongyang have been frosty since the collapse of a deal in early 2012, when North Korea broke its promise to end its long-range rocket launches and prevented nuclear inspectors from examining its nuclear stockpile and production.Nuclear talks involving the United States, China, Japan and the two Koreas have been deadlocked for five years, although Pyongyang in 2005 had signed on to a deal in which it would have frozen its nuclear program in exchange for economic and energy aid. North Korea has conducted three nuclear tests since 2006.North Korea's human rights record has recently come under international scrutiny. A U.N. Public Commission of Inquiry in Seoul on August 20 was told by witnesses that public executions and torture are daily occurrences in the North's prisons.Bae, 45, was sentenced to 15 years hard labor for attempting to overthrow the North Korean state by spreading anti-government propaganda, according to North Korean media. He has diabetes and his health has deteriorated since he was jailed.North Korean state media said Bae started his plot to "topple" the country's government in 2006, a date that coincides with his own testimony about his arrival in China.It accused him of spreading "false propaganda" and of bribing North Korean citizens in a bid to bring down the government.Bae lived in a Chinese town that borders North Korea and worked for a tour company while undertaking missionary work inside North Korea.North Korea says it permits religious freedom, but religious expression is tightly controlled in a state that acknowledges total loyalty to the Kim dynasty that has ruled for three generations. North Korea lands at the bottom of most independent surveys of freedom.In online postings of one of his speeches on his missionary work, Bae described himself and a party he took to North Korea as "warriors for Christ" and told of holding a prayer meeting on a beach.The postings have since been removed, as have all traces of Bae's involvement with a tour company operating out of China.In a videotaped sermon, also removed from the Internet, Bae discussed bringing 300 people to a coastal town in North Korea to emulate the biblical destruction of the walls of Jericho.Bae's family has acknowledged his deeply held religious beliefs but have suggested that his sympathy for North Korean orphans may have been behind his arrest.
SEOUL — North Korea said late on Saturday it withdrew an invitation for a U.S. envoy to visit the country to discuss the fate of a jailed American citizen because U.S. military drills on the peninsula made humanitarian dialogue impossible.Robert King, special envoy for North Korean human rights issues, was scheduled to go to Pyongyang last Friday on what the U.S. State Department called a "humanitarian mission" to secure the release of Kenneth Bae.Bae, a Korean American who had worked as a Christian missionary, had been convicted of crimes against the North Korean state and is serving a 15-year hard labor sentence.The North's Foreign Ministry said military drills last week by the United States and South Korea involving a B-52 bomber flight over the peninsula was "the most striking manifestation of the offensive and aggressive nature" of the exercise."The U.S. thus beclouded the hard-won atmosphere of humanitarian dialogue in a moment," an unnamed ministry spokesman said in a statement carried by the official KCNA news agency."Despite the fact that we clearly notified the U.S. side of this through the New York contact channel, it is something surprising that the U.S. is making irrelevant remarks that it was surprised by our action."The United States and South Korea staged the annual computer simulated drills last week that test the allies' combined defensive readiness against possible North Korean aggression.North Korea reacts angrily to military drills by the South and the United States and raised tensions sharply in March this year with threats of missile and nuclear attacks during another set of exercise that is also conducted annually.King's trip was seen as a potential signal of the start of a gradual thaw in relations between Washington and Pyongyang.
WASHINGTON — Two cabinet secretaries who fought during the Vietnam War and a four-star general whose views on intervention were shaped by command tours in Iraq appeared before the Senate on Tuesday to argue the Obama administration's case for Congressional authorization to attack Syria over chemical weapons use.The three men, drawn from President Obama's senior national security team, said that the use of chemical weapons by the Syrian government directly puts American interests at risk, and that other potential adversaries, whether North Korea or Iran, would be emboldened if the United States failed to act.Secretary of State John Kerry, in his remarks before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, urged Congress to vote in favor of the president ordering a military strike and argued that "the risk of not acting is greater than the risk of acting."Mr. Kerry, who once served as the chairman of the committee, sat next to Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel, a former member of the panel, and recalled the flawed intelligence assessments that helped propel the Senate to approve American military action against Iraq in 2003. He said this case was different."I remember Iraq, Secretary Hagel remembers Iraq," Mr. Kerry said. "We were here for that vote. We voted. And so we are especially sensitive — Chuck and I — to never again asking any member of Congress to take a vote on faulty intelligence. And that is why our intelligence community has scrubbed and rescrubbed the evidence."We can tell you beyond any reasonable doubt that our evidence proves the Assad regime prepared for this attack, warned its forces to use gas masks," Mr. Kerry said, referring to the government of President Bashar al-Assad."We have physical evidence of where the rockets came from and when," he said. "Not one rocket landed in regime-controlled territory. All of them landed in opposition-controlled or contested territory. We have a map, physical evidence, showing every geographical point of impact — and that is concrete."Mr. Kerry argued against any restrictions in the Congressional authorization, including whether ground forces would be prohibited. He emphasized that Mr. Obama had no intention to put "boots on the ground." But he said that if Syria imploded and chemical weapons depots were at risk of being raided by militants, then ground troops might be required to secure those locations. He said such an action would most likely be undertaken with allies.Mr. Kerry warned that the turmoil in Syria, if not contained, might allow extremists to find haven in a country with chemical weapons. That nexus of chemical weapons depots and militant fighters tied to international terrorist organizations, he said, could threaten American allies that border Syria, American troops in the region and perhaps even United States territory.He also sought to tie the deaths by chemical weapons in Syria to the gas attacks of World War I and the horrors of World War II. But he said the authorization for use of force would not foreshadow a full war. "There will be no American boots on the ground," Mr. Kerry said, nor would the United States assume responsibility for the Syrian civil war.The goal, he said, is to degrade the Syrian government's ability to use chemical weapons and deter their future use."This is not the time for armchair isolationism," Mr. Kerry said, knowing that there is great reluctance for another conflict in the Middle East among both conservative Republicans and liberal Democrats. "This is not the time to be spectators to a slaughter. Neither our country nor our conscience can afford the cost of silence."Mr. Hagel, like Mr. Kerry a veteran of the Vietnam War, used an argument heard from previous administrations in warning of the potential links between terrorist organizations and authoritarian governments that held arsenals of unconventional weapons.
SEOUL — North Korean leader Kim Jong-un has a baby daughter, seemingly guaranteeing the future of a dynasty has ruled the isolated and impoverished state for three generations, according to U.S. basketball star Dennis Rodman who met Kim last week.Kim's wife Ri Sol had appeared to be pregnant in pictures issued last year by North Korea's state news agency, although no confirmation was available. She then disappeared from public view, returning last October.Rodman, who has visited North Korea twice this year and describes Kim as his "friend", told Britain's Guardian newspaper that he had held the baby."I held their baby Ju-ae and spoke with Ms Ri (Sol-Ju, Kim's wife) as well. He's a good dad and has a beautiful family," Rodman was quoted as saying by the newspaper.Kim Jong-un is the third member of his family to rule North Korea and is believed to be 30 years old. He was effectively anointed as his father's successor in 2010, despite the fact he is the third son.Given the traditional nature of North Korean society, it is unlikely that Ju-ae would succeed her father, although female relatives of Kim, such as his aunt, occupy key positions in government.
SEOUL — North Korean leader Kim Jong-un has a baby daughter, seemingly guaranteeing the future of a dynasty has ruled the isolated and impoverished state for three generations, according to U.S. basketball star Dennis Rodman who met Kim last week.Kim's wife Ri Sol had appeared to be pregnant in pictures issued last year by North Korea's state news agency, although no confirmation was available. She then disappeared from public view, returning last October.Rodman, who has visited North Korea twice this year and describes Kim as his "friend", told Britain's Guardian newspaper that he had held the baby."I held their baby Ju-ae and spoke with Ms Ri (Sol-Ju, Kim's wife) as well. He's a good dad and has a beautiful family," Rodman was quoted as saying by the newspaper.Kim Jong-un is the third member of his family to rule North Korea and is believed to be 30 years old. He was effectively anointed as his father's successor in 2010, despite the fact he is the third son.Given the traditional nature of North Korean society, it is unlikely that Ju-ae would succeed her father, although female relatives of Kim, such as his aunt, occupy key positions in government.
WASHINGTON — A recent satellite image appears to show North Korea is restarting a plutonium reactor, in a move that could raise renewed international alarm over its nuclear weapons program, a U.S. research institute said Wednesday.The 5 megawatt reactor at the Nyongbyon nuclear facility was shuttered in 2007 under the terms of a disarmament agreement. Pyongyang announced plans in April to restart it amid a litany of threats toward the U.S. and South Korea after it faced tougher international censure over its latest nuclear and rocket tests.North Korea has since toned down its rhetoric and stepped up diplomacy with rival South Korea, but Wednesday's finding by the U.S.-Korea Institute at Johns Hopkins School of Advanced International Studies is a sign that the regime of Kim Jong Un is pressing ahead with its nuclear program.Without access to the secretive facility, it is difficult to say with certainty that the reactor has restarted, but the institute says an Aug. 31 commercial satellite image shows white steam rising from a building next to the reactor. The building houses steam turbines and electric generators that are driven by heat generated by the reactor. The color and volume of the steam is consistent with the electrical generating system being readied to come online, indicating that the reactor is in or nearing operation, the institute says.The analysis was written by Jeffrey Lewis and Nick Hansen and provided to The Associated Press ahead of publication on the institute's website, 38 North.When North Korea announced its plans in April, State Department spokeswoman Victoria Nuland told reporters that restarting the plutonium reactor would be "extremely alarming" but added: "There's a long way to go between a stated intention and actually being able to pull it off."Department spokesman for East Asian and Pacific affairs, Jason Rebholz, said Wednesday that North Korea's nuclear program remains a matter of "serious concern." Rebholz reiterated the call for Pyongyang to comply with its previous commitments and abandon all nuclear weapons and nuclear programs. He did not directly address the reactor report, saying the department does not comment on intelligence matters.South Korea's National Intelligence Service also said it could not confirm the reactor report because it involves confidential intelligence.Commercial satellite images taken in recent months had indicated preparations for restarting the reactor were progressing rapidly. In June, the institute predicted the reactor could be up and running by the end of August, depending on the availability of fresh fuel rods to power it.The reactor can be used both to generate electricity and produce fissile material for nuclear weapons, and once it is operating, can produce about 6 kilograms of plutonium a year — enough for one or two bombs. Experts estimate North Korea already has enough plutonium for between four to eight crude weapons."The reactor restart fits a pattern of continued expansion of North Korea's WMD programs short of conducting outright nuclear and missile tests," said Joel Wit, a former State Department official and editor of 38 North. WMD stands for weapons of mass destruction."An operating reactor will enable Pyongyang to renew the production of plutonium, albeit on a small scale, that will enable it to slowly expand its stockpile of nuclear bombs," he said.The development could intensify pressure on Washington to restart international aid-for-disarmament negotiations with Pyongyang, stalled since 2009, although the differences between them are stark.The U.S. is demanding North Korea first recommit to past agreements on denuclearization, while Pyongyang insists that it be recognized in disarmament negotiations as a nuclear power, which the U.S. refuses to do.North Korea has dialed down its bellicose rhetoric in recent months and on Wednesday agreed with South Korea to restart operations at a jointly run factory park that Pyongyang shut down in April.But despite the easing tensions, analysis of recent commercial satellite photos also shows Pyongyang may also be doubling the size of its uranium enrichment plant — a potential, second source of fissile material for nuclear weapons — and expanding its main rocket launch site, located on its west coast near China.North Korea has conducted three underground, nuclear test explosions since 2006. The latest, in February 2013, prompted international condemnation and a tightening of sanctions by the U.N. Security Council. The sanctions are intended to hinder the North's development of nuclear weapons and ballistic missiles.The North's weapons capabilities are a subject of conjecture, but experts doubt it has yet mastered how to miniaturize a nuclear device that fit on a long-range missile capable of hitting the United States, although it is possible it may have for shorter-range missiles.Associated Press writer Hyung-jin Kim in Seoul, South Korea, contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON — A Senate panel on Thursday approved legislation designed to protect reporters and the news media from having to reveal their confidential sources after narrowing the definition of a journalist and establishing which formats — traditional and online — provide news to people worldwide.On a 13-5 vote, the Judiciary Committee cleared the way for the full Senate to consider the measure. The vote came just months after the disclosure that the Justice Department had secretly subpoenaed almost two months' worth of telephone records for 21 phone lines used by reporters and editors for The Associated Press and secretly used a search warrant to obtain some emails of a Fox News journalist.The Justice Department took the actions in looking into leaks of classified information to the news organizations. The AP received no advance warning of the subpoena."One of the things that protect democracy is the free flow of information," said Sen. Patrick Leahy, D-Vt., chairman of the Judiciary Committee, who mentioned his own connection to journalism. Leahy's parents, Alba and Howard, published a weekly newspaper before selling it and starting a printing business.Criticism of the collection of the phone records and other material without any notice to the news organizations prompted President Barack Obama to order Attorney General Eric Holder to review the department's policy. The bill would incorporate many of the changes proposed by Holder in July, including giving advance notice to the news media of a subpoena.In a July 29 letter to Leahy, Holder said the measure "strikes a careful balance between safeguarding the freedom of the press and ensuring our nation's security."In a broadside against the Obama administration, Sen. John Cornyn, R-Texas, said the legislation was merely a diversion by the White House. It was introduced three days after word emerged about the secret subpoenas of the AP records."A new law is not what we need," Cornyn said. "We find ourselves here because of the abuses of the attorney general."A point of dispute was the definition of a journalist.The original bill would have extended protections to a "covered person" who investigates events and obtains material to disseminate news and information to the public. Sen. Chuck Schumer, D-N.Y., a chief proponent of the medial shield legislation, worked with Sens. Dianne Feinstein, D-Calif., and Dick Durbin, D-Ill., as well as representatives from news organizations, on a compromise.The protections would apply to "covered journalist," defined as an employee, independent contractor or agent of an entity that disseminates news or information. The individual would have to have been employed for one year within the last 20 or three months within the last five years.It would apply to student journalists or someone with a considerable amount of freelance work in the last five years. A federal judge also would have the discretion to declare an individual a "covered journalist," who would be granted the privileges of the law.The compromise also says that information is only privileged if it is disseminated by a news medium, described as "newspaper, nonfiction book, wire service, news agency, news website, mobile application or other news or information service (whether distributed digitally or otherwise); news program, magazine or other periodical, whether in print, electronic or other format; or thorough television or radio broadcast ... or motion picture for public showing."While the definition covers traditional and online media, it draws the line at posts on Twitter, blogs or social media from non-journalists.The overall bill would protect reporters and news media organizations from being required to reveal the identities of confidential sources, but it does not grant an absolute privilege to journalists."It's Kevlar, not kryptonite," Schumer said.Sen. Jeff Sessions, R-Ala., complained that the definition of a journalist was too broad. Pushing back, Feinstein said the intent was to set up a test to determine a bona fide journalist."I think journalism has a certain tradecraft," Feinstein said. "It's a profession. I recognize that everyone can think they're a journalist."In a moment of levity at the two-hour plus hearing, Sen. Chuck Grassley, R-Iowa, remarked that the legislation "will not shield me when I use Twitter."Responded Leahy, "Nothing shields us from our mistakes, Chuck."The panel approved the compromise on a 13-5 vote.Holder's revised guidelines called for the government to give advance notice to the news media about subpoena requests for reporters' phone records unless the attorney general determines such notice would pose a clear and substantial threat to the investigation. Search warrants for a reporter's email would apply only when the individual is the focus of a criminal investigation for conduct not connected to ordinary newsgathering.The bill makes clear that before the government asks a news organization to divulge sources, it first must go to a judge, who would supervise any subpoenas or court orders for information. Such orders would be limited, if possible, "in purpose, subject matter and period of time covered so as to avoid compelling disclosure of peripheral, nonessential or speculative information."In the July 29 letter to Leahy, Holder said the proposed bill establishes "an important procedural framework" for judicial review. Holder's revised guidelines call for a new standing News Media Review Committee to advise the attorney general in advance on requests to divulge sources.Reporters must be notified within 45 days of a request, a period that could be extended another 45 days but no moreIn the AP story that triggered one of the leak probes, the news organization reported that U.S. intelligence had learned that al-Qaida's Yemen branch hoped to launch a spectacular attack using a new, nearly undetectable bomb aboard a U.S.-bound airliner around the anniversary of Osama bin Laden's death.In the Fox News story, reporter James Rosen reported that U.S. intelligence officials had warned Obama and senior U.S. officials that North Korea would respond to a U.N. Security Council resolution condemning nuclear tests with another nuclear test.
BEIJING — Beijing called for joint efforts to denuclearize the Korea Peninsula on Thursday following reports that North Korea may be restarting a plutonium nuclear reactor."To achieve denuclearization and to maintain peace and stability is what China has been advocating," Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said at a daily briefing. "It takes efforts from all sides."A U.S. research institute said Wednesday that a recent satellite image appears to show North Korea is restarting its 5-megawatt reactor at the Nyongbyon nuclear facility, which was shuttered in 2007 under the terms of a six-nation disarmament agreement.North Korea threatened in April to restart the reactor but has since toned down its inflammatory rhetoric and stepped up diplomacy with rival South Korea.South Korea has yet to respond to the report by the U.S.-Korea Institute at Johns Hopkins School of Advanced International Studies. Its National Intelligence Service has said it could not confirm the report because confidential information is involved.U.S. officials have expressed concerns, calling on North Korea to abandon its nuclear weapons and programs. U.S. special envoy Glyn Davies has traveled to Beijing this week to discuss the nuclear issue with China. Hong said all sides should work to resume the six-party talks.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — South Korean weightlifters marched with their national flag at the start of an international competition hosted by bitter rival North Korea — something of a milestone for two countries that were trading war threats this spring.It's the first time South Korean athletes have attended an international sports event in North Korea, government officials in Seoul said. Both countries consider themselves the only legitimate government on the Korean Peninsula, which is still technically in a state of war because the 1950-53 Korean War ended in an armistice, not a peace treaty.The concession Thursday by North Korea at the Asian Cup and Interclub Weightlifting Championship this week comes during a mellowing in animosity as the countries pursue diplomacy.After the war rhetoric of March and April, which North Korea linked to U.N. sanctions imposed over its February nuclear test, the Koreas have recently restored a military hotline at the border, agreed to restart a jointly run factory park shut down in April, and will have reunions this month of families separated by the war.Many in Seoul and Washington are still wary of North Korea's intentions, however. The North has refused to pull back from its vows to boost its nuclear weapons and missiles, and recent satellite images appear to show it is restarting a plutonium reactor.The South Korean delegation that attended the ceremony at Ryugyong Jong Ju Yong Indoor Stadium in Pyongyang is composed of 41 athletes, sports officials and others, according to the South's ministry for affairs with the North. They are scheduled to return to Seoul on Wednesday.Seoul said it allowed the trip because the competition is an international match organized by the Asian weightlifting federation. North Korea also promised to guarantee the safety of the southern delegation and said South Korea's flag could be hoisted and its national anthem played if the lifters win gold, Seoul said.South Korean athletes last visited North Korea when a South Korean youth soccer team traveled to Pyongyang in 2008 for a friendly inter-Korean match, according to officials in Seoul.Associated Press writer Hyung-jin Kim in Seoul, South Korea, contributed to this report.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — A South Korean weightlifter heard his national anthem played Saturday after winning gold in an international competition in North Korea, an unusual development between the bitter rivals and a vivid sign of the Koreas' easing tensions after a spring of war threats.Two South Koreans in the junior competition at the Asian Cup and Interclub Weightlifting Championship in Pyongyang, Kim Woo-sik and Lee Young-gun, were the only competitors in the 85 kilogram (187.34 pounds) weight category and automatically won gold and silver. The crowd in Ryugyong Jong Ju Yong Indoor Stadium stood as the South Korean national anthem played and two South Korean flags were raised.It's the first time South Korean athletes have attended an international sports event in North Korea, government officials in Seoul said. Both countries believe they're the only legitimate government on the Korean Peninsula, which is still technically in a state of war because the 1950-53 Korean War ended in an armistice, not a peace treaty.North and South Korea are pursuing diplomacy after a March and April that saw Pyongyang threatening Seoul and Washington with nuclear strikes, an attack capability that many experts doubt the North yet possesses. North Korea linked its warlike rhetoric to U.N. sanctions imposed over its February nuclear test and U.S.-South Korean military drills.In recent weeks, the Koreas have restored a military hotline at the border, agreed to restart a jointly run factory park shut down in April, and will have reunions this month of families separated by the war.There's still wariness in Seoul and Washington, as Pyongyang has repeatedly vowed to boost its nuclear weapons and missiles production; recent satellite images appear to show Pyongyang is restarting a plutonium reactor.The South Korean delegation is composed of 41 athletes, sports officials and others, according to the South's ministry for affairs with the North. They are scheduled to return to Seoul on Wednesday.Seoul said it allowed the trip because the competition is an international match organized by the Asian weightlifting federation.South Korean athletes last visited North Korea when a South Korean youth soccer team traveled to Pyongyang in 2008 for a friendly inter-Korean match, according to officials in Seoul.
BEIJING — China has tightened restrictions on North Korea by issuing a long list of weapons-related technology and materials banned from export to its neighbor, reflecting Beijing's desire to get Pyongyang to recommit to scrapping its nuclear programs and rejoining disarmament talks.The list of forbidden items posted by the Chinese Commerce Ministry on its website Tuesday includes those with both civilian and military applications in the nuclear, ballistic, chemical and biological fields. The notice said the list was aimed at boosting enforcement of U.N. Security Council resolutions on North Korea passed as early as 2006.China, wary of undermining its isolated neighbor and generating instability on its northeastern border, has often argued against stricter sanctions on North Korea and has, at times, been accused of not enforcing them enthusiastically enough.However, Beijing was angered by North Korea's long-range rocket launch last December and its third nuclear test in February, leading it to agree to tightened sanctions in March that also promise further measures in the event of another launch or nuclear test.The latest move will likely be seen in Pyongyang as another reprimand from its only substantial ally following a frosty patch in relations. Since coming to power in December 2011, Kim Jong Un has repeatedly angered Beijing by refused to heed Beijing's prodding to engage in economic reform and return to negotiations over its nuclear program.U.S. officials have long pushed for tightened sanctions enforcement, with Secretary of State John Kerry, Under Secretary of Defense for Policy James Miller, and chief North Korea envoy Glyn Davies visiting Beijing on lobbying missions in recent months.Those efforts have born some success, with Chinese customs agents tightening inspections on a range of items, including luxury goods that the North Korea leader uses to shore up his support from the North Korean elite. In late 2011, Beijing forced the China Construction Bank to close accounts opened by the Korea Kwangson Banking Corp. and the Golden Triangle Bank to comply with previous U.N. sanctions.China provides North Korea with a crucial economic lifeline, supplying almost all its fuel and more than 83 percent of its imports, from heavy machinery to grain and consumer goods.Ties between Beijing and Pyongyang had been seen to improve over the summer, but Chinese state media and government-backed scholars again criticized the North over its call last week for new talks without preconditions.U.S. and other parties to the talks say they're not interested in sitting down with Pyongyang without clear signs it would honor a 2005 pledge to mothball its nuclear programs in return for aid. The deal fell apart in 2008 over demands for additional verification.
BEIJING — China criticized Japan on Monday for its plans to install a cutting-edge U.S. military radar system to monitor North Korean missile launches, saying that could impact regional stability and upset the strategic balance.The X-band radar system would boost Japan's ability to track and intercept missiles from across the Sea of Japan. That was "not conducive to regional nuclear non-proliferation and stability, and will cause an extremely negative impact on the global strategic balance," Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said."Some countries or blocs in the region, on the pretext of the North Korea nuclear threat, have unilaterally set up anti-missile systems or conduct bloc cooperation (with the United States)," Hong said.The comments came after the governor of Japan's Kyoto region, where the radar will be based, endorsed it last week. The facility will be staffed by as many as 160 U.S. service members and civilian contractors.Hong's statement implied the radar was being installed for purposes other than to keep tabs on North Korea, although he gave no details. China tends to see virtually all U.S. military activity in Asia as part of a plot to curb its growing military, diplomatic and economic power.The issue also comes amid ongoing tensions between Tokyo and Beijing over an East China Sea territorial dispute. Beijing has issued months of angry rhetoric and frozen high-level contacts with Japan following Tokyo's nationalization last year of tiny islands claimed by China. Patrol boats from both sides regularly confront each other in the waters surrounding the uninhabited archipelago.China also is highly critical of the U.S.-Japan military alliance along with Tokyo's moves to upgrade its armed forces, saying they are steps toward a revival of the strain of militarism that led to Japan's brutal invasion and occupation of China in the 1930s and 1940s.
BEIJING — China has tightened restrictions on North Korea by issuing a long list of weapons-related technology and materials banned from export to its neighbor, reflecting Beijing's desire to get Pyongyang to scrap its nuclear programs and rejoin disarmament talks.The announcement posted Tuesday on the Chinese Commerce Ministry website comes as two American experts said that Pyongyang can now make crucial equipment for producing uranium-based bombs on its own, cutting out imports that had been one of the few ways outsiders could monitor the country's secretive atomic work.The list of forbidden items includes those with both civilian and military applications in the nuclear, ballistic, chemical and biological fields. The notice said the list was aimed at boosting enforcement of U.N. Security Council resolutions on North Korea passed since 2006.The move is a continuation of China's new policy of putting slightly greater pressure on North Korea to coax it back to disarmament talks, said Li Mingjiang, China security expert at Singapore's Nanyang Technological University.China could have simply implemented the ban, but announcing it so publicly was a sign to the U.S. and the rest of the international community that Beijing is sincere in meeting its commitments, Li said. He said it's also a rebuke to Pyongyang."The leaders in Pyongyang will hate this. They'll be angry," Li said. Pyongyang likely will "swallow the bitter pill" and may respond with concessions, he said.Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei declined to comment on the timing of the announcement, saying only that it "gives expression to the Chinese government's serious attitude to performing duties according to laws and regulations."China, wary of undermining its isolated neighbor and creating instability on its northeastern border, has often argued against stricter sanctions on North Korea and has, at times, been accused of not enforcing them enthusiastically enough.However, Beijing was angered by North Korea's long-range rocket launch last December and its third nuclear test in February, leading it to agree to tightened sanctions in March that also promise further measures in the event of another launch or nuclear test.Since becoming North Korea's leader in December 2011, Kim Jong Un has repeatedly angered Beijing by refused to heed its prodding to engage in economic reform and return to nuclear talks.U.S. officials have long pushed for tightened sanctions enforcement, with Secretary of State John Kerry, Under Secretary of Defense for Policy James Miller, and chief North Korea envoy Glyn Davies visiting Beijing on lobbying missions in recent months.Those efforts have borne some success, with Chinese customs agents tightening inspections on a range of items, including luxury goods that Kim uses to shore up his support from the North Korean elite. In late 2011, Beijing forced the China Construction Bank to close accounts opened by the Korea Kwangson Banking Corp. and the Golden Triangle Bank to comply with previous U.N. sanctions.China provides North Korea with a crucial economic lifeline, supplying almost all its fuel and more than 83 percent of its imports, from heavy machinery to grain and consumer goods.Ties between Beijing and Pyongyang had been seen to improve over the summer, but Chinese state media and government-backed scholars again criticized the North over its call last week for new talks without preconditions.U.S. and other parties to the talks say they're not interested in sitting down with Pyongyang without clear signs it would honor a 2005 pledge to mothball its nuclear programs in return for aid.Concerns over the North's nuclear program may rise following claims that Pyongyang is mastering domestic production of essential components for the gas centrifuges needed to make uranium-based nuclear bombs.If Pyongyang can make crucial centrifuge parts at home, outsiders can't track sensitive imports. That could spell the end of policies based on export controls, sanctions and interdiction that have been the centerpiece of international efforts to stop North Korea's nuclear program over the last decade, Joshua Pollack, a Washington-based expert on nuclear proliferation, said in remarks prepared for delivery Wednesday at a Seoul symposium and provided in advance to The Associated Press."If they're not importing these goods in the first place, then we can't catch them in the act," said Pollack, who gathered the evidence with Scott Kemp, an expert on centrifuge technology at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.It's not clear whether North Korea has made bomb-grade uranium, and Pyongyang says the program is for peaceful, energy-generating purposes.Earlier this year, during a barrage of threats aimed at Washington and Seoul, Pyongyang vowed to resume all its nuclear fuel production. Recent satellite imagery appears to show that North Korea was restarting its plutonium reactor.
BEIJING — In a sign of growing concern about North Korea's nuclear ambitions, China published a long list on Tuesday of equipment and chemical substances to be banned from export to North Korea for fear they could be used in adding to its increasingly sophisticated nuclear weapons programs.If put into place, the export controls would be some of the strongest steps taken by China, the North's closest ally, to try to limit the country's nuclear programs. The announcement indicates that China is now following through on some United Nations Security Council sanctions it approved months ago, according to a noted American arms expert.The list of banned items was released amid a flurry of reports suggesting that North Korea is accelerating its two nuclear weapons programs. Two weeks ago, new satellite photographs showed that North Korea might be resuming production of plutonium at its newly reconstructed nuclear reactor at Yongbyon. And this week, two American arms experts reported that North Korea appeared to have learned to produce its own crucial components for uranium enrichment.The move also comes less than a week after China made an unsuccessful attempt to revive talks aimed at persuading the North to give up its nuclear capabilities. The United States continues to resist restarting the talks, which North Korea has used in the past to extract concessions without making long-term changes to its nuclear program."The release of the new export control list is a signal China is concerned about the speeding up of weaponization" of North Korea's nuclear capabilities, said Zhu Feng, the deputy director of the Center for International and Strategic Studies at Beijing University, who called the move "very important." In particular, he said, the Chinese are concerned about resumption of plutonium production at the Yongbyon complex, the centerpiece of North Korea's nuclear program.Another Chinese expert on North Korea, who declined to be identified because of his position in the government, said the publication of the list "says that China is increasingly unsatisfied with North Korea's actions.""This is one of the practical actions to show it," he said.Both plutonium and highly enriched uranium can be used in nuclear bombs, but analysts say the North's plutonium program is much further along. At least two of the three bombs the country has tested used plutonium.China has long resisted punishing North Korea for its nuclear programs, but has appeared increasingly frustrated as the North's young leader, Kim Jong-un, has appeared to ignore Chinese pleas for moderation. China agreed to the United Nations sanctions after the North conducted a nuclear test this year over Chinese objections.The North responded to the sanctions with months of nuclear threats against South Korea and the United States, which, analysts say, ended only after China exerted strong pressure, apparently fearful of instability that could harm its economic progress.David Albright, the American expert who said China was now implementing the United Nations sanctions passed in March, added that the Chinese ban "will help, since North Korea procures so much from China." Mr. Albright, the president of the Institute for Science and International Security, added that China could take additional measures to "dramatically increase the inspection of goods into North Korea by road and rail."China has moved before to stop the export of other technologies that could be used in nuclear programs, including missile technology, though it did not single out any countries when it did so.The items on the list China released Tuesday were called "dual-use technologies" because they can be used for either civilian or military purposes, and they included items that could be used to build more chemical weapons and to make biological weapons.Banned items include Ebola, a virus that can be used for medical research as well as a biological weapon; nickel powder; radium; flash X-ray generators; and microwave antennas designed to accelerate ions. China's Commerce Ministry, the Ministry of Industry and Information Technology, the General Administration of Customs, and the Atomic Energy Authority jointly published the list.In a statement, the Ministry of Commerce said the items in the 236-page document were prohibited from being sent to North Korea because "the dual-use products and technologies delineated in this list have uses in weapons of mass destruction."China's foreign minister, Wang Yi, who hosted the conference in Beijing last week on nuclear talks, said the time had come to resume the negotiations. And the first vice foreign minister of North Korea, Kim Kye-gwan, who attended the gathering, said North Korea was ready to talk without conditions, a standard phrase from the North Koreans for some time now.But the Obama administration has said it sees no sign that the North Korean government is serious about reducing its nuclear program. Instead, the United States says, North Korea appears to be increasing its nuclear activities.On those grounds, the administration said it was not interested in participating in renewed talks unless North Korea first took concrete steps to dismantle its facilities. Washington declined to send a senior official to the conference here last week, instead sending a diplomat from the United States Embassy.In remarks at the conference, a former senior State Department official and an expert on North Korea, Evans J. R. Revere, whose presence was approved by the administration, said North Korea was "further away than ever from the goal of denuclearization."Mr. Revere said North Korea had "declared itself a nuclear power, revealed to the world that it has not just one but two programs to produce fissile material, confirmed that it is developing strategic rocket forces for the delivery of nuclear weapons, and sworn that it will never give up its nuclear weapons 'even in a dream.' "
TOKYO — The United States and Japan agreed on Thursday to broaden their security alliance, expanding Japan's role while trying to show American determination to remain a dominant presence in the region.The agreement, which will position surveillance drones in Japan for the first time, underscored the two countries' efforts to respond to growing challenges from China and North Korea at a time of budget constraints. It also included some of the clearest signals yet that the United States backs Japan's increasing though still limited moves to strengthen its military, and its military ties in Asia, as a counterbalance to China's own buildup.Those provisions are sure to rankle China and come at a time of already heightened tensions between the two Asian powers, which are locked in a standoff over islands in the East China Sea. The drones, as well as Navy reconnaissance planes never before stationed outside the United States, are expected to patrol waters in the region, including those around the disputed island chain.The agreement was signed during a visit here by the secretaries of state and defense, John Kerry and Chuck Hagel, who were meeting with their Japanese counterparts. With two cabinet members present, the signing appeared to be another effort by the administration to fight a growing anxiety in Asia that the United States is too preoccupied with internal political struggles and troubles in the Middle East to carry through with its much-vaunted "pivot" to Asia."Our bilateral defense cooperation, including America's commitment to the security of Japan, is a critical component of our overall relationship," Mr. Hagel told reporters, "and to the Obama administration's rebalance to Asia-Pacific."For its part, Japan committed to bolster its security capabilities by creating a new American-style National Security Council, and said it would expand assistance to Southeast Asian countries to help them resist Chinese territorial claims. Japan also pledged to increase military spending over all, despite the country's need to pare down its huge national debt, and said it might change its current interpretation of its pacifist Constitution to allow its military to come to the aid of American forces under attack.Because the wording of the agreement was worked out jointly, those provisions suggested American support for the changes, some of which remain controversial in Japan where many fear they are leading the country ever further from its postwar pacifism. The United States has long suggested it would welcome Japan's moving toward what some here call a "more normal" military rather than limiting itself to Self-Defense Forces, but the agreement was quite specific.Japan has slowly been pushing the bounds of the constitutional constraints on its military for years, partly in a reaction to China's increasing power and assertiveness in the region. Japanese warships have not only conducted joint exercises with a growing number of military forces in the Pacific and Asia, but they have also begun making regular port visits to countries that had once been fearful of a resurgence of Japan's military.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, a conservative nationalist, has already increased military spending for the first time in 11 years, though by only 0.8 percent. He would like to go further, proposing a rewriting of the Constitution that would scrap restrictions on the military and that has so far won little popular backing. As a first step, he has proposed expanding the interpretation of the Constitution to allow the military to come to the aid of United States forces if needed.A key issue during the talks was how to respond to China, which has been sending ships to contest Japan's control of the group of uninhabited islands in the East China Sea known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China. The agreement announced on Thursday says the United States and Japan should be ready to deal with "coercive and destabilizing behaviors." While the United States has refused to take sides in the dispute, Mr. Hagel repeated American assurances that the islands are covered by the security treaty, which obligates the United States to help Japan defend itself if attacked.
The mother of Kenneth Bae, an American of Korean descent who has been held in North Korea for nearly a year and is in failing health, has been granted permission by the North Korean authorities to visit him and arrived in Pyongyang on Thursday, his family reported.Mr. Bae, 45, a tour operator who did Christian missionary work — a crime in North Korea's authoritarian and hermetic society — was tried and sentenced in May to 15 years of hard labor for hostile acts against the government.His incarceration has aggravated the chronically antagonistic relationship between the United States and North Korea. It came at a time of particularly high tensions over the North's nuclear and ballistic missile activities under its young new leader, Kim Jong-un, grandson of the country's founder. The North Koreans have rejected repeated demands by the United States government to release Mr. Bae.Mr. Bae's family, who live in Washington State, said in a statement that his mother, Myunghee, would spend five days in North Korea."I don't really know what to expect for my trip," the mother, 69, said in the statement, which was posted on a Web site created to publicize efforts to secure his release. "All I know is that I want to see my son."Mr. Bae's sister, Terri Chung, said Thursday night in a telephone interview that the trip's arrangements had been made by the Swedish Embassy in Pyongyang, which oversees American interests in North Korea.Mr. Bae, who has diabetes, back problems and an enlarged heart, was hospitalized within months of his incarceration on a prison work farm. Mrs. Chung said she understood that he was still in a hospital.Mrs. Chung also said that she did not know if her brother knew about the visit, and that it was likely their mother would get to see him on Friday."We don't really know much about his health conditions," she said. "We're uncertain about what she might find when she arrives."
The mother of Kenneth Bae, an American Christian missionary serving a 15-year term of hard labor in North Korea's penal system, visited him for 90 minutes in a "very emotional reunion" on Friday at a Pyongyang hospital where he has been convalescing since the summer because of poor health and severe weight loss, Mr. Bae's sister reported on Friday.The sister, Terri Chung, who has become a spokeswoman for the family in the year since Mr. Bae was first detained in North Korea, said she interpreted the North Korean government's agreement to allow the visit as a positive signal that could foreshadow a decision to release him. But Ms. Chung also tempered her optimism."Any time there's any kind of positive engagement about Kenneth from inside the DPRK, we're really excited," Ms. Chung said in a telephone interview from her home in Edmonds, Wash., using the initials for the Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the formal name for North Korea. "It's not necessarily a sign of his release, but we're hopeful."Their mother, Myunghee Bae, 69, arrived in Pyongyang on Thursday in a previously unannounced trip arranged through the Swedish Embassy, which conducts consular affairs for the United States in North Korea. She had been beseeching the North Korean authorities to allow her to see Mr. Bae, 45, who was hospitalized in August.Ms. Chung said she could not communicate with her mother while she was in North Korea but had received a briefing on the visit to the hospital via the Swedish Embassy, which had communicated the information to State Department officials who have been closely following Mr. Bae's case."It was a very emotional reunion between mother and son," Ms. Chung said.She also reported that Mr. Bae had regained 15 pounds in the hospital, looked better physically and that "his test results have shown improvements."The mother, who brought Mr. Bae family photographs, granola bars, trail mix, chocolate and beef jerky, has been promised two more visits before she departs on Monday, Ms. Chung said.The Chosun Sinbo, a pro-North Korean newspaper based in Japan that was given access to the reunion, transmitted a photograph showing the mother comforting her son, who was shown sitting a chair dressed in blue-striped pajamas.Mr. Bae, a Christian missionary who had been operating tours of North Korea from China, was detained last November in the port of Rason. He was sent to a labor camp in May after he was tried and sentenced for what the North Korean authorities called hostile acts against the government through his proselytizing. Afflicted with maladies that include diabetes, an enlarged heart and chronic back pain, he lost 50 pounds, the family has said.His incarceration has added to the list of obstacles in easing the antagonistic relationship between the United States and North Korea, which have technically remained in a state of war since the armistice that halted the Korean War 60 years ago. The antipathy reached a new level earlier this year, with the North's young leader, Kim Jong-un, grandson of the country's founder, Kim Il-sung, threatening to attack the United States with nuclear weapons.The North Koreans have repeatedly sent contradictory messages about their intentions for Mr. Bae, sometimes dropping hints his freedom could be negotiated, sometimes the opposite. They abruptly revoked an invitation to Robert King, a senior American diplomat, on Aug. 30 as he was about to visit with the intention of seeking Mr. Bae's release.Bill Richardson, the former New Mexico governor who has been on diplomatic missions to North Korea eight times, interpreted the North's decision to allow the mother to visit Mr. Bae as signal they are ready to negotiate his release. "They obviously want to lower the temperature with the United States," he said in a telephone interview."This is a path forward, possibly toward some contact with American officials," he said. At the same time, he added the caution that "the North Koreans are excellent at mixed and confusing signals."
The mother of Kenneth Bae, the ailing American missionary serving a 15-year sentence of hard labor in North Korea, said on Tuesday that "it broke my heart to leave him behind" after the North Korean authorities had permitted her to visit him in a Pyongyang hospital.In a statement released by the Bae family, the mother, Myunghee Bae, 69, also expressed thanks to North Korean officials, who allowed her to see Mr. Bae, 45, three times over the course of a five-day stay in the country. Family members had held out hope that the gesture might have led to clemency for Mr. Bae, and it was clear from the statement that they were disappointed.Mr. Bae, an American of Korean descent, was detained in the port city of Rason last November. He was convicted of hostile acts against the North Korean government for proselytizing and was dispatched in May to a prison camp, where he lost 50 pounds and has suffered from diabetes, an enlarged heart, liver problems and chronic back pain. He was transferred in August to a hospital in Pyongyang, where he was convalescing, and his mother was granted permission to visit North Korea last Thursday. She left on Monday."I was happy to see him and to hold him, but it broke my heart to leave him behind," she said in a statement posted on a Web site created to publicize a campaign to free Mr. Bae, whose family lives in Washington State. "His yearlong imprisonment has taken a heavy toll not only on Kenneth but on the whole family: every day the pain and anxiety continue to carve a deep scar on all of our hearts."The United States has criticized North Korea both for the severity of the sentence and for the secrecy of the judicial proceeding against Mr. Bae, who is at least the sixth American detained in North Korea in the past four years. The others were eventually freed after visits by prominent Americans, including two former presidents, Bill Clinton and Jimmy Carter.The North Koreans have hinted that they might seek to use Mr. Bae as leverage to gain concessions from the Americans. The countries' long-estranged relationship dates from the Korean War 60 years ago. So far, however, Mr. Bae's incarceration, which has been punctuated by some of the most hostile anti-American invective from North Korea under its new leader, Kim Jong-un, has only aggravated the relationship.Under Mr. Kim — a grandson of Kim Il-sung, the country's cultlike revolutionary founder — North Korea has conducted a nuclear test and rocket launching in defiance of international sanctions; threatened the United States, South Korea and Japan with nuclear attack; and restarted a mothballed nuclear reactor that could provide fuel for bombs.Even as Mrs. Bae was visiting her son, the country's official Korean Central News Agency issued a new warning on Saturday of "all-out war" if the United States did not stop military drills with the South Korean and Japanese navies."We emphasize again that the United States must withdraw various measures aimed to isolate and strangulate us," the news agency quoted a spokesman for the National Defense Commission as saying.
The State Department said Friday that North Korea had confirmed that it was holding an American citizen, whom family and friends have identified as an octogenarian veteran of the Korean War inexplicably detained there last month as he was concluding an officially approved nine-day tour of the country.North Korea's confirmation broke nearly four weeks of silence by the North Korean authorities about the detained veteran, Merrill Newman, 85, of Palo Alto, Calif. It was conveyed to the State Department by Sweden's embassy in the North, which represents American interests in North Korea.Mr. Newman's wife, Lee, issued a public statement beseeching North Korea to let him come home, describing his detention there as "some dreadful misunderstanding."Jen Psaki, the State Department spokeswoman, told reporters at a regular news briefing in Washington that Sweden's embassy had "been informed by North Korea of the detention of a U.S. citizen." She would not identify the citizen by name because of the legal requirements of the department's privacy policy, but family members had said this week that the person was Mr. Newman."We are working in close coordination with representatives of the Embassy of Sweden to resolve this issue, and they also have requested, actually on a daily basis, consular access," Ms. Psaki said.Mr. Newman is the second American citizen seized by the North Korean authorities over the past year, a barometer of the deeply estranged relations between the United States and North Korea, which remain in a technical state of war after 60 years.Last November, Kenneth Bae, 44, an American Christian missionary and tour operator, was seized in the North Korean port of Rason and later convicted of hostile acts against the government. He is serving a 15-year sentence of hard labor.It is unclear what accusations, if any, Mr. Newman may face from the North Koreans, who have not explained why they have detained him. His family has said that he has a heart ailment and that it was unknown whether a 30-day supply of medicine forwarded to the Swedish Embassy in Pyongyang, the capital, which it delivered to the North Korean Foreign Ministry, had ever reached Mr. Newman.There has been speculation that Mr. Newman's detention was precipitated by what his traveling companion on the tour, Bob Hamrdla, later described as a difficult conversation Mr. Newman had with North Korean officials concerning the war.The newspaper Military Times reported Friday that another Merrill Newman, 84, who lives in Oregon, also was a Korean War veteran and that he had won a Silver Star in 1952 for leading a Marine platoon in attacks that inflicted heavy casualties on North Korean troops. The account appeared to raise the possibility that the North Korean authorities had mistaken one Merrill Newman for the other.But Jeff Newman, the detained American's son, has told reporters that there is no indication that the North Koreans have confused the two.
TOKYO — In the courtly world of diplomacy, the meeting between Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel and President Park Geun-hye of South Korea was something of a shock.Mr. Hagel was in the region to try to revitalize America's faltering "pivot" to Asia and had one especially pressing request for Ms. Park: to try to get along better with Japan. The steely Ms. Park instead delivered a lecture about Japan's "total absence of sincerity" over the suffering that imperial Japan caused Korea in the last century and finished with a request of her own: that Washington force Tokyo to behave."If Germany had continued to say things that inflicted pain, while acting as if all was well, would European integration have been possible?" she asked Mr. Hagel. "I think the answer is no."Ms. Park's refusal to budge during that September meeting was one of many recent reminders that the leaders of Japan and South Korea, the United States' closest military partners in Asia, seem to be barely on speaking terms. Analysts say the current tensions are among the worst in recent years, an increasingly vexing problem for the Obama administration as it struggles to present a united front in dealing with a rising China and a nuclear North Korea.This month, a rare meeting of Japan's and South Korea's top defense officials ended in an impasse, with harsh words and no progress on an intelligence-sharing deal the United States had been pushing for years.Ms. Park went so far as bringing China into the fracas, even as the Japanese and Chinese feuded over disputed islands. She asked China's leader during a summit meeting to erect a monument to a Korean national hero who assassinated the first prime minister of Japan for his role in the Japanese colonization of Korea. The Chinese complied. It has also not been lost on the Japanese that Ms. Park held the summit meeting with China's leader while she continued to refuse to do the same with Japan's prime minister, breaking a longstanding tradition of Korean and Japanese leaders meeting soon after taking office."History issues are having impacts on us and our alliances in Asia in ways that we never anticipated," said Thomas Berger, an associate professor of international relations at Boston University.While history has long haunted relations between Japan and South Korea, the recent chill is being driven partly by the very pivot to Asia that increasingly makes the administration anxious that its allies get along. To bolster its attempts to contain China's territorial ambitions, the United States has supported Japan's moves to strengthen its armed forces despite South Korea's fear that Japan is reverting to militarism.But beyond the policy irritants, the frustrations in the two countries seem very much rooted in the personal history of their new, and conservative, leaders.The Japanese prime minister, Shinzo Abe, is a rightist who has long sought to have his country's World War II-era history portrayed in a more positive light. He is driven, analysts say, by a deep desire to exonerate his grandfather, an architect of Japanese empire-building in the 1930s who was eventually arrested as a war criminal by Japan's American occupiers, before becoming prime minister.Ms. Park carries her own historical baggage. As the daughter of Park Chung-hee, a military ruler who served as an officer in the Imperial Japanese Army while Korea was still a colony, she is under constant pressure to distance herself from her father's ties to Japan."Neither Park nor Abe can come together for personal reasons that run across generations," said Mikio Haruna, a politics professor at Waseda University in Tokyo. "And this fact is driving Washington up a wall."The lack of communication, analysts and American officials say, has practical ramifications, including a setback of American efforts to nudge the two countries' militaries to work together. Such cooperation, which is very limited, would be crucial during any regional conflict.
TOKYO — Brushing past angry street protests and apocalyptic editorials in leading newspapers, Japan's conservative prime minister, Shinzo Abe, appears set to achieve one of the first items on his legislative agenda to roll back his nation's postwar pacifism: passing a national secrets law.The secrecy bill, which sped through the lower house of Parliament on Tuesday and is expected to pass the upper house soon, is considered an initial step in Mr. Abe's efforts to turn Japan into what some here call a more "normal" nation, with fewer restrictions on its ability to protect itself and able to assume a greater regional role.The measure, along with the creation of an American-style National Security Council approved this week, would strengthen the prime minister's hand in a crisis.Mr. Abe has said that tighter controls of state secrets were needed to plug holes in Japan's protection of information and, most important, to persuade the United States to share more of its sensitive military intelligence. With China's rise and increasing assertiveness, Mr. Abe has been leading Japan to become a more full-fledged military ally of the United States.But the secrecy bill has quickly become a lightning rod for opponents, many in the news media and at universities, who fear that it gives too much discretion to the nation's powerful bureaucrats to decide what is a state secret and allows a famously opaque government to provide even less information to the public. Many have warned that the bill could lead to abuses of power by the government, and some critics have gone so far as to compare it to much more draconian prewar laws that placed severe restrictions on speech, and ultimately allowed the military to drag Japan into World War II."Japan doesn't have the strong tradition of freedom of speech, as our recent history shows," said Yasuhiko Tajima, a professor of media law at Sophia University in Tokyo. "Allowing bureaucrats to declare whatever they want to be state secrets would make us no different than dictatorships like North Korea and China."One of the biggest criticisms of the bill is that its definition of secrets is too vague and broad. The current wording gives the heads of government agencies the power to declare information off limits if it touches on such sensitive national security areas as diplomacy, defense and antiterrorism policy. Those found guilty of leaking these secrets could face up to 10 years in prison, far longer than under Japan's current laws.The secrecy bill was submitted in tandem with the bill to create a National Security Council that Parliament approved this week.Political analysts say the twin measures are the first steps in a legislative agenda that could eventually see Mr. Abe try to fulfill his long-held goal of revising his nation's antiwar Constitution to allow for a fully developed military instead of purely defensive forces — still a controversial idea in Japan."This legal framework is needed for the proper functioning of a new N.S.C. that can serve as a command center for national security strategy," said an editorial last month in Yomiuri Shimbun, a conservative newspaper that has long served as a mouthpiece for Mr. Abe's governing Liberal Democratic Party.Taking advantage of the party's control of both houses of Parliament, Mr. Abe, who had promised to end the country's long political paralysis, sped the secrecy bill through the lower house in less than three weeks, and then into the upper house.The speed, however, has left opponents feeling steamrollered, feeding fears that the secrecy bill poses a threat to Japanese democracy and inspiring bitter complaints that Mr. Abe was breaking from Japan's tradition of building political consensus for major changes."We saw the iron fist of the Abe cabinet under its velvet glove," said Banri Kaieda, the leader of Japan's largest opposition, the Democratic Party, after Tuesday's secrecy bill vote.
HONG KONG — North Korea accused a captive American military veteran of war crimes, saying he was involved in the killing of innocent civilians during the Korean War, state news media reported on Saturday.The veteran, Merrill E. Newman, 85, of Palo Alto, Calif., has been detained in North Korea since Oct. 26, when he was taken off a flight as he was about to leave the country. He had been visiting on a tourist visa.The Korean Central News Agency said on Saturday that Mr. Newman had "admitted his crimes" and apologized for his actions during the war, which lasted from 1950 until 1953.Mr. Newman, who is a retired technology executive, served as an infantryman during the war and had long wanted to revisit the country.Mr. Newman's son, Jeff Newman, had said that the day before his father was to leave North Korea, he had a meeting with his tour guide during which the Korean War was discussed.The news agency said Mr. Newman had "masterminded espionage and subversive activities against the D.P.R.K., and in this course he was involved in killings of service personnel of the Korean People's Army and innocent civilians." The D.P.R.K. stands for the Democratic People's Republic of Korea.KCNA also published what it said was Mr. Newman's apology, a statement in often stilted English that described actions during the war. It also released a video in which Mr. Newman was seen reading excerpts from the statement.''During the Korean War, I have been guilty of a long list of indelible crimes against DPRK government and Korean people as advisor of the Kuwol Unit of the U.N. Korea 6th Partisan Regiment part of the Intelligence Bureau of the Far East Command,'' it said.Relatives had appealed to the North Korean government to release Mr. Newman, with Jeff Newman calling the situation a "misunderstanding." He said his father has a heart condition and a bad back and was on several medications.Mr. Newman's relatives were not immediately available to comment on his arrest.The detention of Mr. Newman led the United States to issue a travel warning about visiting North Korea, saying, "U.S. citizens crossing into North Korea, even accidentally, have been subject to arbitrary arrest and long-term detention."North Korea continues to hold Kenneth Bae, 44, a Christian missionary who was sentenced in May to 15 years of hard labor for committing "hostile acts" against the North. Mr. Bae's mother was recently allowed to visit him in a hospital, where he was being treated after becoming ill after working at a labor camp.Mr. Newman was detained at the end of a nine-day trip he made to North Korea with a companion from his California retirement village. The friend, Bob Hamrdla, said Mr. Newman's talk with the tour guide the day before his planned departure had not gone well and had left him upset.His flight was about to take off from Pyongyang to Beijing when he was pulled off the plane.The State Department had no immediate comment on the North Korean report.
WASHINGTON — Swedish diplomats in Pyongyang visited 85-year-old U.S. Korean War veteran Merrill Newman in custody on Saturday, the State Department said, the first access to him by Western officials since his arrest in late October."The DPRK permitted the Embassy of Sweden, protecting power for issues involving U.S. citizens in North Korea, consular access to U.S. citizen Merrill Newman," a State Department official said in a statement."Given Mr. Newman's advanced age and health conditions, we urge the DPRK to release Mr. Newman so he may return home and reunite with his family," the official added.The State Department official said the United States was aware of news reports that Newman had apologized for his wartime activities but had no other information about reasons for his detention.
WASHINGTON — The U.S. is urging North Korea to release an 85-year-old American who's been detained for more than a month.Retired finance executive Merrill Newman, who fought in the Korean War, was taken off a plane Oct. 26 by North Korean authorities while preparing to leave after a 10-day visit.Newman's son has said his father wanted to return to the country where he spent three years during the war.National Security Council spokeswoman Caitlin Hayden says that given Newman's age and health — he's on heart medication — North Korea should release him so he can be reunited with his family.North Korea state media claims Newman apologized for alleged crimes during the war and for "hostile acts" against the North during his trip.
When the Chinese artist Sun Xun was growing up in Fuxin, a small city near the North Korean border, he already knew that China was a country with at least two histories. In school, during the day, he studied the Chinese history presented in official accounts, a version remarkably free of such troubling episodes as the Great Leap Forward or the Cultural Revolution.Then, at night, his father would sit him down for a more personal account of the truth, describing what happened to his family during the 1960s and '70s, when his grandmother was marched into a public square, forced to wear a dunce cap and declaimed as a bourgeois collaborator for her upper-class background.Today, Mr. Sun is obsessed with Chinese history as it is recounted and manipulated in museum exhibitions and books, and as it is recalled by its participants. He examines it through ink art, an inherited tradition, making installations and video animations from thousands of meticulously drawn frames. They often feature a political leader in the guise of a magician, "the only legal liar," according to Mr. Sun.He takes inspiration from political cartoons, biology books, instruction manuals and newsreels, yet like many Chinese artists of his generation — he was born in 1980 — he avoids didactic conclusions about China's government, preferring to couch his criticisms in surreal metaphors. Often animals and insects stand in for human emotions, and conflicts and weapons punctuate scenes fraught with paranoia.Sun Xun (pronounced soon shoon), who lives in Beijing, where he runs his studio, Pi Animation, is spending the fall in New York to research the American scene in preparation for a solo show next fall. His stay is sponsored by Sean Kelly Gallery, which found him an apartment in Fort Greene, Brooklyn, and will exhibit his work next year.But first his work will be in the Metropolitan Museum of Art's exhibition "Ink Art: Past as Present in Contemporary China," its first show of Chinese contemporary art, opening on Dec. 11.Though video art is a comparatively new medium — and certainly new for the Met's Chinese painting galleries, with their focus on classical scroll paintings — artists like Mr. Sun fit in because they "exploit traditional modes of representation in how they narrate their stories," said Maxwell Hearn, the show's curator, who is also in charge of the museum's Asian art department."Ink Art," a survey of Chinese artists from 1980 to the present who are experimenting and innovating with the classical medium of ink-and-brush painting, will place Mr. Sun in a continuum that begins with pioneers like the dissident Ai Weiwei and the MacArthur grant recipient Xu Bing. The museum will show Mr. Sun's 2011 animation "Some Actions Which Haven't Been Defined Yet in the Revolution," a day in the life of a typical Chinese worker that begins with an alarm clock ringing and ends with a bomb exploding. It took more than a year to produce, based on over 5,000 woodcuts, a technique dating to at least the Diamond Sutra, from 868 A.D., one of the earliest surviving examples of a printed book. But Mr. Sun's adaptation borrows heavily from state-sponsored promotional woodcuts used during Mao's time as an inexpensive means of propaganda."Sun Xun is one of the youngest and most prolific video artists active in China today," Mr. Hearn writes in a catalog essay. "Though his images share the same angular, rough-hewed quality of the New Woodcut Movement, their message is darker and less inspiring, a dystopian vision of rootlessness and confusion."Mr. Sun learned calligraphy and ink-and-brush painting while training at the China Academy of Art in Hangzhou, from which he graduated in 2005. He had left home at 15 to attend the academy's high school, experiencing severe culture shock as he navigated the differences between a newly modernized city and his provincial hometown. "Everyone where I grew up, including my parents, worked in a factory and thought that people in business were evil capitalists," he said. "But in Hangzhou, everyone was doing business."He struggled to reconcile his conflicting experiences: official history versus family stories, state-controlled factories versus the new market economy, and past versus present. He found new insights in Martin Heidegger and Michel Foucault, philosophers he encountered in college.
TOKYO — With Japan locked in a tense standoff with China over disputed airspace, Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. arrived here late Monday for a weeklong visit to Asia intended to reassure a close ally and demand answers from a potential adversary.But first, Mr. Biden may need to repair a perceived disconnect between the United States and Japan in their responses to China's declaration of a restricted flight zone over a swath of the East China Sea that includes disputed islands claimed by both Japan and China.Analysts and former diplomats said that reassuring Japan of America's commitment to the region was particularly important given creeping worries in Tokyo that the United States might no longer have the financial ability, or even the will, to maintain its dominant military position in the Asia-Pacific.Although the Obama administration registered its displeasure with China's so-called air defense identification zone by sending two unarmed B-52 bombers on a mission through it, federal regulators, as a safety precaution, advised American civilian flights to identify themselves before entering the airspace — in compliance with the Chinese regulations.That was viewed by some in Japan as a mixed message, since the Japanese government had told its airlines to ignore the Chinese demand. Japanese newspapers began worrying about "allies no longer walking in lock step," and government officials sought clarification from Washington.The State Department quickly said that the advice did not mean that the United States was recognizing the air defense zone. And American officials have told the Japanese that the Federal Aviation Administration's decision was a safety recommendation — far short of an order, though major American airlines said they were heeding it.Still, a lingering ambiguity has led Japanese officials to give contradictory assessments of American intentions. On Sunday, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe told reporters that his government had confirmed through "a diplomatic route" that the United States had not asked airlines to file flight plans with the Chinese."While having a deep discussion of the issues, we hope to respond with close coordination between Japan and the United States," Mr. Abe said of his scheduled talks on Tuesday with Mr. Biden.Administration officials said earlier that Mr. Biden would leave no doubt in Japan or China that the United States views the Chinese move as a provocation and plans to disregard it, at least as far as military operations go."We have real concerns with this move by China because it raises real questions about their intentions," said a senior administration official, speaking on the condition of anonymity to avoid pre-empting Mr. Biden's message. "It constitutes a unilateral change to the status quo in the region, a region that is already fraught."Still, the official said, Mr. Biden would not deliver a formal diplomatic protest to Beijing, where he is to meet with President Xi Jinping on Wednesday. His aides are determined not to allow the matter to dominate his trip, during which the vice president also hopes to build support for a trans-Pacific trade agreement and coordinate a response to the nuclear threat from North Korea.Mr. Biden cultivated friendly ties with Mr. Xi when he was China's vice president. But their encounter this time may be more difficult.Analysts and former diplomats said the Chinese government was already using the recommendation to American airlines to pressure Japan. On Monday, a Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman, Hong Lei, commended the American move as showing "a constructive attitude," while scolding Japanese criticism of the air zone as "irresponsible.""The Chinese are already trying to portray this as daylight between the U.S. and Japanese positions, when there actually isn't any," said Kevin Maher, a former United States diplomat in Japan who is now a senior adviser at NMV Consulting in New York."The optics may look bad, but all the U.S. is saying is that we don't want commercial airliners to take an arrow for the team," Mr. Maher added. "We need to make clear that we will keep sending military aircraft into the declared zone."The tension with China comes at a delicate moment, with the United States pushing Japan to wrap up negotiations on the regional trade deal, the Trans-Pacific Partnership. Inspired by comments Mr. Abe made about the importance of women to the Japanese economy — and by the new American ambassador to Japan, Caroline Kennedy — Mr. Biden has left time for a visit to a Japanese company owned and run by a female entrepreneur. He was joined by Ms. Kennedy, who took up her post in Tokyo just three weeks ago.For Mr. Biden, though, the region's tensions will be inescapable. In addition to the conflict over the disputed islands — known in Japan as the Senkaku, and in China as the Diaoyu — Japanese and South Korean leaders are feuding amid a resurgence of animosities that date to Japanese colonialism and World War II.Before taking office, Mr. Abe, a conservative, struck a nerve with statements about Japan's culpability — or lack of it — in the war. Since then, however, he has not visited the Yasukuni Shrine, a memorial to the Japanese war dead that has become a fraught symbol because it also honors people who are war criminals. Mr. Biden will likely encourage him to keep staying away.With the United States trying to reinvigorate President Obama's shift to Asia after he canceled a trip to the region because of the government shutdown, analysts will watch Mr. Biden's words as a clue to America's resolve to maintain its military presence here."The most important thing is for Vice President Biden to show that the U.S. will work on China to end its unilateral actions," said Ichiro Fujisaki, who served as Japanese ambassador to the United States until last year.
SEOUL — North Korea announced on Monday the dismissal of Jang Song Thaek, the once powerful uncle of leader Kim Jong Un, for what it described as a string of criminal acts including mismanaging the economy, corruption, womanising and drug-taking.The sacking of the man regarded as the second most powerful in the secretive state comes after reports in South Korean media that one of his aides had sought asylum in South Korea.The unidentified aide, who managed funds for Jang, was being protected by South Korean officials in a secret location in China, cable news network YTN and the Kyunghyang Shinmun newspaper said on Friday, citing sources familiar with the matter.Jang was removed from all his posts and expelled from the ruling Workers' Party during a meeting of its politburo on Sunday, the North's official KCNA news agency said. Kim Jong Un attended and "guided" the meeting, it said."Jang and his followers committed criminal acts baffling imagination and they did tremendous harm to our party and revolution," KCNA said, without saying if Jang had been detained or charged with any crime.The report also did not refer to Jang's aide, whose defection, if confirmed, would be the most serious for North Korea in 15 years.South Korea's National Intelligence Service last week said it believed Jang had been relieved of his posts in November. It also said two of Jang's close associates were executed recently for corruption.The sacking means Pyongyang is undergoing its biggest leadership upheaval since the death in 2011 of former leader Kim Jong Il, the younger Kim's father.Among Jang's senior party and military posts, he was vice chairman of the country's top military body, the National Defence Commission.KCNA listed a series of reasons why Jang was dismissed, including mismanagement of the country's financial system, corruption, womanising and abusing alcohol and drugs."Jang pretended to uphold the party and leader but was engrossed in such factional acts (such) as dreaming different dreams and involving himself in double-dealing behind the scene," KCNA said."Affected by the capitalist way of living, Jang committed irregularities and corruption and led a dissolute and depraved life."Jang is married to Kim's aunt, the daughter of the North's founding leader Kim Il Sung, and was widely considered to be working to ensure his nephew firmly established his grip on power in the past two years.Last week a South Korean official said Jang was likely alive and in no immediate physical danger, as was his wife, Kim Kyong Hui.Experts say Jang's removal will help the younger Kim consolidate his power base with a group of younger aides.NOT SO LUCKY THIS TIME?Jang had been a prominent fixture in many of the reports and photographs of Kim Jong Un's public activities, but his appearances have tapered off sharply this year and he has not been since in official media since early November.He has survived previous purges and official displeasure, thanks largely to his sometimes tempestuous marriage to Kim Kyong Hui, but this time was different, said Jeung Young-tae, an expert at South Korea's Institute for National Unification."Jang is gone and purged. In North Korea, there can be no two suns," Jeung said.YTN said Jang's aide fled to China in late September or early October and that Jang could have been sacked because of this. It said the aide had knowledge of funds belonging to the younger Kim and Kim Jong Il.South Korea's National Intelligence Service had no knowledge of the defection, lawmakers said on Friday after they were briefed by the head of the spy agency.China's Foreign Ministry said it had noted the reports, but did "not understand the situation". U.S. national security officials said the United States was aware of the reports but cannot substantiate them.About 25,000 North Koreans have defected to the South but few of them were highly placed in Pyongyang.The highest-profile defection was Hwang Jang Yop, a Worker's Party ideologue who was the architect of the Juche (self-reliance) ideology of North Korea. He sought asylum in the South in 1997.
WASHINGTON — A compromise defense bill proposed on Monday by U.S. lawmakers would boost spending on missile defense by $358 million to $9.5 billion, mandating an additional homeland defense radar and increasing funding for U.S.-Israeli cooperative efforts.Leaders of the Senate and House of Representatives Armed Services committees released details of a slimmed-down defense authorization bill for fiscal 2014 late on Monday, calling for a final vote on the measure before Congress leaves for the year.The bill includes $80 million in additional funding to address the problem that caused a missile defense test flight failure in July, and $30 million for design and development of a new, enhanced "kill vehicle," the part of the rocket that is used to hit the target missile and destroy it on impact.In addition to added funding, the measure requires the Pentagon to develop options and plans to improve the Ground-based Midcourse Defense (GMD) system run by Boeing Co.The compromise measure also calls for the Missile Defense Agency to deploy another radar to protect the United States from long-range missile threats from North Korea, and to ensure that other sensors could be deployed on the Atlantic side of the United States to defend against missile threats from Iran.It earmarked $20 million to fund efforts under way to evaluate a possible additional U.S. interceptor site.The measure authorizes $173 million in added funding for U.S.-Israeli cooperative missile defense programs, including nearly $34 million to improve the Arrow weapon system and $22 million for work on developing an upper-tier interceptor. Boeing has worked with Israel Aerospace Industries (IAI) on the Arrow II and Arrow 3 interceptors.It also includes $117.2 million for development of the David's Sling short-range ballistic missile defense system, which is being developed jointly by Israel's state-owned Rafael Advanced Defence Systems Ltd and Raytheon Co, one of the largest U.S. arms makers.A new interceptor being developed by Israel and the United States to counter missiles that are held by Syria and Lebanon's Hezbollah guerillas passed a second live trial last month, according to a summary released by the committees.The measure also backed President Barack Obama's request of $220 million for Israel to buy additional Iron Dome short-range interceptors and batteries, and added $15 million to establish a U.S. co-production capability for Iron Dome parts.Raytheon has a joint marketing agreement with Israeli state-owned manufacturer Rafael Advanced Defense Systems Ltd for the Iron Dome system.In addition, the measure requires a report on U.S.-Israeli missile defense cooperation, and better reporting by the Missile Defense Agency on the full cost of operating and maintaining missile defense systems.The measure also explicitly bans the use of fiscal 2014 funds to integrate Chinese missile defense systems into U.S. missile defense systems, a move aimed at putting further pressure on Turkey to change its mind about choosing a Chinese system over those proposed by U.S. and European firms.U.S. and NATO officials have said the Chinese system could not work together with existing U.S. and NATO systems.
BEIJING — China, North Korea's most important ally, said Tuesday it wants friendly relations and hopes for stability in its neighbor following the purging of a top official considered close to Beijing.Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said Jang Song Thaek's ouster was an internal affair, but his comments point to Beijing's concerns that the North's opaque politics may have entered a more unpredictable stage."We hope North Korea can maintain national stability, the people's well-being and economic growth. China will remain committed to developing the friendly relationship between China and North Korea," Hong said at a regularly scheduled briefing.Jang's dismissal deprives Beijing of its most important connection to the North Korean leadership, further diminishing China's thin influence with its isolated, hard-line Communist neighbor.In 2012, Jang led a large delegation to China to discuss construction of special economic zones.China is North Korea's only significant ally and a key source of trade and aid. Despite such apparent influence, Beijing has been unsuccessful in coaxing North Korea back to six-nation nuclear disarmament talks, while its need for stability along its northeastern border keeps it from getting overly tough on its neighbor."China doesn't have many connections with (North Korea) at the top level to begin with. Jang's purge means that China lost one of the few conduits they had," said Roger Cavazos, a North Korea watcher at the Nautilus Institute for Security and Sustainability.Jang, the uncle of North Korean leader Kim Jong Jun, was stripped of his titles for alleged transgressions including instigating party dissent and squandering party funds on drugs, gambling and women.Under North Korea's policy of collective punishment, all of his associates are likely to be purged along with him, including many members of the 2012 delegation.While hardly a liberal, Jang was seen as a relative moderate not vehemently opposed to the sort of economic reforms Beijing has sought to encourage. His removal raises new questions for Beijing and others about Kim's attitude toward reform, with the leader offering few clues other than a stated goal of pursuing both nuclear weapons and economic growth, Cavazos said.While South Korea's intelligence service had reported Jang's rumored purge before North Korea's official announcement, it didn't appear that Beijing had received any warning it was coming, Cavazos said."China is likely upset that their ally seemed to have informed China of their actions at the same time it informed the world," he said.
WASHINGTON — The dramatic ouster of the uncle of North Korea's young ruler has sidelined the man reputed to be the second most powerful official in the secretive hierarchy. But Washington is not banking on a radical shift in Pyongyang's nuclear policy.Nor does the release of an 85-year old U.S. Korean War veteran over the weekend necessarily herald an improvement in chilly relations between Washington and Pyongyang that have gotten worse since young dictator Kim Jong Un took power.Still, there will be intense scrutiny of the North Korean government's next moves, to watch whether it moves to release another American citizen it has detained for the past year. That could provide an opportunity for some diplomacy between Washington and Pyongyang, which remain utterly at odds over the North's development of nuclear weapons.Accused of abuse of power, corruption and profligate living, Kim's uncle Jang Song Thaek was stripped of his official positions, including in the National Defense Commission, the government's top ruling body. State television on Monday showed him being grabbed by two security guards from a high-level party meeting, chaired by Kim.Political machinations in North Korea's authoritarian system are typically conducted behind closed doors, which made Jang's public purging and humiliation highly unusual. Jang had been viewed as a mentor to Kim since the death of Kim's father, Kim Jong Il, in December 2011.It has been a generation or more since a North Korean ruler has conducted such a high-profile purge, but a senior U.S. official said Washington doesn't know whether this will have any impact on Pyongyang's nuclear policy and its relations toward the United States.Jang's ouster does not necessarily reflect instability in the North Korea, but it shows Kim Jong Un is further consolidating his power, said the official, who requested anonymity as he was not authorized to speak publicly on the U.S. government's reading of events in North Korea.To the extent Jang's downfall affects the North's international relations, the impact is likely to be felt most keenly in Beijing, as he was viewed as a front man for ties to China, its only major ally. Jang has been seen by outsiders as the leading supporter of Chinese-style economic reforms.The most telling message Jang's ouster conveys is about North Korea's internal dynamics.Evans Revere, a former State Department official for East Asia, said it leaves no uncertainty about who is the sole source of legitimacy and command, and who is controlling government policy, including its twin goals, enshrined in the nation's constitution this year, to pursue both economic development and nuclear weapons.That could extinguish any remaining hopes Kim's rise to power would herald reform of the authoritarian state — hopes that were based on little more than his relative youth, education in Switzerland and enthusiasm for U.S. basketball.Early on, his government reached an agreement with Washington for a nuclear freeze in exchange for U.S. food aid that was meant to pave the way for full-fledged negotiations on the North's nuclear program. But the North wrecked the deal within weeks when it launched a rocket in defiance of a U.N. ban. Tensions spiked further after an underground nuclear test explosion in February, which the North followed up with dire verbal threats against the United States and its allies for leading the push for tighter sanctions in response.Those tensions have eased in recent months, and North Korea says it is ready to resume the six-nation negotiations on its nuclear program that it withdrew from five years ago. But given recent signs the North is restarting a mothballed reactor that can produce plutonium for bombs, Washington remains skeptical of Pyongyang's intent.The North's detention of the two American citizens has only made matters worse.One of the Americans, Korean War veteran Merrill Newman, who had been held since late October after visiting North Korea as a tourist, was freed Saturday. North Korean state media explained he had apologized for his alleged crimes during the Korean War and noted his age and medical condition.Washington welcomed the release, announced as U.S. Vice President Joe Biden was visiting neighboring South Korea, but is not reading into it any broader significance for U.S.-North Korean relations.North Korea is still holding another American national, Kenneth Bae, who was arrested more than year ago and suffers health problems. He has been sentenced to 15 years on charges of subversion. Pyongyang shunned a previous offer by Washington to send a senior envoy to seek a pardon for Bae and his release.Washington views Bae's detention as an obstacle to improving the U.S.-North Korean relationship and will now be pressing Pyongyang to resolve that case as well, although the U.S. official said progress in diplomacy on the North's nuclear program would still hinge on Pyongyang's willingness to honor its previous commitments on denuclearization.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — North Korea said Friday that it executed Kim Jong Un's uncle as a traitor for trying to seize supreme power, a stunning end for the leader's former mentor, long considered the country's No. 2.In a sharp reversal of the popular image of Jang Song Thaek as a kindly uncle guiding young leader Kim Jong Un as he consolidated power, the North's official Korean Central News Agency indicated that Jang instead saw the death of Kim's father, Kim Jong Il, in December 2011 as an opportunity to challenge his nephew and win power.Just days ago, North Korea accused Jang of corruption, womanizing, gambling and taking drugs, and said he'd been "eliminated" from all his posts. But Friday's allegations, which couldn't be independently confirmed, were linked to a claim that he tried "to overthrow the state by all sorts of intrigues and despicable methods with a wild ambition to grab the supreme power of our party and state."Pyongyang's statement called him a "traitor to the nation for all ages," ''worse than a dog" and "despicable human scum" — rhetoric often reserved in state propaganda for South Korean leaders.In the North Korean capital, dozens of people crowded around billboards displaying the morning paper. The execution was the top story, which said Jang's actions had created an explosion of outrage in the nation.The news was also broadcast on the radio, which was piped into the subway. People sat quietly and listened as the announcer listed Jang's crimes.During his two years in power, Kim Jong Un has overseen nuclear and missile tests, other high-profile purges and a barrage of threats this spring, including vows of nuclear strikes against Washington and Seoul. In contrast, his father, Kim Jong Il, took a much lower public profile when he rose to power after the death of his father, Kim Il Sung, in 1994.It's not clear what the execution and Kim Jong Un's very public approach to leadership says about the future of the country, which is difficult for outsiders to interpret. Some analysts see the public pillorying of such a senior official, and one related to the leader, as a sign of Kim Jong Un coming into his own, the final consolidation of power that began with his father's death."Whatever problems it faced, North Korea has usually acted in a way to bolster its leaders," said Chin Hee-gwan, a professor South Korea's Inje University. "By showing a little bit of a reign of terror, it's likely that Kim Jong Un's power will be further consolidated."But others see signs of dangerous instability and a rare acknowledgement that behind the scenes, Kim Jong Un's rise has not been as smooth as previously thought."North Korea's announcement is like an acknowledgement that Kim Jong Un's government is still in a transitional period," said Lim Eul Chul, a North Korea expert at South Korea's Kyungnam University.The execution could be followed by more purges, Lim predicted, but Kim Jong Un will eventually ease up in his approach to domestic affairs because he'll face a bigger crisis if he fails to revive the struggling economy and improve people's living standards.There are fears in Seoul that the removal of Jang and his followers — two of his aides were executed last month, South Korea's National Intelligence Service said — could lead to a miscalculation or even attack on the South.Top South Korean presidential security and government ministers held an unscheduled meeting Friday to discuss Jang's execution and its aftermath, according to the presidential Blue House. Seoul's Defense Ministry said the North Korean military has not shown any unusual activities and that there is no any suspicious activity at the North's nuclear test site and missile launch pads.There are also questions about what the purge means for North Korea's relationship with its only major ally, China. Jang had been seen as the leading supporter of Chinese-style economic reforms and an important link between Pyongyang and Beijing.Although the high-level purges over the last two years could indicate confidence, Victor Cha, a former senior White House adviser on Asia, said he sees signs of "a lot of churn in the system.""If he has to go as high as purging and then executing Jang, it tells you that everything's not normal in the system," said Cha, an analyst at the Center for Strategic and International Studies think tank in Washington. "When you take out Jang, you're not taking out just one person — you're taking out scores if not hundreds of other people in the system. It's got to have some ripple effect."North Korea has recently turned to attempts at diplomacy with South Korea and the United States. But tensions have remained high since Pyongyang's threats in March and April, which included warnings that it would restart nuclear bomb fuel production.There was no immediate word about the fate of Jang's wife, Kim Kyong Hui, the younger sister of Kim Jong Il, although some analysts believe that because she is directly related to the nation's founder, Kim Il Sung, and has been reportedly ill, she may be spared Jang's fate. She was also seen as an important mentor to Kim Jong Un after her brother's 2011 death.The White House said that "if confirmed, this is another example of the extreme brutality of the North Korean regime."The KCNA report was unusually specific in its accusations at times. For instance, it criticized Jang for not rising and applauding his nephew's appointment to a senior position because Jang "thought that if Kim Jong Un's base and system for leading the army were consolidated, this would lay a stumbling block in the way of grabbing the power."One resident in Pyongyang, Kim Un Song, a doctor at a hospital, said she was surprised at the news but supported the execution."We trust and believe only in Marshal Kim Jong Un. Anti-revolutionary elements can't shake our faith. I don't know if there are more out there, but they will never shake our faith," she said. "It's very good that he was executed."Klug reported from Seoul, South Korea. AP correspondent Hyung-jin Kim contributed to this story from Seoul.
WASHINGTON — The United States is consulting Asian allies about reports that the uncle of North Korean leader Kim Jong Un was executed, a White House official said.North Korea said on Friday that Jang Song Thaek, Kim's uncle and previously considered the second most powerful man in the secretive state, has been executed after a special military tribunal found him guilty of treason."If confirmed, this is another example of the extreme brutality of the North Korean regime," said Patrick Ventrell, a spokesman for the White House's National Security Council."We are following developments in North Korea closely and consulting with our allies and partners in the region," he said.
BEIJING — The stunning execution of Kim Jong Un's powerful uncle strips China of its most important link to North Korea's leadership and deepens concerns over how the unruly neighbor will proceed on Beijing's key issues of nuclear disarmament and economic reform.Facing heightened uncertainty, Beijing will likely avoid for now any response that might boost panic or paranoia in Pyongyang, where China is both valued and resented as a key backer of Kim's regime."It's like when you have a gas leak. You want to be very, very careful not to set off any sparks," said Jingdong Yuan, an expert on northeast Asian security at the University of Sydney.At the same time, China is likely dusting off its contingency plans for instability or even a regime collapse that could see thousands of refugees swarming across its borders, put the North's nuclear facilities at risk, and prompt action by the U.S. and South Korean militaries, Yuan said."This is not a welcome development as far as China is concerned," said.Long considered Kim's mentor and the country's No. 2, Jang Song Thaek formed a key conduit between Pyongyang and Beijing because of his association with the government of Kim's father, Kim Jong Il, along with his support for China-backed reforms to revive the North's moribund economy.Jang met with top Chinese officials during their visits to Pyongyang, and in 2012, Jang traveled to China at the head of one of the largest North Korean delegations ever to visit the Chinese capital to discuss construction of special economic zones that Beijing hopes will ensure North Korea's stability.His execution on a myriad of charges from treason to drug abuse further diminishes China's narrow influence on the government of the younger Kim. Despite being North Korea's only significant ally and a crucial source of trade and aid, Beijing has been unsuccessful in persuading North Korea to rejoin six-nation nuclear disarmament talks, while its overwhelming desire for stability along its northeastern border prevents it from getting overly tough on its neighbor.Jang's China contacts weren't explicitly mentioned in the official litany of crimes against him, although he was accused of underselling North Korean mineral resources for which China is virtually the sole customer. His China ties also were implicitly criticized via a reference to corruption related a 2011 project in conjunction with China at the Rason special economic zone.Jang, North Korea's official media said, "made no scruple of committing such act of treachery in May last as selling off the land of the Rason economic and trade zone to a foreign country for a period of five decades under the pretext of paying those debts."Jang's execution comes at delicate time in bilateral relations. While Kim's father made a number of visits to China, the new leader has yet to travel outside North Korea and has repeatedly defied Beijing's calls not to launch missiles and stage nuclear tests. That has in turn spurred Beijing to make unusually bold criticism and sign on to tightened U.N. Security Council sanctions, arousing an angry response from Pyongyang.The chill in relations was somewhat relieved following the visit by a top North Korean general to Beijing this summer, but diplomats say China remains committed to working closely with the international community on enforcing sanctions and coaxing Pyongyang back to nuclear talks.Still, Jang's execution isn't expected to bring major, immediate changes in a relationship that has been remarkably consistent over the many decades since China sent troops to save the North Korean regime from extinction in the 1950-53 Korean War.Wang Junsheng, a North Korea watcher at the government's Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, said relations might even benefit since the move leaves Kim in a stronger position than ever to guide North Korea's ties Beijing, the strengthening of which benefits both sides."Kim has now finished consolidating his power and doesn't need to take drastic change in his foreign policy. Jang was merely a person who offered advice and implemented policy," Wang said.China's response to Jang's dramatic purging has been extremely low-key, emphasizing that the issue is North Korea's internal affair and expressing its hopes for stability and economic development. Along with stifling panic, Beijing may be hoping that its non-intervention will spare some of Jang's pro-China associates from being targeted for removal under the North's policy of collective punishment.As with South Korea, the U.S. and other interested parties, Beijing is struggling to analyze the current state of affairs in Pyongyang and ascertain Kim's positions on key topics.While Kim has enunciated a policy of jointly pursuing nuclear weapons and development, it isn't clear whether he views economic reforms as strengthening his rule or undermining it by inviting unwelcome comparisons with foreign economies and by introducing foreign concepts and practices, said Shi Yuanhua, director of the Center for Korean Studies at the Fudan University."North Korea couldn't live without China, but cooperation in developing the special economic zones may be affected to some extent," Shi said.Overall, Kim's attitude toward economic reform in cooperation with China remains a mixed bag, said Fang Xiuyu, a North Korea expert at Shanghai's Fudan University.Even as Pyongyang was announcing Jang's purging, North Korean and Chinese representatives were signing contracts on cross-border high-speed rail and highway connections, Fang pointed out."I don't think North Korea's economic relations with China will be affected because of this particular incident, but all we can really do for now is speculate," she said.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — The execution of North Korean leader Kim Jong Un's uncle brought a swift and violent end to a man long considered the country's second most powerful figure. But while Jang Song Thaek is now gone, the fallout from his purge is not over.In a stunning reversal of the popular image of Jang as a mentor and father figure guiding young Kim Jong Un as he consolidated power, North Korea's state-run media announced Friday he had been executed, portraying him as a morally corrupt traitor who saw the death of Kim's father, Kim Jong Il, in December 2011 as an opportunity to make his own power play.Experts who study the authoritarian country, which closely guards its internal workings from both outsiders and citizens, were divided on whether the sudden turn of events reflected turmoil within the highest levels of power or signaled that Kim Jong Un was consolidating his power in a decisive show of strength. Either way, the purge is an unsettling development for a world that is already wary of Kim's unpredictability amid North Korea's attempts to develop nuclear weapons."If he has to go as high as purging and then executing Jang, it tells you that everything's not normal," said Victor Cha, a former senior White House adviser on Asia.The first appearance of the new narrative came out just days ago, when North Korea accused Jang, 67, of corruption, womanizing, gambling and taking drugs. It said he'd been eliminated from all his posts. Friday's allegations heaped on claims that he tried "to overthrow the state by all sorts of intrigues and despicable methods with a wild ambition to grab the supreme power of our party and state.""He dared not raise his head when Kim Il Sung and Kim Jong Il were alive," it said, referring to the country's first leader and his son. But after Kim Jong Il's death, it claimed, Jang saw his chance to challenge Kim Jong Un and realize his "long-cherished goal, greed for power."The purge also could spread and bring down more people, Cha said. "When you take out Jang, you're not taking out just one person — you're taking out scores if not hundreds of other people in the system. It's got to have some ripple effect."South Korean intelligence officials say two of Jang's closest aides were executed last month.Narushige Michishita, a security expert at the National Graduate Institute for Policy Studies in Tokyo, suggested that Jang's removal shows "that Kim Jong Un has the guts to hold onto power, and this might have shown his will to power, his willingness to get rid of anything that stands in his way."One of the biggest opportunities for the world to see what might happen next will come Dec. 17, the second anniversary of Kim Jong Il's death. North Korea watchers will be closely following whether Jang's wife, Kim Kyong Hui, the younger sister of Kim Jong Il, and other figures are present in official ceremonies marking the day.Jang's removal leaves no clear No. 2 under Kim, whose inner circle now includes Vice Marshal Choe Ryong Hae, Premier Pak Pong Ju and the ceremonial head of state, Kim Yong Nam.News of Jang's execution was trumpeted across the nation by North Korea's state media — with unusually vitriolic outbursts on TV, radio and in the main newspaper — as a triumph of Kim Jong Un and the ruling party over a traitor "worse than a dog" who was bent on overthrowing the government.Pyongyang residents crowded around newspapers posted at the capital's main subway station to read the story. State media said Jang was tried for treason by a special military tribunal and executed Thursday."He's like an enemy who dares to be crazy enough to take over power from our party and our leader," said Pak Chang Gil, echoing the media's official line. "He got what he deserved."That's a long way from the popular perception that "Uncle Jang" was nurturing his nephew as a regent appointed by Kim Jong Il. Jang was seen prominently behind Kim Jong Un as he walked beside his father's hearse during his 2011 funeral. He was also a fixture at the new leader's side as he toured the country.The KCNA report was unusually specific in its accusations. It criticized Jang for not rising and applauding his nephew's appointment to a senior position because Jang "thought that if Kim Jong Un's base and system for leading the army were consolidated, this would lay a stumbling block in the way of grabbing the power."It stressed repeatedly that Jang had tried to assemble a faction of his own, suggesting the purging process could still be playing out.Jang's death could herald a "reign of terror," including more purges, said Lim Eul Chul, a North Korea expert at South Korea's Kyungnam University.Another question mark is how the purge will affect North Korea's relationship with its only major ally, China. Jang had been seen as the leading supporter of Chinese-style economic reforms and an important link between Pyongyang and Beijing. China has called Jang's execution a domestic issue and has avoided further public comment.North Korea has recently turned to attempts at diplomacy with South Korea and the United States. But tensions have remained high since Pyongyang's threats in March and April, which included warnings that it would restart nuclear bomb fuel production.Another resident of Pyongyang, Ri Chol Ho, said he did not believe Jang alone was deserving of the harshest punishment."For this group of traitors who were going to destroy our single-hearted unity, execution is too lenient," he said. "They should be torn up and thrown into the rubbish bin of history."Klug reported from Seoul. Associated Press writers Hyung-jin Kim and Eun-young Jeong in Seoul and Ken Moritsugu in Tokyo contributed to this report.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — North Korea said Friday that it had executed the uncle of Kim Jong Un, the country's leader, saying he was a traitor who tried to grab power, and that he was a corrupt womanizer.The following are excerpts from a 2,700-word English language statement issued by the North's official Korean Central News Agency on the decision to execute Jang Song Thaek :— "Every sentence of the decision served as sledge-hammer blow brought down by our angry service personnel and people on the head of Jang, an anti-party, counter-revolutionary factional element and despicable political careerist and trickster.— "The accused is a traitor to the nation for all ages who perpetrated anti-party, counter-revolutionary factional acts in a bid to overthrow the leadership of our party and state and the socialist system."— "Despicable human scum Jang, who was worse than a dog, perpetrated thrice-cursed acts of treachery in betrayal of such profound trust and warmest paternal love shown by the party and the leader for him."— "From long ago, Jang had a dirty political ambition. He dared not raise his head when Kim Il Sung and Kim Jong Il were alive.... He began revealing his true colors, thinking that it was just the time for him to realize his wild ambition in the period of historic turn when the generation of the revolution was replaced."— "When ... the decision that Kim Jong Un was elected vice chairman of the Central Military Commission of the Workers' Party of Korea at the Third Conference of the WPK in reflection of the unanimous will of all party members, service personnel and people was proclaimed, making all participants break into enthusiastic cheers that shook the conference hall, he behaved so arrogantly and insolently as unwillingly standing up from his seat and half-heartedly clapping, touching off towering resentment of our service personnel and people."— "When Kim Jong Il passed away so suddenly and untimely to our sorrow, he began working in real earnest to realize its long-cherished greed for power."— "The revolutionary army will never pardon all those who disobey the order of the Supreme Commander and there will be no place for them to be buried even after their death."— "He instructed his stooges to sell coal and other precious underground resources at random. Consequently, his confidants were saddled with huge debts, deceived by brokers."— "He let the decadent capitalist lifestyle find its way to our society by distributing all sorts of pornographic pictures among his confidants since 2009. He led a dissolute, depraved life, squandering money wherever he went. He took at least 4.6 million Euro from his secret coffers and squandered it in 2009 alone and enjoyed himself in casino in a foreign country. These facts alone clearly show how corrupt and degenerate he was."— "The era and history will eternally record and never forget the shuddering crimes committed by Jang Song Thaek, the enemy of the party, revolution and people and heinous traitor to the nation.
SEOUL — North Korean leader Kim Jong Un's influential aunt Kim Kyong Hui remains a part of the regime's inner circle, even after the execution of her husband last week, the second most powerful man in the isolated nation.North Korea late on Saturday named 67-year-old Kim Kyong Hui, daughter of North Korea's founder Kim Il Sung, as one of the funeral committee members for North Korea's ruling party, a prestigious position.Kim's uncle Jang Song Thaek was killed last week just days before the second anniversary of the death of Kim Jong Il, the father of North Korea's current ruler.Jang had been executed for attempting to seize power and for driving the economy "into an uncontrollable catastrophe."After Jang's downfall, the fate of Kim Kyong Hui had been unclear. North Korea's news agency KCNA on Saturday said Kim had been asked to prepare the funeral for Kim Kuk Thae, chairman of the Control Commission of the ruling Workers' Party.The funeral committee list is one of few indications of North Korean officials' status. Among the members were North Korea's figurehead Kim Yong Nam, Premier Pak Pong Ju, Vice Marshal Choe Ryong Hae and others, according to KCNA.Kim Kyong Hui is one of the few blood-relatives of young leader Kim's father, Kim Jong Il, who died in December 2011.North Korea will mark the second anniversary of the death of Kim Jong Il on Tuesday.
WASHINGTON — The United States imposed sanctions Tuesday on a Myanmar military officer and three companies it accuses of involvement in the continuing, illicit arms trade with North Korea.The designations do not directly target Myanmar's government but will deepen doubts over the nation's compliance with U.N. Security Council resolutions.Cutting Myanmar's military ties with North Korea has been a key goal of the U.S. policy to end Myanmar's long international isolation after its democratic reforms.In response to the reforms in the country also known as Burma, Washington has eased its longstanding restrictions on trade and investment, although not on export of arms. In a sign of enduring U.S. concerns, Treasury has periodically expanded the blacklist of individuals and companies it considers to be bad actors.As of Tuesday, they include Lt. Col. Kyaw Nyunt Oo, said to act on behalf of the Burmese Directorate of Defense Industries, or DDI, which is already sanctioned. Its chief, a general, was blacklisted in July.Treasury also targeted Soe Min Htike Co. Ltd. and Excellence Mineral, describing them in Tuesday's statement as Myanmar companies working with North Korean officials to import materiel for military weapons programs as recently this June; and Asia Metal, said to have constructed buildings and supplied construction materials for a DDI factory compound where approximately 30 North Koreans were still working as of December 2012.Myanmar's government has said its arms trade with North Korea has stopped and it complies with the U.N. sanctions which are intended to deny Pyongyang revenue for expanding nuclear and ballistic missile programs. U.S. officials say Myanmar has curtailed the trade, but not ended it."The revenues from these continuing military sales directly support North Korea's illicit activities," Under Secretary for Terrorism and Financial Intelligence David S. Cohen said in a statement. "We will continue to target this activity in Burma, and the region, as we work with our international partners to shut down North Korea's dangerous and destabilizing weapons proliferation."Designation of a company or individual on the Treasury list prohibits U.S. persons from transactions with them, and freezes any assets they may have subject to U.S. jurisdiction.The military cooperation with North Korea was forged during Myanmar's international isolation. The State Department has said that in late 2008, when Myanmar officers visited Pyongyang, they signed a memorandum of understanding with North Korea on assistance to build medium range, liquid-fueled ballistic missiles.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — North Korea vowed to unite behind leader Kim Jong Un during carefully staged events Tuesday to mark the second anniversary of his father's death, in an attempt to show it has returned to business as usual after the purge and execution of his once-powerful uncle last week.Kim sat silently as a stadium full of military and party officials paid homage to his father, Kim Jong Il, at the day's main event. He was flanked by Kim Yong Nam, the ceremonial head of state, and Vice Marshal Choe Ryong Hae, representing the military. Conspicuously absent was Jang Song Thaek, who was executed after being accused of corruption and trying to overthrow the government.Jang was widely seen as the second-most powerful man in North Korea before his fall. The regime's decision to execute and publicly vilify him — charges of everything from alleged drug abuse to womanizing to trying to create his own powerbase were trumpeted daily in the state media — heightened questions over the stability of Kim's two-year-old leadership and shattered the North's carefully cultivated illusion of total unity.But with Jang now out of the picture — he is already being deleted from state media archives — North Korea's official message Tuesday was back to its usual calls for "single-minded unity" behind Kim's leadership.As top officials sat with Kim on a wide stage at the Pyongyang Indoor Gymnasium for Tuesday's event with a huge portrait of Kim Jong Il behind them, heads bowed as the traditional North Korean funeral dirge played. At several points during the speeches, all rose to applaud the "immortal and glorious exploits" of the late leader. Kim Jong Un, wearing a gray Mao suit, did not speak at the ceremony."Once more, our people's army is firmly determined to guarantee the victory of our great general's revolutionary cause," Choe said, adding that the military would "hold high the flag of the part" and follow "the ever-victorious leadership of our supreme commander."Three minutes of silence were observed at the start of the ceremony.Jang's wife, Kim Kyong Hui, who is Kim Jong Un's aunt, did not appear at Tuesday's memorial. But she was noted by state media over the weekend in connection with another funeral of a top official, a sign that she has survived Jang's removal.Contradicting past assertions of unity and strength, North Korea has acknowledged its leadership had indeed been roiled by the challenge by Kim's mentor and uncle after the 2011 death of Kim's father. The acknowledgement of dissension and dangerous instability in the government has raised fears of what's ahead as Kim tries to revive a moribund economy while maintaining and advancing development of the country's nuclear arsenal.On the eve of the anniversary Monday, tens of thousands of people crowded Mansu Hill in Pyongyang, where two giant bronze statues of national founder Kim Il Sung and Kim Jong Il stand. A mass rally of the military was also held outside the mausoleum where the two Kims lie in state to swear allegiance to Kim Jong Un and the ruling Workers' Party.As the ceremony began Tuesday, Pyongyang's streets were empty.Regular citizens are often expected to attend memorial gatherings at their workplaces, some watching the live broadcast of the Central Memorial Meeting on state TV. Many then turned out in groups at portraits and monuments around the city to lay flowers before going back to work. The anniversary is not a public holiday and work continues around the memorial meetings and events.There were no major displays of public grief like the tears and wailing that filled the days after Kim's death in 2011.State media, meanwhile, has already switched back to usual propaganda fare.Jang is no longer in the headlines and has been deleted from at least one recently aired documentary. The focus has shifted strongly back to the glorification of Kim Jong Il and a series of on-site guidance visits by Kim Jong Un, who has in the past several days traveled to a military institute, a ski resort and a fish factory, all in keeping with the long-standing propaganda message that he's deeply engaged in the business of running the country.
SEOUL — North Korean leader Kim Jong Un's aunt was absent from a state memorial ceremony on Tuesday raising questions about her influence days after her husband, also a top state official, was executed.The purging and execution of Jang Song Thaek on Friday was the biggest upheaval in years in North Korea, which has conducted three nuclear tests and this year raised the possibility of nuclear war with South Korea and the United States.Jang was married to Kim Kyong Hui, a daughter of state founder Kim Il Sung and sister of the country's second leader, Kim Jong Il. She is an aunt of current leader Kim Jong Un, the third Kim to rule.North Korea's KCNA news agency said last week Jang had been executed for trying to seize power and for driving the economy "into an uncontrollable catastrophe".On Tuesday, his wife did not appear at a ceremony marking the second anniversary of the death of her brother, North Korea's second leader, Kim Jong Il.Together, she and Jang had been considered the "Pyongyang power couple", the real force behind the North Korean leadership, before Jang was labeled a traitor and executed.Kim Kyong Hui usually features prominently at important North Korean events alongside her nephew, the young new leader, Kim Jong Un, and other members of the North Korean elite.North Korean state media did not say why she was absent from the commemoration at the Kumsusan Memorial Palace, in the capital, Pyongyang.Political leaders, including Kim Jong Un and his wife, paid respects to the late Kim Jong Il, whose embalmed body lies in a glass coffin in the palace.Kim Kyong Hui has been absent from such events in the past, stoking speculation that she was ill, only to reappear later.OUT WITH THE OLDEarlier in the day, the political and military elite publicly pledged their loyalty to Kim Jong Un at the memorial gathering, less than a week after the young leader ordered the execution of the powerful family ally, Jang.The young Kim was the center of attention at the gathering with state television showed him sitting center stage beneath a big red mural of a flag emblazoned with a picture of his smiling father.Kim, believed to be about 30, took over when his father died in December 2011.Cheong Seong-jang, an analyst at the Sejong institute, a Seoul-based think tank, said by getting rid of his uncle, Jang, the young Kim had consolidated his position."By eliminating the only other faction, the power in North Korea is now fully concentrated on Kim Jong Un," Cheong said.Since taking over as leader, the young Kim has followed his father's program by ordering the North's third nuclear test and successfully launching a long-range rocket in the face of increasingly tight U.N. sanctions.Jang was the only leadership figure who may have posed any real threat to him.While North Korea has purged many officials in its 65-year history, it is rare that anyone as powerful as Jang has been removed so publicly - suggesting a recognition of internal divisions and competing factions around Kim Jong Un.The young Kim has removed most of Pyongyang's old guard during his comparatively short rule, replacing ageing generals and cadres with figures closer to his age.He has changed his Korean People's Army (KPA) chief of staff four times. The job changed hands three times during his father's 17 years in power.Choe Ryong Hae, a party apparatchik who has been around the Kim family for decades but had kept out of the limelight until three years ago, now appears to be the most influential adviser to Kim Jong Un.On Monday, Choe addressed a gathering of soldiers outside the Kumsusan Memorial Palace, stressing the army's unswerving loyalty to the young Kim."It will always remain the army of Kim Jong Un defending him unto death and upholding his leadership only," an official KCNA news agency dispatch quoted Choe as saying.
TOKYO — Taking Japan a step further from its postwar pacifism, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe approved a new five-year defense plan on Tuesday that calls for the acquisition of drones and amphibious assault vehicles to strengthen the nation's military as it faces the prospect of a prolonged rivalry with China over islands in the East China Sea.While Mr. Abe described the spending plan as "proactive pacifism," it continues a trend started earlier this year when Mr. Abe began to reverse a decade of military cuts to help offset China's rapid military buildup and the relative decline of American influence in the region.He is building on moves by previous prime ministers to inch Japan toward what many here call a more "normal" nation that can defend itself. While Mr. Abe, an outspoken conservative, has long wanted to wean the country from what he and other nationalists consider excessive pacifism and an unhealthy negativity about its World War II-era past, the tensions with China have made a skeptical public more willing to accept an expanded military.The spending plan was approved by the cabinet in tandem with a new 10-year defense strategy and a broader national security strategy that call for Japan to create a more dynamic military force, loosen self-imposed restrictions on exporting weapons, and nurture a stronger sense of patriotism among its citizens.Under the new strategy, Japan will continue to build closer ties with the United States, whose 50,000 military personnel stationed here still form the basis of Japan's national security. But it will also acquire weapons meant to increase its own capabilities — acquisitions that would have once been unthinkable for a nation that viewed its military with suspicion after its disastrous defeat in World War II.Japan will "build a comprehensive defensive posture that can completely defend our nation," according to the security strategy. "China is attempting to alter the status quo by force in the skies and seas of the East China Sea and South China Sea and other areas based on assertions that are incompatible with the established international order."Political analysts say that China's assertive stance in the dispute over the East China Sea islands has made Japan's once proudly pacifist public more willing to accept an expanded role for the nation's military, called the Self-Defense Forces. China's claims in the South China Sea have also put it at odds with several countries in Southeast Asia that say they own some of the territory in question.The islands at the center of Japan's standoff with China are known as the Senkaku in Japanese and the Diaoyu in Chinese. Japan has controlled the islands for decades, but China now says that was part of an imperial land grab.The new security strategy calls for Japan to continue to raise its regional profile by building security ties with other Asian nations, though it is unclear how a stronger Japanese military will be greeted by neighbors such as South Korea, where memories of Japan's early-20th-century empire-building are still raw.The spending plan announced Tuesday will raise the military budget by 1.2 trillion yen, or $11.7 billion, over the next five years, to about 24.7 trillion yen. While that is an increase of almost 5 percent, it is still far below the annual double-digit increases in China's military spending.According to the Stockholm International Peace Research Institute, Japan had the fifth-largest military budget in the world last year. China had the second largest, behind the United States.Much of the new spending will go to strengthen Japan's ability to monitor and defend southwestern islands, including those in dispute with China. Toward that end, Japan will station more early-warning aircraft in Okinawa and buy three unarmed Global Hawk drones for surveillance.The spending plan also includes the acquisition of beach-assault vehicles and American Osprey tilt-rotor aircraft to equip a recently created Marine Corps-style amphibious infantry unit that can defend and recapture remote islands.The 10-year military strategy approved on Tuesday calls on Japan to create a more mobile military that can deal with contingencies on far-flung islands, as well as so-called gray-zone conflicts that might involve small numbers of terrorists or paramilitary attackers. It maintains the army's current troop level of about 160,000, reversing earlier plans to reduce that number.The strategy also calls on Japan to study whether it should buy or develop long-range strike capability, like cruise missiles, that would allow it to destroy a threat like a North Korean ballistic missile before it was launched.Japan has so far eschewed such clearly offensive weapons in order to maintain the defensive nature of its military, whose existence already pushes the limits of a postwar Constitution that bars the nation from possessing "land, sea and air forces, as well as other war potential."Mr. Abe wants to go even further by stretching the definition of self-defense to include action taken on behalf of allies under attack — for example, allowing Japan to shoot down a North Korean ballistic missile heading toward the United States.That doctrine, known as collective self-defense, has run into stiff public opposition, including from a small Buddhist political party within Mr. Abe's own governing coalition. On Tuesday, the top government spokesman, Yoshihide Suga, said consideration of collective self-defense would be put off until next year at the earliest.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — Former NBA star Dennis Rodman arrived in North Korea on Thursday to meet leader Kim Jong Un and put the finishing touches on plans to bring 12 ex-NBA players to Pyongyang for a Jan. 8 exhibition game marking the leader's birthday. Rodman said the game is on track despite the recent execution of Kim's uncle in a dramatic political purge.Rodman's visit comes less than a week after North Korea announced the execution of Jang Song Thaek, an unprecedented fall from grace for one of the most powerful figures in the country. Jang's execution sparked speculation by foreign analysts over the future of the Kim regime.But officials in Pyongyang say Jang's removal has not caused any instability. Rodman's visit — should it proceed uneventfully — could be a sign that Kim is firmly in charge.Rodman told The Associated Press in a brief interview at his Pyongyang hotel that he was undaunted by the recent political events."I can't control what they do with their government, I can't control what they say or how they do things here," he said. "I'm just trying to come here as a sports figure and try to hope I can open the door for a lot of people in the country."Rodman and Kim have struck up an unlikely friendship since the Hall of Famer traveled to the secretive state for the first time in February with the Harlem Globetrotters for an HBO series produced by New York-based VICE television.He remains the highest-profile American to meet Kim since the leader inherited power from his father, Kim Jong Il, in 2011."I've come over to see my friend, and people always give me a little hard time about me saying that," said Rodman, who was given the red carpet treatment at the airport by Vice Sports Minister Son Kwang Ho and O Hun Ryong, secretary-general of the North Korean Basketball Association. "I'm very proud to say he's my friend, because he hasn't done anything to put a damper, to say any negative things about my country."Rodman has not yet announced the roster for the game. He is also expected to train North Korean basketball players during his several-day stay in Pyongyang and to meet with Kim, though he did not give any details about what his plans are. He said, however, that if after the 12 former NBA players go home they say "some really, really nice things, some really cool things about this country," then he has done his job.Known as much for his piercings, tattoos and bad behavior as he was for basketball, Rodman has mostly avoided politics in his dealings with the North. He's mainly focused on using basketball as a means of boosting understanding and communication and studiously avoided commenting on the North's human rights record or its continued detainment of an American, Kenneth Bae, for allegedly committing anti-state crimes."North Korea has given me the opportunity to bring these players and their families over here, so people can actually see, so these players can actually see, that this country is actually not as bad as people project it to be in the media," he said.In Washington, the State Department distanced itself from Rodman, and reiterated U.S. concern about human rights in North Korea and its nuclear program."What we focus on is not an ex-NBA player from however many years ago who decides to take a trip to North Korea, it's on what the North Korean government is doing on its brutality, on its continued violation of international obligations. That's what we're focused on here, not what Dennis Rodman is or isn't doing," Harf said.However, she said the department would be open to speaking to Rodman on his return.Associated Press writer Matthew Pennington in Washington contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON — A U.S. institute says satellite images show North Korea is digging a tunnel at its nuclear test site but another underground explosion is unlikely in the next few months.The recent execution of ruler Kim Jong Un's powerful uncle has heightened concern about the stability of the North Korean regime and that it may resort to an attention-grabbing provocation, like a nuclear test.The website of the U.S.-Korea Institute said Friday that imagery of the Punggye-ri site indicates excavation of a probable new tunnel at a portal used for a February explosion, but it's likely some way from completion.The website, 38 North, estimates the volume of earth excavated since May and piled nearby suggests some 500 meters of tunnel has been dug since then, meaning it could be half-complete.
WASHINGTON — The comprehensive, $632.8 billion defense bill heading to President Barack Obama for his signature would crack down on sexual assault in the military, authorize combat pay for the troops and cover the cost of new ships, aircraft and weapons.A look at the legislation:—Authorizes $552.1 billion for the core budget, including $17.6 billion for defense programs within the Energy Department and $80.7 billion for the war in Afghanistan and other overseas operations.—Authorizes the size of the force at 520,000 for the Army; 323,600 for the Navy; 190,200 for the Marine Corps and 327,600 for the Air Force.—Authorizes funds for the destruction of chemical weapons in Syria.—Strips military commanders of their ability to overturn jury convictions.—Requires that any individual convicted of sexual assault face a dishonorable discharge or dismissal.—Provides victims of sexual assault or rape with legal counsel.—Eliminates the statute of limitations for courts-martial in rape and sexual assault cases, and criminalizes retaliation against victims who report a sexual assault.—Changes the military's Article 32 proceedings to limit intrusive questioning of victims, making it more similar to a grand jury.—Requires the Pentagon to deploy an additional missile defense radar to protect the United States from long-range missile threats from North Korea, and authorizes $30 million for initial costs toward deployment.—Prohibits the transfer of terror suspects from the detention center at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, to the United States and bars construction of detainee facilities in the U.S. Gives the president more flexibility in transferring prisoners overseas.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — Former NBA star Dennis Rodman held tryouts Friday for a North Korean team to face a dozen NBA veterans in an exhibition game on leader Kim Jong Un's birthday next month — though he hasn't convinced all the players on the American team that it's safe to come to Pyongyang.The flamboyant Hall of Famer said plans for the Jan. 8 game are moving ahead but some of the 12 Americans he wants are afraid to come.Some foreign analysts say the dramatic purge and execution of Kim's once-powerful uncle less than a week ago has cast doubt on Kim's future. But officials here say there is no instability and Kim remains firmly in control."You know, they're still afraid to come here, but I'm just telling them, you know, don't be afraid man, it's all love, it's all love here," Rodman told The Associated Press after the tryouts at the Pyongyang Indoor Gymnasium. "I understand what's going on with the political stuff, and I say, I don't go into that venture, I'm just doing one thing for these kids here, and for this country, and for my country, and for the world pretty much."Rodman, who arrived in Pyongyang on Thursday, said he expects to announce the roster soon. He also said he is planning another game in June.Rodman, wearing a pink button-down shirt and puffing on a cigar, watched as a couple of dozen local players took to the basketball court for the tryouts. After the session, he told the players that each of the 12 he chooses will get two new pairs of tennis shoes.When asked why he liked basketball, North Korean player Kim Un Chol told Rodman he started playing the game because he was impressed by it on TV, and said he also wants to be good at the sport because it is a favorite of leader Kim and his late father, Kim Jong Il.Rodman asked all the players if they felt the same way. They nodded in unison."I want you guys to do one thing for your leader," Rodman then told them. "It's his birthday. It's a very special, special day for the country."Rodman and Kim have struck up an unlikely friendship since he traveled to the secretive state for the first time in February with the Harlem Globetrotters for an HBO series produced by New York-based VICE television.He remains the highest-profile American to meet Kim since the leader inherited power from his father in 2011.Known as much for his piercings, tattoos and bad behavior as he was for basketball, Rodman has mostly avoided politics in his dealings with the North and has avoided commenting on the North's human rights record or its continued detainment of American Kenneth Bae for allegedly committing anti-state crimes.On Friday, he stressed that he hopes the game will be friendly, without political or nationalistic overtones.He said the former NBA players will take on the North Koreans in the first half, but the teams will be mixed for the second half."It's not about win or loss. It's about one thing — unite two countries," Rodman said.
PYONGYANG, North Korea — Dennis Rodman may not get to meet with North Korean leader Kim Jong Un on his latest visit to the country, but he said that won't stop him from coming back on Kim's birthday next month to hold an exhibition game with other former basketball stars.On the night before he was due to leave Pyongyang, Rodman told The Associated Press on Sunday that he had not yet had a meeting with Kim. The flamboyant Hall of Famer said that he didn't expect to meet the leader every time he comes to North Korea, and that his current trip was for training North Korean basketball players who will take part in the match Rodman is organizing for Kim's birthday on Jan. 8."I'm not just coming over here to meet the leader," Rodman said. "I came over here to meet the basketball team, to prepare a great game for the leader for his birthday. And people need to understand that it's not important for me to meet him every time I come over because he has another greater job to do for his country, and I respect that, but this trip was basically to come over to train the team, so we can have a great, great, game."Rodman's visit comes just after the dramatic purge and execution of Kim's once-powerful uncle, which has sparked speculation among some foreign analysts over how stable Kim's regime is. But officials here say that there is no instability and that Kim remains firmly in control.Rodman wants to bring 12 former NBA stars to Pyongyang for the exhibition, but has acknowledged that some of the Americans have been reluctant to come. He has held tryouts for the North Korean team during his visit, which began Thursday. He has said he expects to announce the U.S. roster soon, and that he is planning another game in June.Rodman and Kim have struck up an unlikely friendship since the former NBA star traveled to the secretive state for the first time in February with the Harlem Globetrotters for an HBO series produced by New York-based VICE television. Rodman is the highest-profile American to meet Kim since the leader inherited power from his father in late 2011.Rodman has avoided politics in his dealings with the North and has steered clear of commenting on the country's human rights record or its continued detainment of American Kenneth Bae for allegedly committing anti-state crimes."A lot of people in America don't approve of what I've been doing, but that's not my problem," he said. "You know, a lot of people want me to come over here and do some special things, but that's not my problem, I can't deal with that, I'm not, I'm not an ambassador."To keep next month's game friendly, Rodman said the former NBA players would take on the North Koreans in the first half, but that the teams would be mixed for the second half.
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan visited a contentious Tokyo war shrine early on Thursday, provoking swift condemnation from China and South Korea , both victims of Japan's wartime aggression.Wearing formal attire and followed by news media helicopters who streamed his visit live on television, Mr. Abe led a group of government officials into the Yasukuni Shrine in central Tokyo to pay his respects. The television cameras were not allowed into the inner shrine.Mr. Abe's visit to the shrine, which honors Japan's war dead, including Class A war criminals from the World War II era, was the first by a sitting Japanese head of government since former Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi paid his respects there in 2006.Among those honored by the shrine, of Japan's native Shinto religion, are several who were executed as war criminals after World War II. Past visits by Japanese politicians have angered China and South Korea, both of which suffered greatly under Japan's empire-building efforts in the early 20th century.Japanese prime ministers had stayed away from the shrine in recent years as the country sought to improve relations with China and South Korea.Mr. Abe himself did not visit the shrine during his first stint as prime minister from 2006 to 2007, but he has since expressed regret for that.Speaking to reporters after his brief visit, Mr. Abe expressed frustration that the shrine still provoked such controversy. He said that he had paid his respects not just to those who gave their lives serving Japan, but to fallen soldiers around the world.He added that it was normal for any national leader to honor the war dead, and that he had prayed for peace."Japan must never wage war again," Mr. Abe said. "This is my conviction based on severe remorse for the past. It is not my intention at all to hurt the feelings of the Chinese and Korean people."But his visit came at a tense time. Japan is already involved in a standoff with China over control of uninhabited islands in the East China Sea and over a new air defense identification zone announced by China that includes airspace over the disputed islands. It is also embroiled in a dispute with South Korea over separate islets.Mr. Abe has been particularly scrutinized because he is known for his conservative views on Japanese history, and what his supporters describe as a personal desire to revise an overly negative portrayal of Japan's actions during the war. He has questioned some accounts of Japan's wartime conduct, including whether the military forced women across Asia into sexual servitude.He has also sought to bolster Japan's military standing, increasing the country's military spending for the first time in a decade and adopting a new defense plan that calls for the purchase of drones and amphibious assault vehicles to counter China's own rapid military buildup in the region. Mr. Abe has long said that Japan must ultimately revise its pacifist Constitution to allow for a fully developed military instead of a purely defensive force.Local news reports have said that some of his closest aides advised Mr. Abe to stay away from the shrine, so he could focus on what has been the defining policy of his administration so far, reviving Japan's economy. American officials had also expressed concern that historical issues may isolate Japan, the United States' largest Asian ally, at a time when Washington faces a more assertive China and a nuclear North Korea.Still, since he took office exactly a year ago, Mr. Abe has sent offerings to the shrine, while several members of his cabinet paid visits. Some of his supporters had said it was just a matter of time before the prime minister himself paid a visit, especially as hopes for improved relations with either China or South Korea appeared slim anyway. Though Mr. Abe had never visited the shrine as prime minister before Thursday, he was a regular visitor as a lawmaker of the Liberal Democratic Party and most recently as opposition leader last year.China's reaction to Mr. Abe's visiting the shrine was swift."The Chinese government expresses its strong indignation that Japanese leaders brutally trample the feelings of the Chinese and other Asian peoples victimized in wars," the Chinese Foreign Ministry said in a statement. "We solemnly urged the Japanese side to abide by the commitment to reflecting on its history of aggression, taking measures to correct its errors, eliminating its adverse effects, and taking concrete actions to win over the trusts of its Asian neighbors and the international community."Luo Zhaohui, director of the Foreign Ministry's Asian affairs department, wrote on the Chinese microblogging site Weibo: "This is absolutely unacceptable to the Chinese people. It will cause great harm to the feelings of the Asian peoples and create a new, major political obstacle on bilateral relationships. Japan must bear the consequences."The South Korean news agency Yonhap quoted unnamed government officials in South Korea who rebuked Mr. Abe, calling his visit to the shrine an act that "sought to justify Japan's war of aggression" and that would damage bilateral relations.Yang Soon-im, who runs the Association for the Pacific War Victims, based in Seoul, South Korea, said: "This shows how arrogant Abe is toward the neighboring countries, how unrepentant Japan is about its past war crimes. Abe is almost as reckless as the regime in North Korea."
